 
Table of Contents   
 
UNITED ST ATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGT ON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒  ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF
1934
For the Fiscal Year Ended August 31, 2020
or
☐  TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF
1934
For the Transition Period from                 to                
Commission File Number 000-22496
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
OREGON  93-0341923
(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization)  (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
   
299 SW Clay Street, Suite 350, Portland, Oregon  97201
(Address of principal executive offices)  (Zip Code)
(503) 224-9900
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class  Trading Symbol(s)  Name of each exchange on which r egister ed
Class A Common Stock, $1.00 par value  SCHN  NASDAQ Global Select Market
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ☐   No ☒
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐   No ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to
such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒   No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule
405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to
submit such files). Yes ☒   No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accele rated filer, a smaller reporting company ,
or an emer ging growth company . See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company ,” and “emer ging
growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☐Accelerated filer ☒Non-accelerated filer ☐
 
Smaller reporting company ☐Emer ging growth company ☐
If an emer ging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with
any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has led a report on and attestation to its management’ s assessment of the e ﬀ ectiveness of its internal
control over nancial reporting under Section 404(b)  of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting rm that
prepared or issued its audit report.  ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ☐   No ☒
The aggregate market value of the registrant’ s outstanding common stock held by non-af filiates on February 29, 2020 was $429,207,543 .
The registrant had 26,907,823  shares of Class A common stock, par value of $1.00 per share, and 200,000  shares of Class B common stock, par
value of $1.00 per share, outstanding as of October 20, 2020.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORA TED BY  REFERENCE
Portions of the registrant’ s definitive Proxy Statemen t for the January 2021 Annual Meeting of Shareholders are incorporated by reference into Part
III of this report.
  
 
 
Table of Contents   
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
FORM 10-K
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
    PAGE
     
FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS  1
    
PART I     
     
Item 1 Business  2
     
Item 1A Risk Factors  14
     
Item 1B Unresolved Staff Comments  27
     
Item 2 Properties  28
     
Item 3 Legal Proceedings  29
     
Item 4 Mine Safety Disclosures  30
    
PART II     
     
Item 5
 Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of
Equity Securities 
31
     
Item 6 Selected Financial Data  33
     
Item 7 Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  34
     
Item 7A Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk  53
     
Item 8 Financial Statements and Supplementary Data  54
     
Item 9 Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure  99
     
Item 9A Controls and Procedures  99
     
Item 9B Other Information  99
    
PART III     
     
Item 10 Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance  100
     
Item 11 Executive Compensation  100
     
Item 12 Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters  100
     
Item 13 Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence  100
     
Item 14 Principal Accountant Fees and Services  100
    
PART IV     
     
Item 15 Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules  101
     
Item 16 Form 10-K Summary  104
   
SIGNATURES  105
 
 
 
 
 
Table of Contents   
 
FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
Statements and information included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K by Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. that are not
purely historical are forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
and are made pursuant to the “safe harbor” provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Except as
noted herein or as the context may otherwise require, all references to “we,” “our,” “us,” “the Company” and “SSI” refer to
Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. and its consolidated subsidiaries.
Forward-looking statements in this Annual Report on Form 10-K include statements regarding future events or our
expectations, intentions, beliefs and strategies regarding the future, which may include statements regarding the impact of
pandemics, epidemics or other public health emergencies, such as the coronavirus disease 2019 (“COVID-19”) pandemic; the
Company’s outlook, growth initiatives or expected results or objectives, including pricing, margins, sales volumes and
profitability; liquidity positions; our ability to generate cash from continuing operations; trends, cyclicality and changes in
the markets we sell into; strategic direction or goals; targets; changes to manufacturing and production processes; the
realization of deferred tax assets; planned capital expenditures; the cost of and the status of any agreements or actions
related to our compliance with environmental and other laws; expected tax rates, deductions and credits; the impact of
sanctions and tariffs, quotas and other trade actions and import restrictions; the potential impact of adopting new
accounting pronouncements; obligations under our retirement plans; benefits, savings or additional costs from business
realignment, cost containment and productivity improvement programs; and the adequacy of accruals.
Forward-looking statements by their nature address matters that are, to different degrees, uncertain, and often contain
words such as “outlook,” “target,” “aim,” “believes,” “expects,” “anticipates,” “intends,” “assumes,” “estimates,”
“evaluates,” “may,” “will,” “should,” “could,” “opinions,” “forecasts,” “projects,” “plans,” “future,” “forward,” “potential,”
“probable,” and similar expressions. However, the absence of these words or similar expressions does not mean that a
statement is not forward-looking.
We may make other forward-looking statements from time to time, including in reports filed with the Securities and
Exchange Commission, press releases, presentations and on public conference calls. All forward-looking statements we make
are based on information available to us at the time the statements are made, and we assume no obligation to update any
forward-looking statements, except as may be required by law. Our business is subject to the effects of changes in domestic
and global economic conditions and a number of other risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ
materially from those included in, or implied by, such forward-looking statements. Some of these risks and uncertainties are
discussed in “Item 1A. Risk Factors” of Part I of this Form 10-K. Examples of these risks include: the impact of pandemics,
epidemics or other public health emergencies, such as the COVID-19 pandemic; potential environmental cleanup costs
related to the Portland Harbor Superfund site or other locations; the cyclicality and impact of general economic conditions;
changing conditions in global markets including the impact of sanctions and tariffs, quotas and other trade actions and
import restrictions; volatile supply and demand conditions affecting prices and volumes in the markets for raw materials and
other inputs we purchase; significant decreases in scrap metal prices; imbalances in supply and demand conditions in the
global steel industry; the impact of goodwill impairment charges; the impact of long-lived asset and equity investment
impairment charges; failure to realize or delays in realizing expected benefits from investments in processing and
manufacturing technology improvements; inability to achieve or sustain the benefits from productivity, cost savings and
restructuring initiatives; inability to renew facility leases; difficulties associated with acquisitions and integration of acquired
businesses; customer fulfillment of their contractual obligations; increases in the relative value of the U.S. dollar; the impact
of foreign currency fluctuations; potential limitations on our ability to access capital resources and existing credit facilities;
restrictions on our business and financial covenants under the agreement governing our bank credit facilities; the impact of
consolidation in the steel industry; reliance on third party shipping companies, including with respect to freight rates and the
availability of transportation; the impact of equipment upgrades, equipment failures and facility damage on production;
product liability claims; the impact of legal proceedings and legal compliance; the adverse impact of climate change; the
impact of not realizing deferred tax assets; the impact of tax increases and changes in tax rules; the impact of property tax
increases or property tax rate changes; the impact of one or more cybersecurity incidents; environmental compliance costs
and potential environmental liabilities; inability to obtain or renew business licenses and permits; compliance with climate
change and greenhouse gas emission laws and regulations; reliance on employees subject to collective bargaining agreements;
and the impact of the underfunded status of multiemployer plans in which we participate.
 
 
1 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
General
Founded in 1906, Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. (“SSI”), an Oregon corporation, is one of North America’s largest recyclers of
ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal, including end-of-life vehicles, and a manufacturer of finished steel products. Worldwide demand
for recycled scrap metal is driven primarily by steel production levels, as recycled scrap metal is the primary feedstock for steel mill
production using electric arc furnace (“EAF”) technology and one of the raw materials utilized for steel manufacturing using blast
furnace technology. Steel mills around the world, including those in the North American domestic market in which our own steel
mill operates, are the primary end markets for our ferrous recycled scrap metal. Specialty steelmakers, foundries, refineries, smelters,
wholesalers, and other recycled metal processors globally are the primary end markets for our nonferrous recycled scrap metal. Our
steel mill in Oregon produces finished steel products using internally sourced recycled scrap metal as the primary raw material and
sells to industrial customers primarily in North America.
SSI acquires and recycles auto bodies, rail cars, home appliances, industrial machinery, manufacturing scrap and construction and
demolition scrap through its 94 auto and metals recycling facilities. We source material through well-developed, regional supply
chains that collect scrap from large and small businesses and individuals. Our largest source of auto bodies is our own network of 50
retail self-service auto parts stores, which operate under the commercial brand-name Pick-n-Pull. The majority of our auto parts
stores are located in close geographic proximity to our regional metals recycling operations which have large-scale shredders and
deep water port access. The level of vertical integration of our auto parts stores and metals recycling operations provides for efficient
processing of salvaged automobiles into recycled metal products for new metal production in steel mills and smelters globally or for
further processing by other customers.
 
We utilize a variety of systems and technologies to process recycled metals ranging from iron and steel to aluminum, copper, brass,
lead, stainless steel, zinc and other nonferrous metals for use in the manufacture of new or refined products. With scrap recycling
facilities located in 23 States, Puerto Rico and Western Canada, we are well-positioned to efficiently acquire scrap metal throughout
North America and deliver recycled metal products to customers around the world from our seven deep water ports and also to our
steel mill in Oregon. In fiscal 2020, we sold our products to customers located in 29 countries, including the United States (“U.S.”)
and Canada, and we sold to external customers or delivered to our steel mill an aggregate of 4.0 million tons of ferrous recycled
scrap metal and sold 551 million pounds of nonferrous recycled scrap metal to external customers.
Our internal organizational and reporting structure includes two operating and reportable segments: the Auto and Metals Recycling
(“AMR”) business and the Cascade Steel and Scrap (“CSS”) business.
AMR is our largest segment, representing 76% of our total revenues from sales to external customers in fiscal 2020. AMR generated
91% of its revenues in fiscal 2020 from sales of ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal, with the remainder generated primarily from
retail auto parts and other sales. AMR’s revenues from sales of recycled scrap metal, disaggregated by major product category, were
70% ferrous scrap metal and 30% nonferrous scrap metal in fiscal 2020. Our metals recycling operations reported within CSS also
generate revenue from external sales of ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal.
CSS produces finished steel products such as rebar, wire rod, coiled rebar, merchant bar and other specialty products using ferrous
recycled scrap metal primarily sourced internally from its metals recycling operations and other raw materials. CSS’s finished steel
products are primarily used in nonresidential and infrastructure construction in North America. In fiscal 2020, CSS sold 505
thousand short tons of finished steel products.
See Note 18 - Segment Information in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report for a
discussion of the primary activities of each reportable segment, total assets by reportable segment, operating results from continuing
operations by reportable segment, revenues from external customers and concentration of sales to foreign countries.
In fiscal 2020, we implemented productivity initiatives aimed at reducing our annual operating expenses at Corporate, AMR and
CSS, mainly through reductions in non-trade procurement spend, including outside and professional services, lower employee-
related expenses and other non-headcount measures. We targeted $15 million in realized benefits in fiscal 2020 from these
initiatives, and we exceeded this target with achievement of approximately $18 million of benefits in fiscal 2020.
2 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
In April 2020, we announced our intention to modify our internal organizational and reporting structure to a functionally based,
integrated model. We will consolidate our operations, sales, services and other functional capabilities at an enterprise level. This
change in structure is intended to result in a more agile organization and solidify recent productivity improvement and cost reduction
initiatives. We expect to complete this transition in the first quarter of fiscal 2021.
During fiscal 2020, we incurred aggregate restructuring charges and other exit-related costs of approximately $9 million in
connection with these initiatives, comprising severance costs of $2 million, costs associated with a lease contract termination of $1
million, and professional services costs of $6 million. The substantial majority of the restructuring charges and other exit-related
costs related to these initiatives were recognized in fiscal 2020 and required us to make cash payments.
Coronavirus Disease 2019 (“COVID-19”)
In March 2020, the World Health Organization characterized COVID-19 as a pandemic, and the President of the United States
declared the COVID-19 outbreak a national emergency. The outbreak resulted in governments around the world implementing
stringent measures to help control the spread of the virus, followed by phased regulations and guidelines for reopening communities
and economies. The pandemic and resulting measures have had a significant impact on national and global economic conditions.
We are a company operating in a critical infrastructure industry, as defined by the U.S. Department of Homeland Security. Consistent
with federal guidelines and with state and local orders to date, we have continued to operate across our footprint throughout the
COVID-19 pandemic. Ensuring the health and welfare of our employees, and all who visit our sites, is our top priority and we are
following all U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and state and local health department guidelines. Further, we
implemented infection control measures at all our sites and put in place restrictions on travel and in-person meetings and other
physical distancing measures. Notwithstanding our continued operations, COVID-19 has negatively impacted and may have further
unfavorable impacts on our financial performance, operations, supply chain and flows of raw materials, transportation and logistics
networks and customers. For further discussion of the impacts of COVID-19 on our financial condition and results of operations in
fiscal 2020, refer to Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations in Part II, Item 7 of
this report.
While we expect the COVID-19 pandemic to continue to negatively impact our results of operations, cash flows and financial
position, the current level of uncertainty over the economic and operational impacts of COVID-19 means the related financial impact
cannot be reasonably estimated at this time. For further discussion of the risks relating to this matter, refer to Risk Factors in this Part
I, Item 1A of this report.
Tabular presentation of our active recycling and steel facilities by geographic region and segment is as follows:
 
  Auto Parts
Stores  Metals
Recycling
Facilities(1)  Total
Recycling
Facilities  Large-Scale
Shredders(2)  Deep
Water
Ports  Steel
Facilities(3)  Segment
Northwest   7    3    10    1    1    —   AMR
(WA, OR, MT)   —    5    5    1    1    1   CSS
Southwest and Hawaii   22    7    29    2    2    —   AMR
(CA, NV, UT, HI)   —    —    —    —    —    1   CSS
Midwest and South
(AR, IL, IN, OH, MO, KS,
TX)   13    —    13    —    —    —   AMR
Northeast
(MA, ME, NH, RI)   2    9    11    1    2    —   AMR
Southeast and Puerto
Rico
(GA, AL, TN, FL, VA, PR)  2    16    18    1    1    —   AMR
Western Canada
(BC, AB)   4    4    8    —    —    —   AMR
Total   50    44    94    6    7    2    
 
(1)Excludes joint venture facilities.
(2)All large-scale shredding operations employ nonferrous extraction and separation equipment.
(3)Includes one steel mini-mill in Oregon and one distribution center in California.
3 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
AMR
Business
AMR sells ferrous and nonferrous recycled scrap metal in both foreign and domestic markets. AMR acquires, processes and recycles
auto bodies, rail cars, home appliances, industrial machinery, manufacturing scrap and construction and demolition scrap through its
89 auto and metals recycling facilities. Our largest source of auto bodies is our own network of retail auto parts stores, which operate
under the commercial brand-name Pick-n-Pull. AMR procures salvaged vehicles and sells serviceable used auto parts from these
vehicles through its 50 self-service auto parts stores located across the U.S. and Western Canada. Upon acquiring a salvaged vehicle,
we remove catalytic converters, aluminum wheels and batteries for separate processing and sale prior to placing the vehicle in our
retail lot. After retail customers have removed desired parts from a vehicle, we may remove remaining major component parts
containing ferrous and nonferrous metals, which are primarily sold to wholesalers. The remaining auto bodies are crushed and
shipped to our metals recycling facilities to be shredded or sold to third parties where geographically more economical.
AMR processes mixed and large pieces of scrap metal into smaller pieces by crushing, torching, shearing, shredding and sorting,
resulting in scrap metal pieces of a size, density and metal content required by customers to meet their production needs. The
manufacturing process includes physical separation of ferrous and nonferrous materials through automated and manual processes
into various sub-classifications, each of which has a value and metal content used by our customers for their end products. One of
the most efficient ways to process and sort recycled scrap metal is through the use of shredding and separation systems.
AMR operates six deep water port locations, five of which are equipped with large-scale shredders. AMR’s largest port facilities in
Everett, Massachusetts; Oakland, California; and Tacoma, Washington each operate a mega-shredder with 7,000 to 9,000
horsepower. Our port facilities in Salinas, Puerto Rico and Kapolei, Hawaii each operate a shredder with 1,500 and 4,000
horsepower, respectively. Our port facility in Providence, Rhode Island does not operate a shredder, but exports ferrous recycled
scrap metal acquired in the regional market. Our shredders are designed to provide a denser product and, in conjunction with
advanced separation equipment, a more refined form of ferrous scrap metal which is used efficiently by steel mills in the production
of new steel. The shredding process reduces auto bodies and other scrap metal into fist-size pieces of shredded recycled scrap metal.
The shredded material is then carried by conveyor under magnetized drums that attract the ferrous scrap metal and separate it from
the mixed nonferrous scrap metal and other residue, resulting in a consistent and high-quality shredded ferrous product. The mixed
nonferrous scrap metal and residue then pass through a series of additional mechanical sorting systems designed to separate the
nonferrous metal from the residue.
The remaining mixed nonferrous metal is then further sorted by product and size grade before being sold as joint products, which
include zorba (primarily aluminum), zurik (primarily stainless steel) and shredded insulated wire (primarily copper and aluminum).
AMR invests in nonferrous metal extraction and separation technologies in order to maximize the recoverability of valuable
nonferrous metal and to meet the metal purity requirements of customers. AMR has a major strategic initiative currently underway to
replace, upgrade and add to its existing nonferrous metal recovery technologies that is expected to increase metal recovery yields,
provide for additional product optionality and create higher quality furnace-ready products. The rollout of these new technologies is
anticipated to be completed in fiscal 2021, with total capital expenditures estimated to be $100 million, of which $41 million has
been incurred, including $29 million during fiscal 2020. AMR also purchases nonferrous metal directly from industrial vendors and
other suppliers and aggregates and prepares this metal for shipment to customers by ship, rail or truck.
In addition to the sale of recycled metal products processed at our facilities, AMR also brokers the sale of ferrous and nonferrous
scrap metal generated by industrial entities and demolition projects to customers in the domestic market.
Products and Services
AMR’s primary products consist of recycled ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal. Ferrous recycled scrap metal is a key feedstock
used in the production of finished steel and is largely categorized into heavy melting steel (“HMS”), plate and structural (“bonus”)
and shredded scrap (“shred”), although there are various grades of each category depending on metal content and the size and
consistency of individual pieces. These attributes affect the product’s relative value. Our nonferrous products include mixed metal
joint products recovered from the shredding process, such as zorba, zurik and shredded insulated wire, as well as aluminum, copper,
stainless steel, nickel, brass, titanium, lead, and high temperature alloys. We also sell catalytic converters to specialty processors that
extract the nonferrous precious metals including platinum, palladium and rhodium.
Prior to the shredding process, AMR sells serviceable used auto parts from salvaged vehicles through its self-service auto parts stores
located across the U.S. and Western Canada. Each retail self-service store offers an extensive selection of vehicles (including
domestic and foreign cars, vans and light trucks) from which customers can remove and purchase parts. We employ proprietary
information technology systems to centrally manage and operate the geographically diverse network of auto parts stores, and we
regularly rotate the
4 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
inventory to provide customers with greater access to parts. In general, we believe the list prices of auto parts at our self-service
stores are significantly lower than those offered at full-service auto dismantlers, retail car parts stores and car dealerships.
AMR enters into limited duration contracts with public entities and other third parties for vehicle dismantling and asset recovery
services, which provide a source of low-cost salvage vehicles. In addition, AMR provides recycling services for scrap metal and
other recyclable materials to a range of customers, including large retailers, industrial manufacturers, original equipment
manufacturers and owners of end-of-life railcars.
Customers
AMR sells its ferrous and nonferrous recycled metal products globally to steel mills, foundries, refineries, smelters, wholesalers and
other recycled metal processors. AMR’s self-service auto parts stores also serve retail customers seeking to obtain serviceable used
auto parts at a competitive price. Retail customers remove the parts without the assistance of store employees and pay a listed price
for the part. AMR also supplies a small portion of its scrap metal to CSS’s shredding operation in Portland, Oregon, the substantial
majority of which is processed and delivered to CSS’s steel mill.
Presented below are AMR revenues by continent for the last three fiscal years ended August 31 (dollars in thousands):
 
  2020   % of
Revenue  2019   % of
Revenue  2018   % of
Revenue 
North America(1)  $ 507,637   39% $ 664,308   40% $ 736,494   39%
Asia   527,765   41%  767,670   46%  834,038   44%
Europe(2)   253,107   19%  206,851   12%  298,725   16%
South America   14,984   1%  42,084   3%  25,277   1%
Africa   4,319   —%  4,064   —%  14,432   1%
Intercompany sales to CSS   (7,634)  (1)%  (11,612)  (1)%  (24,892)  (1)%
Total (net of intercompany) $1,300,178      $1,673,365      $1,884,074    
 
 
(1)Includes intercompany sales to CSS.
(2)Includes sales to customers in Turkey.
In fiscal 2020, the five countries from which AMR derived its largest revenues from external customers were the United States,
Turkey, Bangladesh, South Korea and India which collectively accounted for 80% of total AMR external revenues. In fiscal 2019
and 2018, the five countries from which AMR derived its largest revenues from external customers accounted for 76% and 75%,
respectively, of total AMR external revenues. We generally attribute revenues from external customers to individual countries based
on the country in which the customer is located.
AMR’s five largest external ferrous scrap metal customers accounted for 45% of external recycled ferrous metal revenues in fiscal
2020, compared to 37% and 33% in fiscal 2019 and 2018, respectively. AMR had no external customers that accounted for 10% or
more of consolidated revenues in fiscal 2020, 2019 or 2018.
Total sales volumes of ferrous scrap metal vary from year-to-year due to the level of demand, availability of supply, general
economic conditions, infrastructure spending, relative currency values, availability of credit and other factors. Ferrous scrap metal
sales are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars, and nearly all of our large shipments of ferrous scrap metal to foreign customers
have historically been supported by letters of credit.
The table below sets forth, on a revenue and volume basis, the amount of recycled ferrous scrap metal sold by AMR to foreign and
domestic customers, including sales to CSS, during the last three fiscal years ended August 31:
 
Ferrous Recycled Metal  2020   2019   2018  
  Revenues(1)  Volume(2)  Revenues(1)  Volume(2)  Revenues(1)  Volume(2) 
Foreign  $ 652,901   2,379  $ 824,596   2,475  $ 959,001   2,623 
Domestic   172,415   993   298,584   1,265   329,286   1,085 
Total  $ 825,316   3,372  $1,123,180   3,740  $1,288,287   3,708
 
 
(1)Revenues stated in thousands of dollars.
(2)Volume stated in thousands of long tons (one long ton = 2,240 pounds).
5 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
The table below sets forth, on a revenue and volume basis, the amount of recycled nonferrous scrap metal sold by AMR to foreign
and domestic customers during the last three fiscal years ended August 31:
 
Nonferrous Recycled Metal 2020   2019   2018  
  Revenues(1)  Volume(2)  Revenues(1)  Volume(2)  Revenues(1)  Volume(2) 
Foreign  $ 167,271   307,636  $ 222,752   363,096  $ 264,628   357,389 
Domestic   193,037   189,872   207,609   245,198   217,149   214,316 
Total  $ 360,308   497,508  $ 430,361   608,294  $ 481,777   571,705
 
 
(1)Revenues stated in thousands of dollars.
(2)Volume stated in thousands of pounds and volume information excludes platinum-group metals (“PGMs”) in catalytic converters.
AMR’s retail auto parts sales accounted for less than 10% of SSI’s consolidated revenues in each of the periods presented.
Pricing
Domestic and foreign prices for ferrous and nonferrous recycled scrap metal are generally based on prevailing market rates, which
differ by region, and are subject to market cycles that are influenced by worldwide demand from steel and other metal producers as
well as by the availability of materials that can be processed into saleable scrap metal, among other factors. Sanctions and trade
actions, including tariffs, quotas and restrictions or bans on access to certain markets, and licensing and inspection requirements can
also impact pricing for the affected products. Ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal sales contracts generally provide for shipment
within 30 to 60 days after the price is agreed to which, in most cases, includes freight.
AMR responds to changes in selling prices for processed metal by seeking to adjust purchase prices for unprocessed scrap metal in
order to manage the impact on its operating income. The spread between selling prices and the cost of purchased scrap metal (metal
spread) is subject to a number of factors, including differences in the market conditions between the domestic regions where scrap
metal is acquired and the areas in the world to which the processed metals are sold, market volatility from the time the selling price
is agreed upon with the customer until the time the scrap metal is purchased, and changes in transportation costs. We believe AMR
generally benefits from sustained periods of stable or rising recycled scrap metal selling prices, which allow it to better maintain or
increase both operating income and unprocessed scrap metal flow into its facilities. When recycled scrap metal selling prices decline,
either sharply or for a sustained period, AMR’s operating margins typically compress.
The sales prices for auto parts from salvaged vehicles are deeply discounted from prevailing national new and refurbished sales
prices offered at full-service auto dismantlers, retail auto parts stores and car dealerships. Our stores provide a list price, available at
each location and online. Prices for auto bodies sold to third parties and for major component parts, such as engines, transmissions
and alternators sold to wholesalers, are based on prevailing scrap market rates which differ by region and are subject to market
cycles. Prices for catalytic converters sold to third party processors are based on prevailing market rates for the extracted precious
metals including platinum, palladium and rhodium. By consolidating shipments of auto bodies and component parts, we are able to
optimize prices by focusing on larger wholesale customers that pay a premium for volume and consistency of shipments.
Markets
Global production of finished steel products drives demand for materials used in the steel-making process, including ferrous recycled
scrap metal which is the primary feedstock used in EAFs and can also be used in blast furnaces to manufacture steel. AMR exports
ferrous recycled scrap metal primarily to countries in Asia, the Mediterranean region and North, Central and South America. Ferrous
exports made up 71%, 66% and 71% of AMR’s total ferrous sales volume in fiscal 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. We believe
long-term demand for recycled metals will continue to be driven by factors including global economic growth and an increased focus
on environmental policies promoting natural resource conservation, lower greenhouse gas emissions and lower energy costs. We
believe the significant environmental benefits and production efficiencies associated with EAF steel-making, which uses scrap metal
as a primary raw material, compared to blast furnace steel-making, which primarily uses iron ore mined from natural resources, will
positively contribute to worldwide long-term demand for ferrous recycled scrap metal.
6 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Nonferrous exports made up 62%, 60% and 63% of AMR’s total nonferrous sales volumes in fiscal 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively. The substantial majority of AMR’s nonferrous joint products recovered from the shredding process are sold to the
export market and comprise approximately 45% of AMR’s total nonferrous sales volumes. China had historically been the primary
destination for our nonferrous exports, representing 64% of AMR’s total nonferrous export sales volumes in fiscal 2018. Since then,
concentration of AMR’s combined nonferrous exports to countries in Asia other than China and to Europe has significantly
increased, primarily in response to new regulations, increased inspection and licensing requirements, import quotas and tariffs on
U.S. scrap imports put in place by China beginning in fiscal 2018. In fiscal 2020 and 2019, 13% and 39%, respectively, of AMR’s
total nonferrous export sales volumes were to China.
Distribution
AMR delivers recycled ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal to foreign customers by ship and to domestic customers by barge, rail and
road transportation networks. Cost efficiencies are achieved by operating deep water terminal facilities in Everett, Massachusetts;
Oakland, California; Tacoma, Washington; and Providence, Rhode Island, all of which are owned, except for the Providence, Rhode
Island facility which is operated under a long-term lease. We also have access to deep water terminal facilities at Kapolei, Hawaii
and Salinas, Puerto Rico through public docks. The use of deep water terminals enables us to load ferrous material in large vessels
capable of holding up to 50,000 tons for trans-oceanic shipments. We believe the use of our owned and leased terminal facilities is
advantageous because it allows us to more effectively manage loading costs and minimize the berthing delays often experienced by
users of unaffiliated terminals. From time to time, AMR may enter into contracts of affreightment, which guarantee the availability
of ocean going vessels, in order to manage the risks associated with ship availability and freight costs.
Our nonferrous products are shipped in 20- to 30-ton capacity containers from ports and rail ramps located in close proximity to our
recycling facilities. Containerized shipments are exported by marine vessels to customers globally, and domestic shipments are
typically shipped to customers by rail or by truck.
AMR sells used auto parts from its self-service retail stores. Both before and after retail customers have removed desired parts from
acquired salvaged vehicles, we extract and consolidate certain valuable ferrous and nonferrous components from auto bodies for
shipment by truck primarily to wholesale customers. We also remove and collect catalytic converters from salvaged vehicles for
shipment by truck to specialty processers which extract the nonferrous precious metals. The salvaged auto bodies are crushed and
shipped by truck to our metals recycling facilities where geographically feasible, or to third party recyclers, for shredding.
Sources of Unprocessed Metal
The most common forms of purchased unprocessed metal are obsolete machinery and equipment, such as automobiles, railroad cars,
railroad tracks, home appliances and other consumer goods, scrap metal from manufacturing operations and retailers and demolition
metal from buildings and other infrastructure. Unprocessed metal is acquired from a diverse base of suppliers who unload at our
facilities, from drop boxes at suppliers’ industrial sites, and through negotiated purchases from other large suppliers, including
railroads, manufacturers, automobile salvage facilities, metal dealers, various government entities and individuals. We typically seek
to locate our retail auto parts stores in major population centers with convenient road access. Our auto parts store network spans 15
states in the U.S. and two provinces in Western Canada, with a majority of the stores concentrated in regions where our large
shredders are located. Through our network of auto parts stores, we seek to obtain salvaged vehicles from five primary sources:
private parties, tow companies, charities, auto auctions and municipal and other contracts. AMR has a program to purchase vehicles
from private parties called “Cash for Junk Cars” which is advertised in local markets. Private parties either call a toll-free number
and receive a quote for their vehicle or obtain an instant online quote. The private party can either deliver the vehicle to one of our
retail locations or arrange for the vehicle to be picked up. AMR also employs car buyers who travel to vendors and bid on vehicles.
Further, AMR enters into limited duration contracts with public entities and other third parties for vehicle dismantling and asset
recovery services, which provide a source of low-cost salvage vehicles. The expiration of such contracts may lead us to seek
alternative sources of vehicles, potentially at a higher cost. AMR also sources scrap metal and other recyclable materials through its
recycling services from a range of customers including large retailers, industrial manufacturers, original equipment manufacturers
and railcar owners.
7 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
The majority of AMR’s scrap metal collection and processing facilities receive unprocessed metal via major railroad routes,
waterways or highways. Metals recycling facilities situated near industrial manufacturing and major transportation routes have the
competitive advantage of reduced freight costs because of the significant cost of freight relative to the cost of metal. The locations of
AMR’s West Coast facilities provide access to sources of unprocessed metal in the Northern California region, northward to Western
Canada and Alaska, and to the East, including Idaho, Montana, Utah, Colorado and Nevada. The locations of the East Coast facilities
provide access to sources of unprocessed metal in New York, Connecticut, Maine, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, Rhode Island,
Vermont, Eastern Canada and, from time to time, the Midwest. In the Southeastern U.S., approximately half of AMR’s ferrous and
nonferrous unprocessed metal volume is purchased from industrial companies, including auto manufacturers, with the remaining
volume being purchased from smaller dealers and individuals. These industrial companies provide AMR with metals that are by-
products of their manufacturing processes.
The supply of scrap metal from these various sources can fluctuate with the level of economic activity in the U.S. and can be
sensitive to variability in scrap metal prices, particularly in the short term. The supply of scrap metal can also fluctuate, to a lesser
degree, due to seasonal factors, such as severe weather conditions, which can inhibit scrap metal collections at our facilities and
production levels in our yards. Severe weather conditions can also adversely impact the timing of shipments of our products, the
level of manufacturing activity utilizing our products, and retail admissions at our auto parts stores.
Backlog
As of September 30, 2020, AMR had a backlog of orders to sell $97 million of export ferrous metal compared to $104 million at the
same time in the prior year primarily due to the timing of sales and relative selling prices. Additionally, as of September 30, 2020,
AMR had a backlog of orders to sell $36 million of export nonferrous metal compared to $28 million at the same time in the prior
year primarily due to the timing of sales. We expect to fill the entirety of the backlog of orders for export ferrous and nonferrous
metal during fiscal 2021.
Competition
AMR competes in the U.S. and in Western Canada for the purchase of scrap metal with large, well-financed recyclers of scrap metal,
steel mills that own scrap yards, and with smaller metals facilities and dealers. AMR’s auto stores compete for the purchase of end-
of-life vehicles with other auto dismantlers, used car dealers, auto auctions and metals recyclers. In general, the competitive factors
impacting the purchase of scrap metal and end-of-life vehicles are the price offered by the purchaser, the proximity of the purchaser
to the source of scrap metal and end-of-life vehicles, and the purchaser’s ability to efficiently collect the scrap metal and end-of-life
vehicles from certain suppliers’ locations. AMR also competes with brokers that buy scrap metal on behalf of domestic and foreign
steel mills.
Demand for AMR’s products is cyclical in nature and sensitive to general economic conditions and other factors. AMR competes
globally for the sale of processed recycled metal to finished steel and other metal product producers. The predominant competitive
factors that impact recycled metal sales are price (including duties and shipping cost), reliability of service, product quality, the
relative value of the U.S. dollar and the availability and price of raw material alternatives, including scrap metal substitutes such as
pig iron and direct-reduced iron (both derived from iron ore), and semi-finished products, such as steel billets. Our ability to compete
in certain export markets may be impacted by sanctions and trade actions, such as tariffs, quotas and other import restrictions, and by
licensing and inspection requirements. Such restrictions may require us to perform additional processing and packaging of certain
nonferrous recycled scrap metal products, as well as engage in increased inspection and certification activities, in order to continue
selling into the affected markets.
AMR also competes for the sale of used auto parts to retail customers with other self-service and full-service auto dismantlers. The
auto parts industry is characterized by diverse and fragmented competition and comprises a large number of aftermarket and used
auto parts suppliers of all sizes, ranging from large, multinational corporations which serve both original equipment manufacturers
and the aftermarket on a worldwide basis to small, local entities which have more limited supply. The main competitive factors
impacting the retail sale of auto parts are price, availability and visibility of product, quality and convenience of the retail stores to
customers.
AMR’s ability to process substantial volumes of scrap metal products, advanced processing equipment, number and geographic
dispersion of locations, access to a variety of different modes of transportation, and the operating synergies of its integrated platform
provide its business with the ability to compete successfully in varying market conditions.
8 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
CSS
Business
CSS operates a steel mini-mill in McMinnville, Oregon that produces a range of finished steel long products such as reinforcing bar
(rebar) and wire rod. The primary feedstock for the manufacture of its products is ferrous recycled scrap metal. CSS’s steel mill
obtains substantially all of its scrap metal raw material requirements from its integrated metals recycling and joint venture
operations. CSS’s metals recycling operations comprise a collection, shredding and export operation in Portland, Oregon, four feeder
yard operations located in Oregon and Southern Washington, and one metals recycling joint venture ownership interest. Additionally,
CSS purchases small volumes of ferrous scrap metal from AMR and sells ferrous and nonferrous recycled scrap metal primarily into
the export market. CSS’s revenues from external sales of recycled scrap metal account for less than 10% of SSI’s consolidated
revenues in each of the periods presented.
Manufacturing
CSS’s melt shop includes an EAF, a ladle refining furnace with enhanced steel chemistry refining capabilities, and a five-strand
continuous billet caster, permitting the mill to produce special alloy grades of steel not currently produced by other mills on the West
Coast of the U.S. The melt shop produced 519 thousand, 537 thousand and 561 thousand short tons of steel in the form of billets
during fiscal 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. The substantial majority of these billets are reheated in a natural gas-fueled furnace
and are then hot-rolled through the rolling mill to produce finished steel products. The rolling mill has an effective annual production
capacity under current conditions of approximately 580 thousand tons of finished steel products.
Our steel mill has an operating permit issued under Title V of the Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990, which governs certain air
quality standards. The permit is based on an annual production capacity of approximately 950 thousand tons. The permit was first
issued in 1998 and has since been renewed multiple times, most recently in April 2020 extending the permit through April 1, 2025.
Products
CSS produces semi-finished goods (billets) and finished goods, consisting of rebar, coiled rebar, wire rod, merchant bar and other
specialty products. Semi-finished goods are predominantly used for CSS’s finished products, but also have been produced for sale to
other steel mills. Rebar is produced in either straight length steel bars or coils and used to increase the strength of poured concrete.
Coiled rebar is preferred by some manufacturers because it reduces the waste generated by cutting individual lengths to meet
customer specifications and, therefore, improves yield. Wire rod is steel rod, delivered in coiled form, used by manufacturers to
produce a variety of products such as chain link fencing, nails, wire, stucco netting, and pre-stressed concrete strand. Merchant bar
consists of rounds and square steel bars used by manufacturers to produce a wide variety of products, including bolts, threaded bars,
and dowel bars. CSS is also an approved supplier of high-quality rebar to support nuclear power plant construction and has a license
to produce certain patented high-strength specialty steels. CSS monitors the market for new products in order to identify
opportunities to expand its product lines and sales.
The table below sets forth, on a revenue and volume basis, the amount of finished steel products sold by CSS during the last three
fiscal years ended August 31:
 
  2020   2019   2018  
  Revenues(1)  Volume(2)  Revenues(1)  Volume(2)  Revenues(1)  Volume(2) 
Finished steel products  $ 336,899   504,967  $ 358,851   477,511  $ 363,849   519,162
 
 
(1)Revenues stated in thousands of dollars.
(2)Volume stated in short tons (one short ton = 2,000 pounds).
The metals recycling operations within CSS produce substantially the same recycled scrap metal products as those produced by the
metals recycling operations within AMR and are exposed to similar market and competitive forces.
9 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Customers
CSS’s finished steel customers are primarily steel service centers, construction industry subcontractors, steel fabricators, wire
drawers and major farm and wood products suppliers. During fiscal 2020, CSS sold its finished steel products to customers located
primarily in the Western U.S. and Western Canada. Customers in California accounted for 55%, 54% and 48% of CSS’s steel
revenues in fiscal 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. CSS’s ten largest steel customers accounted for 51%, 49% and 46% of its steel
revenues during fiscal 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. No CSS steel customer accounted for 10% or more of SSI’s consolidated
revenues in fiscal 2020, 2019 or 2018.
The metals recycling operations within CSS also sell ferrous and nonferrous recycled metal products to external customers
comprising primarily steel mills, foundries, refineries, smelters and other recycled metal processors in Asia.
Pricing
CSS’s finished steel product prices differ by product size and grade. Selling prices are influenced by the price of raw materials,
including the cost of recycled ferrous scrap metal and required consumables including graphite electrodes and alloys, as well as
regional demand in the West Coast market. Selling prices for our finished steel products may also be affected by the price and
availability of steel imports.
Distribution
CSS sells finished steel products directly from its mini-mill in McMinnville, Oregon and its owned distribution center in City of
Industry, California (Los Angeles area). Finished steel products are shipped from the mini-mill to the distribution center primarily by
rail. The distribution center facilitates sales by maintaining an inventory of products close to major customers for just-in-time
delivery. CSS communicates regularly with major customers to determine their anticipated needs and plans its rolling mill
production schedule accordingly. Finished steel shipments to customers are made by common carrier, primarily truck or rail.
CSS delivers recycled ferrous scrap metal to export customers by bulk ship using its deep water terminal facility in Portland,
Oregon, and nonferrous recycled scrap metal to export customers in containers by ship.
Supply of Scrap Metal
We believe CSS operates the only mini-mill in the Western U.S. that obtains its scrap metal requirements from an integrated metals
recycler. CSS’s metals recycling operations provide its steel mill with a mix of recycled metal grades, which allows the mill to
achieve optimum efficiency in its melting operations.
Energy Supply
CSS needs electricity to run its steel manufacturing operations, primarily its EAF. CSS purchases electricity under a long-term
contract with McMinnville Water & Light (“MW&L”), which in turn relies on the Bonneville Power Administration. We entered into
our current contract with MW&L in October 2011 that will expire in September 2028.
CSS’s steel manufacturing operations also need natural gas to run its reheat furnace, which is used to reheat billets prior to running
them through the rolling mill. CSS meets this demand through a natural gas agreement with a utility provider that obligates CSS at
each month-end to purchase a volume of gas based on its projected needs for the immediately subsequent month on a take-or-pay
basis priced using published natural gas indices.
Energy costs represented 5% of CSS’s cost of goods sold in each of fiscal 2020 and 2019, and 4% in fiscal 2018.
Backlog
As of September 30, 2020 and 2019, CSS had a backlog of finished steel orders of $21 million and $14 million, respectively. We
expect to fill the entirety of the backlog of orders for finished steel products during fiscal 2021.
Competition
The primary domestic competitors of CSS for the sale of finished steel products include Nucor Corporation’s manufacturing
facilities in Arizona, Utah and Washington, and Commercial Metals Company’s manufacturing facilities in Arizona and California.
In addition to domestic competition, CSS competes with foreign steel producers, principally located in Asia, Canada, Mexico and
Central and South America, primarily in shorter length rebar and certain wire rod grades. The principal competitive factors in CSS’s
market are price, quality, service, product availability and the relative value of the U.S. dollar.
10 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
For more than a decade, CSS’s steel manufacturing operation, as part of a U.S. industry coalition, petitioned the U.S. Government
under our international trade laws for relief in the form of antidumping and countervailing duties against wire rod and rebar products
from a number of foreign countries. Many of those cases were successful and led to a decrease in finished steel imports into CSS’s
domestic markets from the peak reached in fiscal 2016. During fiscal 2020, antidumping duty orders were in effect related to imports
of rebar from Belarus, China, Indonesia, Japan, Latvia, Mexico, Moldova, Poland, Taiwan, Turkey and Ukraine; a countervailing
duty order was in effect related to imports of rebar from Turkey; antidumping duty orders were in effect related to imports of wire
rod from Belarus, Brazil, China, Indonesia, Italy, Korea, Mexico, Moldova, Russia, South Africa, Spain, Ukraine, United Arab
Emirates, the United Kingdom, Trinidad and Tobago and Turkey; and countervailing duty orders were in effect related to imports of
wire rod from Brazil, China, Italy and Turkey.
The duties imposed as part of these orders are periodically reassessed through the administrative review process. In addition, every
five years the U.S. Government conducts sunset reviews to determine whether revocation of the orders would likely lead to
resumption of dumping and subsidization and negatively impact the U.S. domestic industry. Affirmative decisions allow the orders
to continue for an additional five years. The sunset review for rebar from Belarus, China, Indonesia, Latvia, Moldova, Poland and
Ukraine was initiated in June 2018, and, following an affirmative decision in October 2018, orders covering these countries remain
in place for another five years. The first sunset review covering rebar from Mexico and Turkey (from the 2014 investigation)
commenced in October 2019, and, following an affirmative decision in September 2020, orders covering these countries remain in
place for another five years. The third sunset review covering wire rod from Brazil, Indonesia, Mexico, Moldova and Trinidad and
Tobago, was initiated in June 2019, and, following an affirmative decision in July 2020, orders covering these countries remain in
place for another five years.
There are antidumping and countervailing duty orders in effect in Canada covering rebar from Belarus, China, Chinese Taipei
(Taiwan), Hong Kong, Japan, South Korea, Portugal, Spain and Turkey that we expect will continue to lead to a reduction in the
volume of imports into Canada from these countries.
The long-term effectiveness of existing antidumping and countervailing duty orders related to imports of wire rod and rebar products
is largely uncertain and is impacted by the U.S. Government’s ability to efficiently identify and respond to violations of U.S.
international trade laws affecting CSS’s steel manufacturing operations.
In March 2018, the President of the United States imposed tariffs in the amount of 25 percent and 10 percent on imports of certain
steel and aluminum products, respectively. The imposition of the tariffs was the conclusion of an investigation started in April 2017
under Section 232 of the Trade Expansion Act of 1962 that allows for an exemption from normal international trade rules if imports
of a product are harming national security. Currently, imports from Argentina, Australia, Brazil and South Korea are exempt from
these duties pursuant to various agreements, including quotas. Further, while the President of the United States initially imposed an
additional 25% tariff on imports from Turkey, that order was rescinded in May 2019. Also, in May 2019, the President announced an
agreement with Canada and Mexico that eliminated the Section 232 tariffs on steel from those countries. As part of the agreement,
Canada and Mexico also suspended their retaliatory duties on U.S. imports. The elimination of the 25% duty on U.S.-origin steel
imports into Canada has allowed CSS to resume shipping steel to Western Canada. Sales of finished steel products to customers in
Canada represented 6%, 3%, and 7% of our steel mill’s external sales in fiscal 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively. The European
Union continues to impose retaliatory duties on U.S.-origin steel imports. The Department of Commerce also implemented an
exclusion process whereby U.S. entities can request that certain products be excluded from the Section 232 tariffs. CSS reviews any
exclusion requests relevant to its product line to determine whether an objection might be appropriate.
 
Environmental Matters
Impact of Legislation and Regulation
Compliance with environmental laws and regulations is a significant factor in our operations. Our businesses are subject to extensive
local, state and federal environmental protection, health, safety and transportation laws and regulations relating to, among others:
 •Remediation under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act (“CERCLA”);
 •The discharge of materials and emissions into the air;
 •The prevention and remediation of soil and groundwater contamination;
 •The management, treatment and discharge of wastewater and storm water;
 •Climate change;
 •The generation, discharge, storage, handling and disposal of hazardous materials and secondary materials; and
 •The protection of our employees’ health and safety.
11 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
These environmental laws regulate, among other things, the release and discharge of hazardous materials into the air, water and
ground; exposure to hazardous materials; and the identification, storage, treatment, handling and disposal of hazardous materials.
Concern over climate change, including the impact of global warming, has led to significant U.S. and international regulatory and
legislative initiatives to limit greenhouse gas (“GHG”) emissions. In 2007, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that the United States
Environmental Protection Agency (“EPA”) was authorized to regulate carbon dioxide under the U.S. Clean Air Act. The EPA
subsequently initiated a series of regulatory efforts aimed at addressing GHGs as pollutants, including finding that GHG emissions
endanger public health, implementing mandatory GHG emission reporting requirements, and setting carbon emission standards for
light-duty vehicles.
Environmental legislation and regulations have changed rapidly in recent years, and it is likely that we will be subject to even more
stringent environmental standards in the future. Legislation has been proposed in the U.S. Congress to address GHG emissions and
global climate change, including “cap and trade” programs, and some form of federal climate change legislation or additional federal
regulation is possible. A number of states, including states in which we have operations and facilities, have considered, are
considering or have already enacted legislation or executive action to develop information or address climate change and GHG
emissions, including state-level “cap and trade” programs. Currently, we are required to annually report GHG emissions from our
steel mill to the State of Oregon Department of Environmental Quality and the EPA, and in March 2020, the Governor of Oregon
issued an executive order directing state agencies to take certain actions to reduce and regulate GHG emissions including
development of a “cap and reduce” program that would cover large stationary sources.
Although our objective is to maintain compliance with applicable environmental laws and regulations, we have, in the past, been
found to be not in compliance with certain environmental laws and regulations and have incurred liabilities, expenditures, fines and
penalties associated with such violations. In December 2000, we were notified by the EPA that we are one of the potentially
responsible parties that owns or operates, or formerly owned or operated, sites which are part of or adjacent to the Portland Harbor
Superfund site. Further, we have been notified that we are or may be a potentially responsible party at sites other than Portland
Harbor currently or formerly owned or operated by us or at other sites where we may have responsibility for such costs due to past
disposal or other activities. See discussion in Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors and Note 9 - Commitments and Contingencies in the
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
In fiscal 2020, capital expenditures related to environmental projects were $10 million, and we expect to spend in the range of $24
million on capital expenditures related to environmental projects in fiscal 2021.
Indirect Consequences of Future Legislation and Regulation
Future legislation or increased regulation regarding climate change and GHG emissions could impose significant costs on our
business and our customers and suppliers, including increased energy, capital equipment, emissions controls, environmental
monitoring and reporting and other costs in order to comply with laws and regulations concerning and limitations imposed on
climate change and GHG emissions. The potential costs of allowances, taxes, fees, offsets or credits that may be part of “cap and
trade” programs or similar future legislative or regulatory measures are still uncertain, and the future of these programs or measures
is unknown. Any adopted future climate change and GHG laws or regulations could negatively impact our ability (and that of our
customers and suppliers) to compete with companies situated in areas not subject to or complying with such requirements.
Furthermore, even without such laws or regulations, increased awareness and any adverse publicity in the global marketplace about
the GHGs emitted by companies in the metals recycling and steel manufacturing industries could harm our reputation and reduce
customer demand for our products.
GHG legislation and regulation is expected to have an effect on the future price of electricity, especially electricity generated using
carbon-based fuels. Since the electricity supply for CSS includes a significant element of hydro-generated production which is not
subject to GHG legislation and regulation, CSS’s energy costs are less likely to be impacted than those of competitors using
electricity generated by carbon-based fuels. In addition, demand for scrap metal may increase from mills with blast furnaces as they
seek to maximize the scrap metal component of raw material infeed, which requires less energy than melting iron ore.
Since the use of recycled iron and steel instead of iron ore to make new steel results in savings in the consumption of energy, virgin
materials and water and reduces mining wastes, we believe our recycled metal products position us to be more competitive in the
future for business from companies wishing to reduce their carbon footprint and impact on the environment. In addition, the EAF at
our steel mill generates significantly less GHG emissions than traditional blast furnaces.
12 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Physical Impacts of Climate Change on Our Costs and Operations
There has been public discussion that climate change may be associated with higher temperatures, lower snowpack, drier forests,
rising sea levels as well as extreme weather events and conditions such as more intense hurricanes, thunderstorms, tornadoes,
wildfires and snow or ice storms. Extreme weather conditions may increase our costs or cause damage to our facilities, and any
damage resulting from extreme weather may not be fully insured. As many of our recycling facilities are located near deep water
ports, rising sea levels may disrupt our ability to receive scrap metal, process the scrap metal through our shredders and ship
products to our customers. Periods of extended adverse weather conditions may inhibit construction activity utilizing our products,
scrap metal inflows to our recycling facilities, and retail admissions and parts sales at our auto parts stores. Potential adverse impacts
from climate change, including rising temperatures and extreme weather events and conditions, may create health and safety issues
for employees operating at our facilities and may lead to an inability to maintain standard operating hours.
Employees
As of September 30, 2020, we had 3,032 full-time employees, consisting of 2,259 employees at AMR, 576 employees at CSS and
197 corporate administrative and shared services employees. Of these employees, 688 were covered by collective bargaining
agreements. The Cascade Steel Rolling Mills contract with the United Steelworkers of America, which covers 284 of these
employees, was renewed and ratified in October 2019 and will expire on March 31, 2022. We believe that in general our labor
relations are good.
Executive Officers of the Company
The executive officers of the Company are elected each year at the organizational meeting of the Board of Directors, which follows
the annual meeting of the shareholders, and at other Board of Directors meetings, as appropriate. Each of the executive officers has
been employed by the Company for more than five years.
At October 22, 2020, the executive officers of the Company were as follows:
 
Name  Age Office
Tamara L. Lundgren  63  Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer(1)
Richard D. Peach  57  Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Chief Strategy Officer(2)
Michael R. Henderson  61  Senior Vice President and President, Operations(3)
Steven G. Heiskell  51  Senior Vice President and President, Recycling Products & Services(4)
Peter B. Saba  59  Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary(5)
Erich D. Wilson  52  Senior Vice President, Chief Human Resources Officer, and Chief of Corporate
Operations(6)
Stefano R. Gaggini  49  Vice President, Deputy Chief Financial Officer and Chief Accounting Officer(7)
 
(1)Ms. Lundgren was appointed President and Chief Executive Officer in December 2008 and also was appointed Chairman of the Board of Directors in March
2020.
(2)Mr. Peach was appointed Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer in December 2007. Mr. Peach also served as Chief of Corporate Operations from
September 2016 until March 2020 and was appointed Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Chief Strategy Officer in March 2020.
(3)Mr. Henderson served as Senior Vice President and Co-President of the Auto and Metals Recycling business from April 2015 until March 2020, and also served
as Co-President of the Cascade Steel and Scrap business from June 2017 until March 2020. Mr. Henderson was appointed Senior Vice President and President,
Operations in March 2020.
(4)Mr. Heiskell served as Senior Vice President and Co-President of the Auto and Metals Recycling business from April 2015 until March 2020. Mr. Heiskell was
appointed Senior Vice President and President, Recycling Products & Services in March 2020.
(5)Mr. Saba was appointed Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary in July 2015.
(6)Mr. Wilson served as Director, Human Resource Operations from August 2015 until March 2020. Mr. Wilson was appointed Senior Vice President, Chief
Human Resources Officer and Chief of Corporate Operations in March 2020.
(7)Mr. Gaggini served as Vice President, Corporate Controller and Principal Accounting Officer from December 2013 until September 2018. Since September
2018, Mr. Gaggini has served as Vice President, Deputy Chief Financial Officer and Chief Accounting Officer.
13 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Available Information
Our Internet website address is www.schnitzersteel.com. We make available on our website, free of charge, under the caption
“Investors – SEC Filings” our annual report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K, and
amendments to those reports as soon as reasonably practicable after electronically filing with or furnishing such materials to the
Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”) pursuant to Sections 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Also
available on our website are our definitive Proxy Statements and ownership reports pursuant to Section 16(a) of the Securities Act of
1933. Copies of these filings may also be obtained from the SEC’s website (www.sec.gov).
We may use our website as a channel for distributing material Company information. Financial and other material information
regarding our Company is routinely posted on and accessible at http://www.schnitzersteel.com/investors.aspx. You may register
your e-mail under the caption “Investors – E-mail Alerts” to receive e-mail notifications of new company information.
The content of our website is not incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Described below are risks, which are categorized as “Risk Factors Relating to Our Business,” “Risk Factors Relating to the
Regulatory Environment” and “Risk Factors Relating to Our Employees,” that could have a material adverse effect on our results of
operations, financial condition and cash flows or could cause actual results to differ materially from the results contemplated by the
forward-looking statements contained in this Annual Report. See “Forward-Looking Statements” that precedes Part I of this report.
Additional risks and uncertainties that we are unaware of or that we currently deem immaterial may in the future have a material
adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition and cash flows.
Risk Factors Relating to Our Business
The coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) pandemic has had, and may continue to have, an adverse effect on our business,
results of operations, financial condition and cash flows. Future epidemics or other public health emergencies could have similar
effects.
Our operations expose us to risks associated with pandemics, epidemics or other public health emergencies, such as the COVID-19
pandemic which spread from China to many other countries including the United States. In March 2020, the World Health
Organization characterized COVID-19 as a pandemic, and the President of the United States declared the COVID-19 outbreak a
national emergency. The outbreak resulted in governments around the world implementing stringent measures to help control the
spread of the virus, followed by phased regulations and guidelines for reopening communities and economies. In addition,
governments and central banks in several parts of the world have enacted fiscal and monetary stimulus measures to counteract the
impacts of COVID-19.
We are a company operating in a critical infrastructure industry, as defined by the U.S. Department of Homeland Security. Consistent
with federal guidelines and with state and local orders to date, we have continued to operate across our footprint. Notwithstanding
our continued operations, COVID-19 has negatively impacted and may have further negative impacts on our financial performance,
operations, supply chain and flows of raw materials, transportation and logistics networks and customers. Due in large part to the
impacts of and response to the spread of COVID-19, global economic conditions declined sharply during the third quarter of fiscal
2020, resulting in historic unemployment levels, rapid changes in supply and demand in certain industry sectors, businesses
switching to remote work or ceasing operations, and consumers eliminating, restricting or redirecting spending. The economic
downturn adversely affected demand for our products and contributed to weaker supply and demand conditions affecting prices and
volumes in the markets for our products, services and raw materials. During fiscal 2020, in particular the third quarter, our
operations, margins and results were adversely impacted by lower sales volumes of recycled metals driven by severely constrained
supplies of scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles, leading to lower processed volumes at our recycling facilities. We also
experienced significant decreases in selling prices for our recycled metal products, softer demand, supply chain disruptions, reduced
availability of shipping containers, and other logistics constraints.
The COVID-19 pandemic could further negatively impact our business or results of operations through the temporary closure of our
operating locations or those of our customers or suppliers, disrupting scrap metal inflows to our recycling facilities, limiting our
ability to process scrap metal through our shredders, inhibiting the manufacture of steel products at our steel mill, reducing retail
admissions and parts sales at our auto parts stores, and delaying or preventing deliveries to our customers, among others. In addition,
the ability of our employees and our suppliers’ and customers’ employees to work may be significantly impacted by individuals
contracting or being exposed to COVID-19, or as a result of prevention and control measures, which may significantly hamper our
production throughout the supply chain and constrict sales channels. Our customers may be directly impacted by business
curtailments or weak market conditions and may not be willing or able to fulfill their contractual obligations or open letters of credit.
We may also experience delays in obtaining letters of credit or processing letter of credit payments due to the impacts of COVID-19
on foreign issuing and U.S. intermediary banks.
14 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
In addition, as a result of COVID-19, we have experienced reductions in the availability of credit insurance that we have historically
used to cover a portion of our recycled metal and finished steel sales to domestic customers, which reduced availability may increase
our exposure to customer credit risk. Furthermore, the progression of and global response to the COVID-19 outbreak has caused and
increases the risk of further delays in construction activities and equipment deliveries related to our capital projects, including delays
in obtaining permits from government agencies. The extent of such delays and other effects of COVID-19 on our capital projects,
certain of which are outside of our control, is unknown, but they may impact or delay the timing of anticipated benefits on capital
projects.
Our bank credit agreement requires that we maintain certain financial and other covenants. Events resulting from the effects of
COVID-19 may negatively impact our ability to comply with these covenants, which has caused us to obtain an amendment
temporarily relaxing the consolidated fixed charge coverage ratio until the quarter ended May 31, 2021, and which could lead us to
seek further amendments or waivers from our lenders, limit access to or require accelerated repayment of our existing credit
facilities, or require us to pursue alternative financing. We have no assurance that any such alternative financing, if required, could
be obtained at terms acceptable to us, or at all, including as a result of the effects of COVID-19 on financial markets at such time.
Because the severity, magnitude and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic and its economic consequences are uncertain, continually
changing and difficult to predict, the pandemic’s impacts on our operations and financial performance, as well as its impact on our
ability to successfully execute our business strategies and initiatives, are also uncertain and difficult to predict. Further, the ultimate
impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on our operations and financial performance depends on many factors that are not within our
control, including, but not limited to: governmental, business and individuals’ actions that have been and continue to be taken in
response to the pandemic (including restrictions on travel and transportation and workforce pressures); the impact of the pandemic
and actions taken in response on global and regional economies and on levels of economic activity; the availability of federal, state
or local funding programs; general economic uncertainty in key global markets and financial market volatility; global economic
conditions and levels of economic growth; and the pace of recovery when the COVID-19 pandemic subsides. While we expect the
COVID-19 pandemic to continue to negatively impact our results of operations, cash flows and financial position, the current level
of uncertainty over the economic and operational impacts of COVID-19 means the related financial impact cannot be reasonably
estimated at this time.
Potential costs related to the environmental cleanup of Portland Harbor may be material to our financial position and liquidity
In December 2000, we were notified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (“EPA”) under the Comprehensive
Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act (“CERCLA”) that we are one of the potentially responsible parties
(“PRPs”) that owns or operates or formerly owned or operated sites which are part of or adjacent to the Portland Harbor Superfund
site (the “Site”). The precise nature and extent of cleanup of any specific areas within the Site, the parties to be involved, the timing
of any specific remedial action and the allocation of the costs for any cleanup among responsible parties have not yet been
determined. The process of site investigation, remedy selection, identification of additional PRPs and allocation of costs has been
underway for a number of years, but significant uncertainties remain. It is unclear to what extent we will be liable for environmental
costs or natural resource damage claims or third party contribution or damage claims with respect to the Site.
While we participated in certain preliminary Site study efforts, we were not party to the consent order entered into by the EPA with
certain other PRPs, referred to as the “Lower Willamette Group” (“LWG”), for a remedial investigation/feasibility study (“RI/FS”).
During fiscal 2007, we and certain other parties agreed to an interim settlement with the LWG under which we made a cash
contribution to the LWG RI/FS. The LWG has indicated that it had incurred over $155 million in investigation-related costs over an
approximately 18 year period working on the RI/FS. Following submittal of draft RI and FS documents which the EPA largely
rejected, the EPA took over the RI/FS process.
We have joined with approximately 100 other PRPs, including the LWG members, in a voluntary process to establish an allocation
of costs at the Site, including the costs incurred by the LWG in the RI/FS process. The LWG members have also commenced federal
court litigation, which has been stayed, seeking to bring additional parties into the allocation process.
15 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
In January 2008, the Portland Harbor Natural Resource Trustee Council (“Trustee Council”) invited us and other PRPs to participate
in funding and implementing the Natural Resource Injury Assessment for the Site. Following meetings among the Trustee Council
and the PRPs, funding and participation agreements were negotiated under which the participating PRPs, including us, agreed to
fund the first phase of the three-phase natural resource damage assessment. Phase 1, which included the development of the Natural
Resource Damage Assessment Plan (“AP”) and implementation of several early studies, was substantially completed in 2010. In
December 2017, we joined with other participating PRPs in agreeing to fund Phase 2 of the natural resource damage assessment,
which includes the implementation of the AP to develop information sufficient to facilitate early settlements between the Trustee
Council and Phase 2 participants and the identification of restoration projects to be funded by the settlements. In late May 2018, the
Trustee Council published notice of its intent to proceed with Phase 3, which will involve the full implementation of the AP and the
final injury and damage determination. We are proceeding with the process established by the Trustee Council regarding early
settlements under Phase 2. It is uncertain whether we will enter into an early settlement for natural resource damages or what costs
we may incur in any such early settlement.
On January 30, 2017, one of the Trustees, the Confederated Tribes and Bands of the Yakama Nation, which withdrew from the
council in 2009, filed a suit against approximately 30 parties, including us, seeking reimbursement of certain past and future
response costs in connection with remedial action at the Site and recovery of assessment costs related to natural resources damages
from releases at and from the Site to the Multnomah Channel and the Lower Columbia River. The parties filed various motions to
dismiss or stay this suit, and in August 2019, the court issued an order denying the motions to dismiss and staying the action. We
intend to defend against the claims in this suit and do not have sufficient information to determine the likelihood of a loss in this
matter or to estimate the amount of damages being sought or the amount of such damages that could be allocated to us.
Estimates of the cost of remedial action for the cleanup of the in-river portion of the Site have varied widely in various drafts of the
FS and in the EPA’s final FS issued in June 2016 ranging from approximately $170 million to over $2.5 billion (net present value),
depending on the remedial alternative and a number of other factors. In comments submitted to the EPA, we and certain other
stakeholders identified a number of serious concerns regarding the EPA’s risk and remedial alternatives assessments, cost estimates,
scheduling assumptions and conclusions regarding the feasibility and effectiveness of remediation technologies.
In January 2017, the EPA issued a Record of Decision (“ROD”) that identified the selected remedy for the Site. The selected remedy
is a modified version of one of the alternative remedies evaluated in the EPA’s FS that was expanded to include additional work at a
greater cost. The EPA has estimated the total cost of the selected remedy at $1.7 billion with a net present value cost of $1.05 billion
(at a 7% discount rate) and an estimated construction period of 13 years following completion of the remedial designs. In the ROD,
the EPA stated that the cost estimate is an order-of-magnitude engineering estimate that is expected to be within +50% to -30% of the
actual project cost and that changes in the cost elements are likely to occur as a result of new information and data collected during
the engineering design. We have identified a number of concerns regarding the remedy described in the ROD, which is based on data
that is more than a decade old, and the EPA’s estimates for the costs and time required to implement the selected remedy. Because of
ongoing questions regarding cost effectiveness, technical feasibility, and the use of stale data, it is uncertain whether the ROD will be
implemented as issued. In addition, the ROD did not determine or allocate the responsibility for remediation costs among the PRPs.
In the ROD, the EPA acknowledged that much of the data used in preparing the ROD was more than a decade old and would need to
be updated with a new round of “baseline” sampling to be conducted prior to the remedial design phase. Accordingly, the ROD
provided for additional pre-remedial design investigative work and baseline sampling to be conducted in order to provide a baseline
of current conditions and delineate particular remedial actions for specific areas within the Site. This additional sampling was
required prior to proceeding with the next phase in the process which is the remedial design. The remedial design phase is an
engineering phase during which additional technical information and data are collected, identified and incorporated into technical
drawings and specifications developed for the subsequent remedial action. Moreover, the ROD provided only Site-wide cost
estimates and did not provide sufficient detail to estimate costs for specific sediment management areas within the Site. Following
issuance of the ROD, EPA proposed that the PRPs, or a subgroup of PRPs, perform the additional investigative work identified in the
ROD under a new consent order.
16 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
In December 2017, we and three other PRPs entered into a new Administrative Settlement Agreement and Order on Consent with
EPA to perform such pre-remedial design investigation and baseline sampling over a two-year period. We estimated that our share of
the costs of performing such work would be approximately $2 million, which we accrued in fiscal 2018. Such costs were fully
covered by existing insurance coverage and, thus, we also recorded an insurance receivable for $2 million in fiscal 2018, resulting in
no net impact to our consolidated results of operations.
The pre-remedial design investigation and baseline sampling work has been completed, and the report evaluating the data was
submitted to EPA on June 17, 2019. The evaluation report concludes that Site conditions have improved substantially since the data
forming the basis of the ROD was collected over a decade ago. The analysis contained in the report has significant implications for
remedial design and remedial action at the Site. EPA has reviewed the report, finding with a few limited corrections that the data is
of suitable quality and generally acceptable and stating that such data will be used, in addition to existing and forthcoming design-
level data, to inform implementation of the ROD. However, EPA did not agree that the data or the analysis warrants a change to the
remedy at this time and reaffirmed its commitment to proceed with remedial design. We and other PRPs disagree with EPA’s position
on use of the more recent data and will continue to pursue limited, but critical, changes to the selected remedy for the Site during the
remedial design phase.
EPA encouraged PRPs to step forward (individually or in groups) to enter into consent agreements to perform remedial design
covering the entire Site and proposed dividing the Site into eight to ten subareas for remedial design. Certain PRPs have since
executed consent agreements for remedial design work covering a little more than half of the remedial action areas at the Site.
Because of EPA’s refusal to date to modify the remedy to reflect the most current data on Site conditions and because of concerns
with the terms of the consent agreement, we elected not to enter into a consent agreement for remedial design with respect to any of
the subareas at the Site. On March 26, 2020, EPA issued a unilateral administrative order (UAO) to us and MMGL, LLC
(“MMGL”), an unaffiliated company, for the remedial design work in the portion of one of the EPA identified subareas within the
Site designated as the River Mile 3.5 East Project Area. Following a conference with us to discuss the UAO and written comments
submitted by us, EPA made limited modifications to the UAO and issued an amendment to the UAO on April 27, 2020 with an
effective date of May 4, 2020. As required by the UAO, we notified EPA of our intent to comply with the UAO on the effective date
while reserving all of our sufficient cause defenses. Failure to comply with a UAO, without sufficient cause, could subject us to
significant penalties or treble damages. Pursuant to the optimized remedial design timeline set forth in the UAO, EPA’s expected
schedule for completion of the remedial design work is four years. EPA has estimated the cost of the work at approximately $4
million. We have agreed with the other respondent to the UAO, MMGL, that we will lead the performance and be responsible for a
portion of the costs of the work for remedial design under the UAO and also entered into an agreement with another PRP pursuant to
which such other PRP has agreed to fund a portion of the costs of such work. These agreements are not an allocation of liability or
claims associated with the Site as between the respondents or with respect to any third party. We estimated that our share of the costs
of performing such work under the UAO would be approximately $3 million, which we recorded to environmental liabilities and
selling, general and administrative expense in the consolidated financial statements in the third quarter of fiscal 2020. We have
insurance policies that we believe will provide reimbursement for costs we incur for remedial design, but not for any penalties. We
also expect to pursue in the future allocation or contribution from other PRPs for a portion of such remedial design costs.
Our environmental liabilities as of August 31, 2020 and 2019 include $4 million and $1 million, respectively, relating to Portland
Harbor.
Except for certain early action projects in which we are not involved, remediation activities are not expected to commence for a
number of years. Moreover, remediation activities at the Site are expected to be sequenced, and the order and timing of such
sequencing has not been determined. In addition, as discussed above, responsibility for implementing and funding the remedy will
be determined in a separate allocation process, which is on-going. We expect the next major stage of the allocation process to
proceed in parallel with the remedial design process.
Because the final remedial actions have not yet been designed and there has not been a determination of the amount of natural
resource damages or of the allocation among the PRPs of costs of the investigations, remedial action costs or natural resource
damages, we believe it is not possible to reasonably estimate the amount or range of costs which we are likely to or which it is
reasonably possible that we will incur in connection with the Site, although such costs could be material to our financial position,
results of operations, cash flows and liquidity. Among the facts currently being developed are detailed information on the history of
ownership of and the nature of the uses of and activities and operations performed on each property within the Site, which are factors
that will play a substantial role in determining the allocation of investigation and remedy costs among the PRPs.
We have insurance policies that we believe will provide reimbursement for costs we incur for defense, remedial design, remedial
action and mitigation for natural resource damages claims in connection with the Site. Most of these policies jointly insure us and
MMGL, as the successor to a former subsidiary of ours. We and MMGL have negotiated the settlement with certain insurers of
claims against them related to the Site, continue to seek settlements with other insurers and formed a Qualified Settlement Fund
(“QSF”) which became
17 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
operative in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020 to hold such settlement amounts until funds are needed to pay or reimburse costs
incurred by us or MMGL in connection with the Site. These insurance policies and the funds in the QSF may not cover all of the
costs which we may incur.
Significant cash outflows in the future related to the Site could reduce the amount of our borrowing capacity that could otherwise be
used for investment in capital expenditures, dividends, share repurchases and acquisitions. Any material liabilities incurred in the
future related to the Site could result in our failure to maintain compliance with certain covenants in our debt agreements. See
“Contingencies – Environmental” in Note 9 - Commitments and Contingencies in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial
Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
We operate in industries that are cyclical and sensitive to general economic conditions, which could have a material adverse
effect on our operating results, financial condition and cash flows
Demand for most of our products is cyclical in nature and sensitive to general economic conditions. The timing and magnitude of the
cycles in the industries in which our products are used, including global steel manufacturing and nonresidential and infrastructure
construction in the U.S., are difficult to predict. The cyclical nature of our operations tends to reflect and be amplified by changes in
economic conditions, both domestically and internationally, and foreign currency exchange fluctuations. Economic downturns or a
prolonged period of slow growth in the U.S. and foreign markets or any of the industries in which we operate could have a material
adverse effect on our results of operations, financial condition and cash flows.
Changing conditions in global markets including the impact of sanctions and tariffs, quotas and other trade actions and import
restrictions may adversely affect our operating results, financial condition and cash flows
We generate a substantial portion of our revenues from sales to customers located outside the U.S., including countries in Asia, the
Mediterranean region and North, Central and South America. In each of the last three years, exports comprised approximately 66 to
71 percent of AMR’s ferrous sales volumes and 60 to 63 percent of AMR’s nonferrous sales volumes. Further, in certain years prior
to fiscal 2019, total sales to customers in China exceeded 10 percent of our consolidated revenues. Our ability to sell our products
profitably, or at all, into international markets is subject to a number of risks including adverse impacts of political, economic,
military, terrorist or major pandemic events; labor and social issues; legal and regulatory requirements or limitations imposed by
foreign governments including quotas, tariffs or other protectionist trade barriers, sanctions, adverse tax law changes,
nationalization, currency restrictions, or import restrictions for certain types of products we export; and disruptions or delays in
shipments caused by customs compliance or other actions of government agencies. The occurrence of such events and conditions
may adversely affect our operating results, financial condition and cash flows.
For example, in fiscal 2017, regulators in China began implementing the National Sword initiative involving inspections of Chinese
industrial enterprises, including recyclers, in order to identify rules violations with respect to discharge of pollutants or illegally
transferred scrap imports. Restrictions resulting from the National Sword initiative include a ban on certain imported recycled
products, lower contamination limits for permitted recycled materials, and more comprehensive pre- and post-shipment inspection
requirements. Disruptions in pre-inspection certifications and stringent inspection procedures at certain Chinese destination ports
have limited access to these destinations and resulted in the renegotiation or cancellation of certain nonferrous customer contracts in
connection with the redirection of such shipments to alternate destinations. Commencing July 1, 2019, China imposed further
restrictions in the form of import license requirements and quotas on certain scrap products, including certain nonferrous products
we sell. Chinese import licenses and quotas are issued to Chinese scrap consumers on a quarterly basis for the importation of scrap
products. Since the implementation of this program, the size of import quotas has been steadily reduced on a quarter-over-quarter
basis. We have continued to sell our recycled metal products into China; however, additional or modified license requirements and
quotas, as well as additional product quality requirements, may be issued in the future. We believe that the potential impact on our
recycling operations of the Chinese regulatory actions described above could include requirements that would necessitate additional
processing and packaging of certain nonferrous recycled scrap metal products, increased inspection and certification activities with
respect to exports to China, or a change in the use of our sales channels in the event of delays in the issuance of licenses, restrictive
quotas or an outright ban on certain or all of our recycled metals products by China. As regulatory developments progress, we may
need to make further investments in nonferrous processing equipment beyond existing planned investments where economically
justified, incur additional costs in order to comply with new inspection requirements, or seek alternative markets for the impacted
products, which may result in lower sales prices or higher costs and may adversely impact our business or results of operations.
In March 2018, the U.S. imposed a 25 percent tariff on certain imported steel products and a 10 percent tariff on certain imported
aluminum products under Section 232 of the Trade Expansion Act of 1962. These new tariffs, along with other U.S. trade actions,
have triggered retaliatory actions by certain affected countries, and other foreign governments have initiated or are considering
imposing trade measures on other U.S. goods. For example, China has imposed a series of retaliatory tariffs on certain U.S. products,
including a 25
18 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
percent tariff on all grades of U.S. scrap and an additional 25 percent tariff on U.S. aluminum scrap. These tariffs and other trade
actions could result in a decrease in international steel demand beyond that already experienced and further negatively impact
demand for our products, which would adversely impact our business. Given the uncertainty regarding the scope and duration of
these trade actions by the U.S. or other countries, the impact of the trade actions on our operations or results remains uncertain, but
this impact could be material.
Changes in the availability or price of inputs such as raw materials and end-of-life vehicles could reduce our sales
Our businesses require certain materials that are sourced from third party suppliers. Although the synergies from our integrated
operations allow us to be our own source for some raw materials, particularly with respect to scrap metal for our steel manufacturing
operations, we rely on other suppliers for most of our raw material and other input needs, including inputs to steel production such as
graphite electrodes, alloys and other required consumables. Industry supply conditions generally involve risks, including the
possibility of shortages of raw materials, increases in raw material and other input costs, and reduced control over delivery
schedules. We procure our scrap inventory from numerous sources. These suppliers generally are not bound by long-term contracts
and have no obligation to sell scrap metal to us. In periods of declining or lower scrap metal prices suppliers may elect to hold scrap
metal to wait for higher prices or intentionally slow their metal collection activities, tightening supply. If a substantial number of
suppliers cease selling scrap metal to us, we will be unable to recycle metal at desired levels, and our results of operations and
financial condition could be materially adversely affected. For instance, in the third quarter of fiscal 2020 a lower price environment
for recycled metals in combination with economic and other restrictions on suppliers relating to COVID-19 severely constricted the
supply of scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles, which resulted in significantly reduced processed volumes. A slowdown of
industrial production in the U.S. may also reduce the supply of industrial grades of metal to the metals recycling industry, resulting
in less recyclable metal available to process and market. Increased competition for domestic scrap metal, including as a result of
overcapacity in the scrap recycling industry in the U.S. and Canada, may also reduce the supply of scrap metal available to us.
Failure to obtain a steady supply of scrap material could both adversely impact our ability to meet sales commitments and reduce our
operating margins. Failure to obtain an adequate supply of end-of-life vehicles could adversely impact our ability to attract
customers and charge admission fees and reduce our parts sales. Failure to obtain raw materials and other inputs to steel production
such as graphite electrodes, alloys and other required consumables, could adversely impact our ability to make steel to the
specifications of our customers.
Significant decreases in scrap metal prices may adversely impact our operating results
The timing and magnitude of the cycles in the industries in which we operate are difficult to predict and are influenced by different
economic conditions in the domestic market, where we typically acquire our raw materials, and foreign markets, where we typically
sell the majority of our products. Purchase prices for scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles and selling prices for recycled scrap
metal are subject to market forces beyond our control. While we attempt to respond to changing recycled scrap metal selling prices
through adjustments to our metal purchase prices, our ability to do so is limited by competitive and other market factors. As a result,
we may not be able to reduce our metal purchase prices to fully offset a sharp reduction in recycled scrap metal sales prices, which
may adversely impact our operating income and cash flows. In addition, a rapid decrease in selling prices may compress our
operating margins due to the impact of average inventory cost accounting, which causes cost of goods sold recognized in the
Consolidated Statements of Operations to decrease at a slower rate than metal purchase prices.
For instance, in fiscal 2020, weaker market conditions for recycled metals, including as a result of the sharp decline in global
economic conditions during the third quarter of fiscal 2020 in large part due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic, and
structural changes to the market for certain recycled nonferrous products primarily from Chinese import restrictions and tariffs,
resulted in periods of sharply declining commodity prices and lower average net selling prices for our ferrous and nonferrous
recycled metal products compared to fiscal 2019. As a result, operating margins at AMR in fiscal 2020 compressed as the decline in
average net selling prices for our recycled metal products outpaced the reduction in purchase costs for raw materials.
Imbalances in supply and demand conditions in the global steel industry may reduce demand for our products
Economic expansions and contractions in global economies can result in supply and demand imbalances in the global steel industry
that can significantly affect the price of commodities used and sold by our business, as well as the price of and demand for finished
steel products. In a number of foreign countries, such as China, steel producers are generally government-owned and may therefore
make production decisions based on political or other factors that do not reflect free market conditions. In the past, overcapacity and
excess steel production in these foreign countries resulted in the export of aggressively priced semi-finished and finished steel
products. This led to disruptions in steel-making operations within other countries, negatively impacting demand for our recycled
scrap metal products used by EAF mills globally as their primary feedstock. Further, the import of foreign steel products into the
U.S. at similarly aggressive prices have in the past adversely impacted finished steel sales prices and sales volumes at CSS. Existing
or new trade laws and regulations may cause or be inadequate to prevent disadvantageous trade practices, which could have a
material adverse effect on our
19 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
financial condition and results of operations. Although trade regulations restrict or impose duties on the importation of certain
products, if foreign steel production significantly exceeds consumption in those countries, global demand for our recycled scrap
metal products could decline and imports of steel products into the U.S. could increase, resulting in lower volumes and selling prices
for our recycled metal products and finished steel products.
Goodwill impairment charges may adversely affect our operating results
Goodwill represents the excess purchase price over the net amount of identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed in a
business combination measured at fair value. As of August 31, 2020, we had $170 million of goodwill on our balance sheet, almost
all of which was carried by a single reporting unit within AMR. We test the goodwill balances allocated to our reporting units for
impairment on an annual basis and when events occur or circumstances change that indicate that the fair value of one or more of our
reporting units with allocated goodwill may be below its carrying amount. When testing goodwill for impairment, we may be
required to measure the fair value of the reporting units in order to determine the amount of impairment, if any. Fair value
determinations require considerable judgment and are sensitive to inherent uncertainties and changes in estimates and assumptions
regarding revenue growth rates, operating margins, capital expenditures, working capital requirements, discount rates, tax rates,
terminal growth rates, benefits associated with a taxable transaction and synergistic benefits available to market participants. A lack
of recovery or further deterioration in market conditions, a trend of weaker than anticipated financial performance for one of our
reporting units with allocated goodwill, a decline in our share price for a sustained period of time, or an increase in the market-based
weighted average cost of capital, among other factors, are indicators that the carrying value of our goodwill may not be recoverable.
We may be required to record a goodwill impairment charge that, if incurred, could have a material adverse effect on our financial
condition and results of operations. See Note 7 - Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net in the Notes to the Consolidated
Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
Impairment of long-lived assets and equity investments may adversely affect our operating results
Our long-lived asset groups are subject to an impairment assessment when certain triggering events or circumstances indicate that
their carrying value may be impaired. If the carrying value exceeds our estimate of future undiscounted cash flows of the operations
related to the asset group, an impairment is recorded for the difference between the carrying amount and the fair value of the asset
group. The results of these tests for potential impairment may be adversely affected by unfavorable market conditions, our financial
performance trends, or an increase in interest rates, among other factors. If, as a result of the impairment test, we determine that the
fair value of any of our long-lived asset groups is less than its carrying amount, we may incur an impairment charge that could have
a material adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations. We recorded impairment charges of $6 million on long-
lived tangible and lease right-of-use assets associated with certain regional metals recycling operations and auto parts stores in fiscal
2020. With respect to our investments in unconsolidated entities accounted for under the equity method, a loss in value of an
investment is recognized when the decline is other than temporary. With respect to our $6 million equity investment in a privately-
held waste and recycling entity that does not have a readily determinable fair value, we would recognize an impairment charge if our
qualitative assessment indicates that the investment is impaired and the fair value of the investment is less than its carrying value.
Impairment of our equity investments could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations. See Note 2 - Summary of
Significant Accounting Policies in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report for further
detail on long-lived asset and joint venture investment impairment charges.
Failure to realize or delays in realizing expected benefits from investments in processing and manufacturing technology
improvements may impact our operating results and cash flows
We make significant investments in processing and manufacturing technology improvements aimed at increasing the efficiency and
capabilities of our businesses and to maximize our economies of scale. Such improvements may be subject to many factors
including, but not limited to, permitting, construction, equipment delivery, commissioning and technology performance risks, some
of which are outside our control and could result in further delays in such projects or require us to incur additional costs. Failure to
realize or delays in realizing the anticipated benefits and to generate adequate returns on such capital improvement projects may
have a material adverse effect on our results of operations and cash flows.
20 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Inability to achieve or sustain the benefits from productivity, cost savings and restructuring initiatives may adversely impact our
operating results
During the past several years, we implemented a number of productivity improvement, cost savings and restructuring initiatives
designed to reduce operating expenses and improve profitability and to achieve further integration and synergistic cost efficiencies in
our operating platform. These initiatives included idling underutilized assets and closing facilities to more closely align our business
to market conditions, implementing productivity initiatives to increase production efficiency and material recovery, and further
reducing our annual operating expenses through headcount reductions, reducing organizational layers, consolidating shared service
functions, savings from procurement activities, streamlining of administrative and supporting services functions, and other non-
headcount measures. In fiscal 2019, we implemented productivity initiatives targeted to achieve $35 million in annual benefits
through a combination of production cost efficiencies, reductions in selling, general and administrative expenses and increases in
retail sales. In fiscal 2020, we implemented productivity initiatives targeted to achieve $15 million in realized benefits in fiscal 2020
by further reducing our annual operating expenses, mainly through reductions in non-trade procurement spend, including outside and
professional services, lower employee-related expenses and other non-headcount measures. We may undertake similar or additional
productivity initiatives in the future in the normal course or in response to market conditions. Our ability to achieve or sustain the
anticipated cost reductions and other benefits from these initiatives within the expected time frame is subject to many estimates and
assumptions. These estimates and assumptions are subject to significant economic, competitive and other uncertainties, some of
which are beyond our control.
We incurred restructuring charges and other exit-related activities in fiscal 2020, 2019 and 2018 as a result of these initiatives and
may incur such charges in the future. Failure to achieve or sustain the expected cost reductions and other benefits related to these
productivity improvements, cost savings and restructuring initiatives could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations
and cash flows.
We may be unable to renew facility leases, thus restricting our ability to operate
We lease a significant portion of our facilities, including the substantial majority of our auto parts facilities. The cost to renew such
leases may increase significantly, and we may not be able to renew such leases on commercially reasonable terms or at all. Failure to
renew these leases or find suitable alternative locations for our facilities may impact our ability to continue operations within certain
geographic areas, which could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.
Acquisitions and integration of acquired businesses may result in operating difficulties and other unintended consequences
We may make acquisitions of or expand into complementary businesses to enable us to enhance our customer base and grow our
revenues. Execution of any past or potential future acquisition or expansion involves a number of risks, including:
 •Difficulty integrating the acquired businesses’ personnel and operations;
 •Challenges in obtaining permits or meeting other regulatory requirements;
 •Potential loss of key employees, customers or suppliers of the acquired business;
 •Difficulties in realizing anticipated cost savings, efficiencies and synergies;
 •Unexpected costs;
 •Inaccurate assessment of or undisclosed liabilities;
 •Inability to maintain uniform standards, controls and procedures;
 •Disruption to existing businesses; and
 •Difficulty in managing growth.
21 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
If we do not successfully execute on acquisitions or expansions and the acquired or expanded businesses do not perform as
projected, our financial condition and results of operations could be materially adversely affected.
Changing economic conditions may result in customers not fulfilling their contractual obligations
We enter into export ferrous sales contracts preceded by negotiations that include fixing price, quantity, shipping terms and other
contractual terms. Upon finalization of these terms and satisfactory completion of other contractual contingencies, the customer
typically opens a letter of credit to satisfy its payment obligation under the contract prior to our shipment of the cargo. In times of
changing economic conditions, including during periods of sharply falling scrap metal prices, there is an increased risk that
customers may not be willing or able to fulfill their contractual obligations or open letters of credit. As of August 31, 2020 and 2019,
40% and 32%, respectively, of our accounts receivable balance were covered by letters of credit.
Increases in the value of the U.S. dollar relative to other currencies may reduce the demand for our products
A significant portion of our recycled scrap metal revenues is generated from sales to foreign customers, which are denominated in
U.S. dollars, including customers located in Asia, the Mediterranean region and North, Central and South America. A strengthening
U.S. dollar, as experienced during recent years including fiscal 2020, makes our products more expensive for non-U.S. customers,
which may negatively impact export sales. A strengthening U.S. dollar also makes imported metal products less expensive, which
may result in an increase in imports of steel products into the U.S. As a result, our finished steel products, which are made in the
U.S., may become more expensive for our U.S. customers relative to imported steel products thereby reducing demand for our
products.
We are exposed to translation risks associated with fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates
Our operations in Canada expose us to translation risks associated with fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates as compared
to the U.S. dollar, our reporting currency. As a result, we are subject to foreign currency exchange risks due to exchange rate
movements in connection with the translation of the operating costs and the assets and liabilities of our foreign operations into our
functional currency for inclusion in our Consolidated Financial Statements.
Potential limitations on our ability to access capital resources may restrict our ability to operate
Our operations are capital intensive. Our business also requires substantial expenditures for routine maintenance. While we expect
that our cash requirements, including the funding of capital expenditures, debt service, dividends, share repurchases and investments,
will be financed by internally generated funds or from borrowings under our secured committed bank credit facilities, there can be
no assurance that this will be the case. Additional acquisitions could require financing from external sources. Although we believe
we have adequate access to contractually committed borrowings, we could be adversely affected if we are not able to meet the
conditions required to incur such borrowing or if our banks ceased lending or were unable to honor their contractual commitments.
Failure to access our credit facilities could restrict our ability to fund operations, make capital expenditures or execute acquisitions.
The agreement governing our bank credit facilities imposes certain restrictions on our business and contains financial covenants
Our secured bank credit facilities contain certain restrictions on our business which limit (subject to certain exceptions) our ability
to, among other things, incur or suffer to exist certain liens, make investments, incur or guaranty additional indebtedness, enter into
consolidations, mergers, acquisitions, and sales of assets, make distributions and other restricted payments, change the nature of our
business, engage in transactions with affiliates and enter into restrictive agreements, including agreements that restrict the ability of
our subsidiaries to make distributions. These restrictions may affect our ability to operate our business or execute our strategy and
may limit our ability to take advantage of potential business opportunities as they arise. Our bank credit agreement also requires that
we maintain certain financial and other covenants, including a consolidated fixed charge coverage ratio and a consolidated leverage
ratio and, for each of the fiscal quarters ending August 31, 2020 through May 31, 2021, a consolidated asset coverage ratio. Our
ability to comply with these covenants may also be affected by events beyond our control, including prevailing economic, financial
and industry conditions. Our failure to comply with any of these restrictions or financial covenants could result in an event of default
under the bank credit agreement, and permit our lenders to cease lending to us and declare all amounts borrowed from them to be
due and payable, together with accrued and unpaid interest. This could require us to refinance our bank facilities, which we may not
be able to do at terms acceptable to us, or at all.
22 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Consolidation in the steel industry may reduce demand for our products
There has been consolidation in the steel industry that has included steel mills acquiring steel fabricators to ensure demand for their
products. If any of our steel mill’s significant remaining customers were to be acquired by competing steel mills, this could reduce
the demand for our products and force us to lower our prices, reducing our revenues, or to reduce production, which could increase
our unit costs and have a material adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations.
Reliance on third party shipping companies may restrict our ability to ship our products
We significantly rely on third parties to handle and transport raw materials to our production facilities and products to customers.
Despite our practice of utilizing a diversified group of suppliers of transportation, factors beyond our control, including changes in
fuel prices, political events, governmental regulation of transportation, changes in market rates, carrier availability, carrier
bankruptcy, shipping industry consolidation and disruptions in transportation infrastructure, may adversely impact our ability to ship
our products. These impacts could include delays or other disruptions in shipments in transit or third party shipping companies
increasing their charges for transportation services or otherwise reducing or eliminating the availability of their vehicles, rail cars,
barges or ships. As a result, we may not be able to transport our products in a timely and cost-effective manner, which could have a
material adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations and may harm our reputation.
Equipment upgrades, equipment failures and facility damage may lead to production curtailments or shutdowns
Our business operations and recycling and manufacturing processes depend on critical pieces of equipment, including information
technology equipment, shredders, nonferrous sorting technology, furnaces and a rolling mill, which may be out of service
occasionally for scheduled upgrades or maintenance or as a result of unanticipated failures. Our facilities are subject to equipment
failures and the risk of catastrophic loss due to unanticipated events such as fires, earthquakes, accidents or violent weather
conditions. For instance, certain facilities in California, Oregon and Washington were briefly closed in September 2020 due to poor
air quality as a result of wildfires, although the impact on our operations was not significant. We have insurance to cover certain of
the risks associated with equipment damage and resulting business interruption, but there are certain events that would not be
covered by insurance and there can be no assurance that insurance will continue to be available on acceptable terms. Interruptions in
our processing and production capabilities and shutdowns resulting from unanticipated events could have a material adverse effect
on our financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.
Product liability claims may adversely impact our operating results
We could inadvertently acquire radioactive scrap metal that could potentially be included in mixed scrap metal shipped to consumers
worldwide. Although we have invested in radiation detection equipment in the majority of our locations, including the facilities from
which we ship directly to customers, failure to detect radioactive scrap metal remains a possibility. Even though we maintain
insurance to address the risk of this failure in detection, there can be no assurance that the insurance coverage would be adequate or
will continue to be available on acceptable terms. In addition, if we fail to meet contractual requirements for a product, we may be
subject to product warranty costs and claims. These costs and claims could both have a material adverse effect on our financial
condition and results of operations and harm our reputation.
23 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
We are subject to legal proceedings and legal compliance risks that may adversely impact our financial condition, results of
operations and liquidity
We spend substantial resources ensuring that we comply with domestic and foreign regulations, contractual obligations and other
legal standards. Notwithstanding this, we are subject to a variety of legal proceedings and compliance risks in respect of various
matters, including regulatory, safety, environmental, employment, transportation, intellectual property, contractual, import/export,
international trade and governmental matters that arise in the course of our business and in our industry. For example, legal
proceedings can include those arising from accidents involving Company-owned vehicles, including Company tractor trailers. In
some instances, such accidents and the related litigation involve accidents that have resulted in third party fatalities. An outcome in
an unusual or significant legal proceeding or compliance investigation in excess of insurance recoveries could adversely affect our
financial condition and results of operations. For information regarding our current significant legal proceedings and contingencies,
see “Legal Proceedings” in Part I, Item 3 and “Contingencies – Other” within Note 9 - Commitments and Contingencies in Part II,
Item 8 of this report.
Climate change may adversely impact our facilities and our ongoing operations
The potential physical impacts of climate change on our operations are highly uncertain and depend upon the unique geographic and
environmental factors present, for example rising sea levels at our deep water port facilities, changing storm patterns and intensities,
and changing temperature levels. As many of our recycling facilities are located near deep water ports, rising sea levels may disrupt
our ability to receive scrap metal, process the scrap metal through our shredders and ship products to our customers. Extreme
weather events and conditions, such as hurricanes, thunderstorms, tornadoes, wildfires and snow or ice storms, may increase our
costs or cause damage to our facilities, and any damage resulting from extreme weather may not be fully insured. Increased
frequency and duration of adverse weather events and conditions may also inhibit construction activity utilizing our products, scrap
metal inflows to our recycling facilities, and retail admissions and parts sales at our auto parts stores. Potential adverse impacts from
climate change, including rising temperatures and extreme weather events and conditions, may create health and safety issues for
employees operating at our facilities and may lead to an inability to maintain standard operating hours.
We may not realize our deferred tax assets in the future
The assessment of recoverability of our deferred tax assets is based on an evaluation of existing positive and negative evidence as to
whether it is more-likely-than-not that they will be realized. If negative evidence outweighs positive evidence, a valuation allowance
is required. Impairment of deferred tax assets may result from significant negative industry or economic trends, a decrease in
earnings performance and projections of future taxable income, adverse changes in laws or regulations, and a variety of other factors.
Impairment of deferred tax assets could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations and financial condition and could
result in not realizing the deferred tax assets. In the past, we have recorded significant valuation allowances against our deferred tax
assets, and our low annual effective tax rate in fiscal 2017 was primarily the result of our full valuation allowance positions at the
time. Deferred tax assets may require further valuation allowances if it is not more-likely-than-not that the deferred tax assets will be
realized.
In fiscal 2018, we released valuation allowances against certain U.S. federal and state and Canadian deferred tax assets resulting in
recognition of discrete tax benefits. The release of the valuation allowances was the result of sufficient positive evidence at the time,
including cumulative income in recent years and projections of future taxable income from operations, that it is more-likely-than-not
that the deferred tax assets will be realized. In the event that actual results differ from our projections or we adjust our estimates in
future periods, we may need to establish a valuation allowance, which could materially impact our financial position and results of
operations.
Tax increases and changes in tax rules may adversely affect our financial results
As a company conducting business on a global basis with physical operations throughout North America, we are exposed, both
directly and indirectly, to the effects of changes in U.S., state, local and foreign tax rules. Taxes for financial reporting purposes and
cash tax liabilities in the future may be adversely affected by changes in such tax rules. In many cases, such changes put us at a
competitive disadvantage compared to some of our major competitors, to the extent we are unable to pass the tax costs through to
our customers.
On December 22, 2017, the President of the United States signed and enacted into law comprehensive tax legislation commonly
referred to as the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (“Tax Act”). The effects of the Tax Act have been incorporated into our financial results
beginning in the second quarter of fiscal 2018. There is a risk that certain aspects of the Tax Act could be repealed or otherwise
modified or that states or foreign jurisdictions may amend their tax laws in response to the Tax Act, which could have a material
impact on our future results of operations and cash flows.
24 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Property tax increases due to reassessments and property tax rate changes may adversely affect our financial results
Real property taxes on our owned and leased properties may increase as these properties are reassessed by taxing authorities or as
property tax rates change, which could have a material impact on our future results of operations. For instance, the State of
California previously passed a law commonly referred to as Proposition 13, which generally limits annual real estate tax increases on
California properties to 2% of assessed value per annum. From time to time, various groups have proposed repealing Proposition 13,
or providing for modifications such as a “split roll tax,” whereby commercial property, for example, would be taxed at a higher rate
than residential property. Such a split roll tax is on the November 2020 ballot in California which, if approved, would require taxes
on such properties located in the State of California to be assessed based on the basis of fair market value as opposed to purchase
price, commencing in fiscal 2022. Given the outcome of the November 2020 ballot in California is uncertain, and that we cannot
predict the Company’s portfolio of properties in California subject to any changes in future periods, the impact on our operations or
results related to this potential change and other property tax changes remains uncertain and cannot be quantified, but could be
material.
One or more cybersecurity incidents may adversely impact our financial condition, results of operations and reputation
Our operations involve the use of multiple systems, some of which are outsourced to certain third party service and hosting
providers, that process, store and transmit sensitive information about our customers, suppliers, employees, financial position,
operating results and strategies. We face global cybersecurity risks and threats on a continual and ongoing basis, which include, but
are not limited to, attempts to access systems and information, computer viruses, or denial-of-service attacks. These risks and threats
range from uncoordinated individual attempts to sophisticated and targeted measures. Increased numbers of employees working
remotely increases our exposure to cyber-threats. While we are not aware of any material cyber-attacks or breaches of our systems to
date, we have and continue to implement measures to safeguard our systems and information and mitigate potential risks, including
employee training around phishing, malware and other cyber risks, but there is no assurance that such actions will be sufficient to
prevent cyber-attacks or security breaches that manipulate or improperly use our systems, compromise sensitive information, destroy
or corrupt data, or otherwise disrupt our operations. The occurrence of such events, including breaches of our security measures or
those of our third party service providers, could negatively impact our reputation and our competitive position and could result in
litigation with third parties, regulatory action, loss of business due to disruption of operations and/or reputational damage, potential
liability and increased remediation and protection costs, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition
and results of operations. Additionally, as cybersecurity risks become more sophisticated, we may need to increase our investments
in security measures which could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations.
Risk Factors Relating to the Regulatory Environment
Environmental compliance costs and potential environmental liabilities may have a material adverse effect on our financial
condition and results of operations
Compliance with environmental laws and regulations is a significant factor in our business. We are subject to local, state and federal
environmental laws and regulations in the U.S. and other countries relating to, among other matters:
 •Waste disposal;
 •Air emissions;
 •Waste water and storm water management, treatment and discharge;
 •The use and treatment of groundwater;
 •Soil and groundwater contamination and remediation;
 •Climate change;
 •Generation, discharge, storage, handling and disposal of hazardous materials and secondary materials; and
 •Employee health and safety.
25 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
We are also required to obtain environmental permits from governmental authorities for certain operations. Violation of or failure to
obtain permits or comply with these laws or regulations could result in our business being fined or otherwise sanctioned by
regulators or becoming subject to litigation by private parties. In recent years, capital expenditures for environmental projects have
increased and have represented a significant share of our total capital expenditures. Future environmental compliance costs,
including capital expenditures for environmental projects, may increase because of new laws and regulations, changing
interpretations and stricter enforcement of current laws and regulations by regulatory authorities, expanding emissions, groundwater
and other testing requirements and new information on emission or contaminant levels, uncertainty regarding adequate pollution
control levels, the future costs of pollution control technology and issues related to climate change. We have seen an increased focus
by federal, state and local regulators on metals recycling and auto dismantling facilities and new or expanding regulatory
requirements.
Our operations use, handle and generate hazardous substances. In addition, previous operations by others at facilities that we
currently or formerly owned, operated or otherwise used may have caused contamination from hazardous substances. As a result, we
are exposed to possible claims, including government fines and penalties, costs for investigation and clean-up activities, claims for
natural resources damages and claims by third parties for personal injury and property damage, under environmental laws and
regulations, especially for the remediation of waterways and soil or groundwater contamination. These laws can impose liability for
the cleanup of hazardous substances even if the owner or operator was neither aware of nor responsible for the release of the
hazardous substances. We have, in the past, been found not to be in compliance with certain of these laws and regulations, and have
incurred liabilities, expenditures, fines and penalties associated with such violations. In December 2000, we were notified by the
EPA that we are one of the potentially responsible parties that owns or operates, or formerly owned or operated, sites which are part
of or adjacent to the Portland Harbor Superfund site. Further, we have been notified that we are or may be a potentially responsible
party at sites other than Portland Harbor currently or formerly owned or operated by us or at other sites where we may have
responsibility for such costs due to past disposal or other activities. Environmental compliance costs and potential environmental
liabilities could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations and cash flows. See also the risk
factor “Potential costs related to the environmental cleanup of Portland Harbor may be material to our financial position and
liquidity” in this Item 1A and “Contingencies – Environmental” in Note 9 – Commitments and Contingencies in the Notes to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
Governmental agencies may refuse to grant or renew our licenses and permits, thus restricting our ability to operate
We conduct certain of our operations subject to licenses, permits and approvals from state and local governments. Governmental
agencies often resist the establishment of certain types of facilities in their communities, including auto parts facilities. Changes in
zoning and increased residential and mixed-use development near our facilities are reducing the buffer zones and creating land use
conflicts with heavy industrial uses such as ours. This could result in increased complaints, increased inspections and enforcement
including fines and penalties, operating restrictions, the need for additional capital expenditures and increased opposition to
maintaining or renewing required approvals, licenses and permits. In addition, from time to time, both the U.S. and foreign
governments impose regulations and restrictions on trade in the markets in which we operate. In some countries, governments
require us to apply for certificates or registration before allowing shipment of recycled metal to customers in those countries. There
can be no assurance that future approvals, licenses and permits will be granted or that we will be able to maintain and renew the
approvals, licenses and permits we currently hold. Failure to obtain these approvals could cause us to limit or discontinue operations
in these locations or prevent us from developing or acquiring new facilities, which could have a material adverse effect on our
financial condition and results of operations.
Compliance with existing and future climate change and greenhouse gas emission laws and regulations may adversely impact
our operating results
Future legislation or increased regulation regarding climate change and GHG emissions could impose significant costs on our
business and our customers and suppliers, including increased energy, capital equipment, emissions controls, environmental
monitoring and reporting and other costs in order to comply with laws and regulations concerning and limitations imposed
on climate change and GHG emissions. The potential costs of allowances, taxes, fees, offsets or credits that may be part of “cap and
trade” programs or similar future legislative or regulatory measures are still uncertain and the future of these programs or measures
is unknown. For example, in March 2020, the Governor of Oregon issued an executive order directing state agencies to take certain
actions to reduce and regulate GHG emissions including development of a “cap and reduce” program that would cover large
stationary sources in the state. The scope and timing of that program are unclear. Future climate change and GHG laws or regulations
could negatively impact our ability (and that of our customers and suppliers) to compete with companies situated in areas not subject
to such requirements. Until the timing, scope and extent of any future laws or regulations becomes known, we cannot predict the
effect on our financial condition, operating performance or ability to compete. Furthermore, even without such laws or regulations,
increased awareness and any adverse publicity in the global marketplace about the GHGs emitted by companies in the metals
recycling and steel manufacturing industries could harm our reputation and reduce customer demand for our products. See “Business
- Environmental Matters” in Part I, Item 1 of this report for further detail.
26 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Risk Factors Relating to Our Employees
Reliance on employees subject to collective bargaining may restrict our ability to operate
Approximately 23% of our full-time employees are represented by unions under collective bargaining agreements, including
substantially all of the manufacturing employees at our CSS steel manufacturing facility. As these agreements expire, we may not be
able to negotiate extensions or replacements of such agreements on acceptable terms. Any failure to reach an agreement with one or
more of our unions may result in strikes, lockouts or other labor actions, including work slowdowns or stoppages, which could have
a material adverse effect on our results of operations.
The underfunded status of our multiemployer pension plans may cause us to increase our contributions to the plans
As discussed in Note 12 - Employee Benefits in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report,
we contribute to the Steelworkers Western Independent Shops Pension Plan (“WISPP”), a multiemployer plan benefiting union
employees of our steel mill. Because we have no current intention of withdrawing from the WISPP, we have not recognized a
withdrawal liability in our consolidated financial statements. However, if such a liability were triggered, it could have a material
adverse effect on our results of operations, financial position, liquidity and cash flows. Our contributions to the WISPP could also
increase as a result of a diminished contribution base due to the insolvency or withdrawal of other employers who currently
contribute to it, the inability or failure of withdrawing employers to pay their withdrawal liabilities, or other funding deficiencies, as
we would need to fund the retirement obligations of these employers.
In 2004, the Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”) approved a seven-year extension of the period over which the WISPP may amortize
unfunded liabilities, conditioned upon maintenance of certain minimum funding levels. In 2014, the WISPP obtained relief from the
specified funding requirements from the IRS, which requires that the WISPP meet a minimum funded percentage on each valuation
date and achieve a funded percentage of 100% as of October 1, 2029. Based on the most recent actuarial valuation for the WISPP,
the funded percentage using the valuation method prescribed by the IRS satisfied the minimum funded percentage requirement.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
 
27 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
Our facilities and administrative offices by division, type and location were as follows as of August 31, 2020:
 
    Number of Facilities  
Division Type Location  Owned(1)   Leased  
AMR: Administrative OfficesCalifornia   —    2  
  New Jersey   —    1  
  Rhode Island   —    1  
 Auto Parts Stores Alberta, Canada   —    3  
  Arkansas   —    1  
  British Columbia, Canada   —    1  
  California(2)   3    16  
  Florida   —    1  
  Illinois   —    1  
  Indiana   1    —  
  Kansas   —    1  
  Missouri   1    3  
  Nevada   —    2  
  Ohio   —    1  
  Oregon   —    2  
  Rhode Island   2    —  
  Texas   —    4  
  Utah   —    1  
  Virginia   —    1  
  Washington   1    4  
 Metals Recycling Alabama   3    —  
  British Columbia, Canada   —    4  
  California   4 [A][B] —  
  Georgia   8    —  
  Hawaii   1 [A][B] 1  
  Maine   2    —  
  Massachusetts   2 [A][B] 1  
  Montana   1    —  
  Nevada   —    1  
  New Hampshire   2    —  
  Puerto Rico   1 [A][B] 3  
  Rhode Island   1    1 [A]
  Tennessee   1    —  
  Washington   2 [A][B] —  
CSS: Steel Mill Oregon   1    —  
 Steel Distribution California   1    —  
 Metals Recycling Oregon   4 [A][B] —  
  Washington   1    —  
Corporate: Administrative OfficesOregon   —    1  
  Total Operating Facilities and Administrative
Offices 
 43    58  
  Non-Operating(3)   10    12  
     53    70  
 
[A]Operation includes a deep water port. Puerto Rico and Hawaii operations access deep water ports through public docks.
[B]Includes large-scale shredding operations.
(1)Includes eight primarily owned facilities where an adjacent or supplementary parcel of the site is leased.
(2)Three sites are jointly owned with minority interest partners.
(3)Non-operating sites consist of owned and leased real properties, some of which are sublet to external parties.
28 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
We consider all operating properties, both owned and leased, to be well-maintained, in good operating condition and suitable and
adequate to carry on our business. For further discussion of our operating properties, see “AMR-Business,” “AMR-Distribution,”
“CSS-Business” and “CSS-Distribution” in Part I, Item 1 of this report
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
From time to time, we are involved in various litigation matters that arise in the ordinary course of business involving normal and
routine claims, including environmental compliance matters. Such proceedings include, but are not limited to, proceedings relating
to our status as a potentially responsible party with respect to the Portland Harbor Superfund Site, proceedings relating to other
legacy environmental issues, and proceedings arising from accidents involving Company-owned vehicles, including Company
tractor trailers. For additional information regarding such matters, see Note 9 - Commitments and Contingencies in the Notes to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report. Except as described in such Note, we currently believe that the
ultimate outcome of these proceedings, individually or in the aggregate, will not have a material adverse effect on our consolidated
financial position, results of operations, cash flows or business.
In fiscal 2013, the Commonwealth of Massachusetts advised us of alleged violations of environmental requirements, including but
not limited to those related to air emissions and hazardous waste management, at our operations in the Commonwealth. We actively
engaged in discussions with the Commonwealth's representatives, which resulted in a settlement agreement to resolve the alleged
violations. A consent judgment was jointly filed with and entered by the Superior Court for the County of Suffolk, Commonwealth
of Massachusetts on September 24, 2015. The settlement involved a $450 thousand cash payment, an additional $450 thousand in
suspended payments to be waived upon completion of a shredder emission control system and certain other specified milestones, and
$350 thousand in supplemental environmental projects that we have completed.
We are continuing settlement discussions with the Alameda County District Attorney and the California Office of the Attorney
General (COAG), the latter on behalf of certain state agencies, regarding alleged violations of environmental requirements, including
but not limited to those related to hazardous waste management and water quality, at one of our operations in California stemming
from investigations initiated in 2013 and inspections conducted in 2015. In conjunction with the on-going settlement discussions, we
have completed or have underway various facility upgrades funded through our capital expenditure budget that we believe resolve
the underlying environmental concerns identified by the agencies. We have also continued to dispute certain of the allegations that
have been raised and maintain that the operational practices giving rise to those allegations were in compliance with applicable laws.
To date, no complaint has been filed by the District Attorney or the State of California, although we anticipate that the settlement of
this matter will ultimately involve the simultaneous filing of a complaint and a stipulation (settlement). We have agreed to settle the
matter for $4.1 million, of which $2.05 million is for civil penalties and reimbursement of the agencies’ enforcement costs and $2.05
million will fund Supplemental Environmental Projects. The settlement is subject to finalization of the stipulation and settlement
agreement and final approval by the agencies of the settlement.
The COAG has also received a formal enforcement referral relating to another facility that we operate in California. This matter
grew out of a Department of Toxic Substances Control (DTSC) inspection of the facility in 2013 and subsequent issuance of a
Summary of Violations in 2015 setting forth a number of alleged violations relating to hazardous waste management requirements.
We disputed the allegations in our response to the Summary of Violations, and DTSC referred the matter to COAG. While COAG,
DTSC and Schnitzer Fresno, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary, which operates the facility, agreed in April 2018 to settle the matter
for $490 thousand, of which $368 thousand shall be paid as a civil penalty and $122 thousand shall be paid for agency investigation
and enforcement costs, the parties were not able to reach agreement on the injunctive terms of the settlement agreement, and on June
25, 2020, the COAG, on behalf of DTSC, served a complaint for permanent injunction and civil penalties on Schnitzer Fresno, Inc.
that was filed in the Superior Court of the State of California, County of Fresno. While we plan to continue to pursue settlement
discussions consistent with the previously agreed terms, we are vigorously defending against the action. We do not believe the
resolution of this matter will be material to our financial position, results of operations, cash flows or liquidity.
In July 2017, we were informed that the New Hampshire Office of the Attorney General (NHOAG) is contemplating bringing a civil
action in connection with a legacy environmental issue at a closed facility in New Hampshire owned and previously operated by
New England Metal Recycling LLC (NEMR), an indirectly wholly-owned subsidiary. This matter had been formally referred to the
NHOAG and relates to subsurface automotive shredder residue (ASR) located at the site that we discovered and self-reported in
response to findings from a routine inspection of the site by the New Hampshire Department of Environmental Services (NHDES) in
May 2015. It appears that this subsurface ASR dates back to 2006 or before and may have resulted from the failure to complete a
corrective action plan in 2006, although a former NEMR employee reported at the time that the work had been completed. In April
2017, NEMR received a letter of deficiency alleging violations of environmental requirements relating to the characterization and
disposal of hazardous waste in connection with the subsurface ASR. We have commenced removal of a portion of the material and
are finalizing agreement with the NHDES on a remedial action plan for the remainder of the material. On June 15, 2018, the
NHOAG sent a letter indicating their intent to
29 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
file a petition seeking civil penalties and injunctive relief in this matter. The letter included a draft petition and stated the NHOAG’s
interest in beginning negotiations which may lead to a resolution of this matter. NEMR has entered into a consent decree with the
NHOAG, acting on behalf of NHDES, to resolve the enforcement matter, including a civil penalty in the amount of $2.7 million and
the schedule for completing the remaining remedial work.
In January 2018, the Company received a finding of violation letter from EPA with respect to alleged violations of environmental
requirements stemming from refrigerant recovery management program inspections at 12 of our facilities in the New England and
Pacific Northwest regions in July 2017 and November 2017. Except with respect to a minor and now corrected non-compliance
matter at one facility, we believe that we have fully complied with the relevant regulations. Nevertheless, in December 2017 and
prior to receipt of the EPA letter, we implemented improvements to our refrigerant recovery management program to further
strengthen that program, including improvements to address concerns raised by EPA during the inspections. We have conferred with
EPA regarding the alleged violations and are in negotiations with EPA to settle this matter. Based on the settlement discussions to
date and the program improvements we have implemented or have proposed to implement, we do not believe that the outcome of
this matter will be material to our financial position, results of operations, cash flows or liquidity.
In February 2019, the Company received a letter sent on behalf of the District Attorneys for six counties in California notifying the
Company of a joint investigation into the alleged mishandling of hazardous materials and hazardous waste and into the Company’s
disposal practices, as well as alleged water pollution violations, at various Pick-n-Pull locations within California and requesting a
meeting to discuss the alleged violations. Due to the Company’s commitment to compliance with environmental requirements we are
implementing additional compliance measures. Based on these additional actions and the initial discussions with the District
Attorneys’ offices, we expect to negotiate a settlement of this matter that will address the concerns raised in this joint investigation.
There has been no discussion to date of potential monetary sanctions.
In July 2019, the Company received a Notice of Violation (NOV) from the Bay Area Air Quality Management District (BAAQMD)
with respect to alleged violations of a BAAQMD rule identified through testing conducted following the installation of additional
emission controls at one of our facilities in Oakland, California. Prior testing and all previously known industry data had indicated
the facility was in compliance with this BAAQMD rule. Upon receipt of the emerging testing data, the Company responded
appropriately by submitting applications to the BAAQMD for a Title V Major Source air permit in October 2018 and to install
additional emission control equipment in July 2019. These pro-active actions and permitting efforts were expected to preclude
enforcement associated with the new emissions information. However, during the course of its review of the permit applications,
BAAQMD determined that formal resolution of the NOV is warranted because current emissions exceed thresholds set in the
BAAQMD rule. BAAQMD and the Company have agreed on the terms of a Compliance and Settlement Agreement (CSA) to cover
the period pending installation of the additional emissions controls. The CSA provides for the payment of a civil penalty in the
amount of $400,000, a suspended payment in the amount of $100,000 to be forgiven in the event the Company completes the
compliance work by the agreed deadline and the purchase by the Company of certain emission reduction credits.
In addition, based on its evaluation of data requested during a June 2019 inspection, EPA issued a NOV in January 2020 alleging the
same BAAQMD rule violation discussed above and also alleging violations of Title V Major Source permitting requirements. The
Company maintains that our timely filing of a Title V Major Source permit application as noted above constitutes compliance with
Title V Major Source rules and that EPA’s Title V non-compliance allegations are erroneous. The Company has conveyed that
position to EPA and has provided EPA with documentation requested by EPA confirming our position. The Company also has
requested that the alleged BAAQMD rule violation be addressed solely through the CSA with BAAQMD and that federal
“overfiling” is unnecessary and inappropriate in the circumstances. Based on the discussions to date, we do not believe the outcome
of this matter will be material to our financial position, results of operations, cash flows or liquidity.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
30 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
PART II
 
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Our Class A common stock is listed on the NASDAQ Global Select Market (“NASDAQ”) under the symbol SCHN. There were 159
holders of record of Class A common stock on October 20, 2020. Our Class A common stock has been trading since November 16,
1993. There was one holder of record of Class B common stock on October 20, 2020. Our Class B common stock is not publicly
traded.
We declared our 106th consecutive quarterly dividend in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020. The payment of future dividends is subject
to approval by our Board of Directors and continued compliance with the terms of our credit agreement. See Management’s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations in Part II, Item 7 of this report for further discussion of
our credit agreement.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Pursuant to a share repurchase program as amended in 2001, 2006 and 2008, we were authorized to repurchase up to nine million
shares of our Class A common stock when management deems such repurchases to be appropriate. We may repurchase our common
stock for a variety of reasons, such as to optimize our capital structure and to offset dilution related to share-based compensation
arrangements. We consider several factors in determining whether to make share repurchases including, among other factors, our
cash needs, the availability of funding, our future business plans and the market price of our stock. We repurchased approximately
527 thousand shares for a total of $13 million in open-market transactions in fiscal 2019, and approximately 53 thousand shares for a
total of $0.9 million in open-market transactions in fiscal 2020. No share repurchases occurred in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020.
As of August 31, 2020, there were approximately 706 thousand shares available for repurchase under the program.
The share repurchase program does not require us to acquire any specific number of shares, and we may suspend, extend or
terminate the program at any time without prior notice and the program may be executed through open-market purchases, privately
negotiated transactions or utilizing Rule 10b5-1 programs.
 
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans
See Note 13 - Share-Based Compensation in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report for
information regarding securities authorized for issuance under share-based compensation plans.
31 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Performance Graph
The following graph and related information compares cumulative total shareholder return on our Class A common stock for the
five-year period from September 1, 2015 through August 31, 2020, with the cumulative total return for the same period of (i) the
S&P 500 Steel Index and (ii) the S&P 600 Metals & Mining Index. These comparisons assume an investment of $100 at the
commencement of the five-year period and that all dividends are reinvested. The stock performance outlined in the performance
graph below is not necessarily indicative of our future performance, and we do not endorse any predictions as to future stock
performance.
 
 
 
  Year Ended August 31,  
  2015   2016   2017   2018   2019   2020  
Schnitzer Steel Industries(1)  $ 100  $ 113  $ 168  $ 169  $ 146  $ 136 
S&P 500 Steel  $ 100  $ 112  $ 127  $ 144  $ 113  $ 105 
S&P 600 Metals & Mining  $ 100  $ 101  $ 134  $ 139  $ 91  $ 90
 
 
(1)Because of the composition of our major product categories, we have no direct market peer issuers.
 
32 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
The following table sets forth selected consolidated financial and other data for each of the five years ended August 31, 2020. The
selected consolidated financial and other data presented below should be read in conjunction with Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations set forth in Part II, Item 7 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K and the
consolidated financial statements and the accompanying notes set forth in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
 
  Year ended August 31,  
   2020    2019    2018    2017    2016  
STATEMENT  OF OPERA TIONS DA TA:                     
(in thousands, except per share amounts)                     
Revenues  $1,712,343   $2,132,781   $2,364,715   $1,687,591   $1,352,543  
Operating income (loss) (1)  $ 6,854   $ 83,865   $ 148,988   $ 56,013   $ (7,842 )
(Loss) income from continuing operations  $ (2,105 ) $ 58,570   $ 159,443   $ 47,368   $ (16,240 )
(Loss) income from discontinued operations,
   net of tax  $ (95) $ (248 ) $ 346  $ (390 ) $ (1,348 )
Net (loss) income attributable to SSI shareholders  $ (4,145 ) $ 56,345   $ 156,451   $ 44,51 1  $ (19,409 )
(Loss) income per share from continuing operations
   attributable to SSI shareholders (diluted)  $ (0.15 ) $ 2.01  $ 5.46  $ 1.60  $ (0.66 )
Net (loss) income per share attributable to SSI
shareholders (diluted)  $ (0.15 ) $ 2.00  $ 5.47  $ 1.58  $ (0.71 )
Dividends declared per common share  $ 0.75  $ 0.75  $ 0.75  $ 0.75  $ 0.75 
OTHER DA TA:                     
Sales volumes (in thousands) (2):                     
AMR recycled ferrous metal (L T)(3)   3,372    3,740    3,708    3,145    2,899  
AMR recycled nonferrous metal (pounds)   497,508    608,294    571,705    540,791    473,737  
CSS finished steel products (ST)   505   478   519   496   488 
Average net selling price (2)(4):                     
AMR recycled ferrous metal (per L T)  $ 236  $ 289  $ 317  $ 242  $ 193 
AMR recycled nonferrous metal (per pound)  $ 0.55  $ 0.59  $ 0.72  $ 0.63  $ 0.60 
CSS finished steel products (per ST)  $ 630  $ 713  $ 666  $ 534  $ 522
 
 
  August 31,  
   2020    2019    2018    2017    2016  
BALANCE SHEET  DATA (in thousands):                     
Total assets  $1,229,927   $1,160,746   $1,104,817   $ 933,755   $ 891,429  
Long-term debt, net of current maturities  $ 102,235   $ 103,775   $ 106,237   $ 144,403   $ 184,144
 
 
(1)Operating income in fiscal 2020 includes asset impairment charges of $6 million and restructuring charges and other exit-related activities of $9 million.
Operating loss in fiscal 2016 includes a goodwill impairment charge of $9 million, asset impairment charges of $21 million, and restructuring charges and other
exit-related activities of $7 million. Each of asset impairment charges and restructuring charges and other exit-related activities were $1 million or less in each of
fiscal 2019, 2018, and 2017.
(2)Tons for recycled ferrous metal are LT (Long Ton, which is equivalent to 2,240 pounds) and for finished steel products are ST (Short Ton, which is equivalent to
2,000 pounds).
(3)The Company sold to external customers or delivered to its steel mill an aggregate of 3,954 thousand, 4,319 thousand, 4,299 thousand, 3,628 thousand, and
3,289 thousand tons of ferrous recycled scrap metal in fiscal 2020, 2019, 2018, 2017, and 2016, respectively. Company-wide ferrous volumes include total
ferrous sales volumes for AMR, ferrous tons sold externally by CSS, and ferrous tons delivered by CSS’s metals recycling operations to its steel mill, net of
inter-segment eliminations.
(4)In accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, the Company’s revenues include amounts billed to customers for freight; however, average net
selling prices are shown net of amounts billed for freight.
 
33 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
This section includes a discussion of our operations for the fiscal years ended August 31, 2020 and 2019. The following discussion
and analysis provides information which management believes is relevant to an assessment and understanding of our financial
condition and results of operations. The discussion should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements and the
related notes thereto in Part II, Item 8 of this report and the Selected Financial Data contained in Part II, Item 6 of this report.
For discussion of our results of operations for fiscal year 2018 including comparison to fiscal 2019 refer to Part II, Item 7.
Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
year ended August 31, 2019, which was filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on October 24, 2019.
Business
Founded in 1906, Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. (“SSI”), an Oregon corporation, is one of North America’s largest recyclers of
ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal, including end-of-life vehicles, and a manufacturer of finished steel products.
Our internal organizational and reporting structure includes two operating and reportable segments: the Auto and Metals Recycling
(“AMR”) business and the Cascade Steel and Scrap (“CSS”) business.
We use segment operating income to measure our segment performance. We do not allocate corporate interest income and expense,
income taxes and other income and expense to our segments. Certain expenses related to shared services that support operational
activities and transactions are allocated from Corporate to the segments. Unallocated Corporate expense consists primarily of
expense for management and certain administrative services that benefit both segments. In addition, we do not allocate certain items
to segment operating income because management does not include the information in its measurement of the performance of the
segments. Such unallocated items include restructuring charges and other exit-related activities, charges (net of recoveries) related to
legacy environmental matters and provisions for certain legal matters. Because of the unallocated income and expense, the operating
income of each segment does not reflect the operating income the segment would report as a stand-alone business. The results of
discontinued operations are excluded from segment operating income and are presented separately, net of tax, from the results of
ongoing operations for all periods presented.
In April 2020, we announced our intention to modify our internal organizational and reporting structure to a functionally based,
integrated model. We will consolidate our operations, sales, services and other functional capabilities at an enterprise level. This
change in structure is intended to result in a more agile organization and solidify recent productivity improvement and cost reduction
initiatives. We expect to complete this transition in the first quarter of fiscal 2021 resulting in a single operating and reportable
segment.
See Note 18 - Segment Information in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report for further
information regarding our current reportable segments, including a discussion of the primary activities of each reportable segment,
total assets by reportable segment, operating results from continuing operations by reportable segment, revenues from external
customers and concentration of sales to foreign countries.
Our results of operations depend in large part on the demand and prices for recycled metal in foreign and domestic markets and on
the supply of raw materials, including end-of-life vehicles, available to be processed at our facilities. We respond to changes in
selling prices for processed metal by seeking to adjust purchase prices for unprocessed scrap metal in order to manage the impact on
our operating income. We believe we generally benefit from sustained periods of stable or rising recycled scrap metal selling prices,
which allow us to better maintain or increase both operating income and unprocessed scrap metal flow into our facilities. When
recycled scrap metal selling prices decline, either sharply or for a sustained period, our operating margins typically compress.
Our deep water port facilities on both the East and West Coasts of the U.S. (in Everett, Massachusetts; Providence, Rhode Island;
Oakland, California; Tacoma, Washington; and Portland, Oregon) and access to public deep water port facilities (in Kapolei, Hawaii
and Salinas, Puerto Rico) allow us to efficiently meet the global demand for recycled ferrous metal by enabling us to ship bulk
cargoes to steel manufacturers located in Europe, Africa, the Middle East, Asia, North America, Central America and South America.
Our exports of nonferrous recycled metal are shipped in containers through various public docks to specialty steelmakers, foundries,
aluminum sheet and ingot manufacturers, copper refineries and smelters, brass and bronze ingot manufacturers, wire and cable
producers, wholesalers, and other recycled metal processors globally. We also transport both ferrous and nonferrous metals by truck,
rail and barge in order to transfer scrap metal between our facilities for further processing, to load shipments at our export facilities,
and to meet regional domestic demand.
34 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Our results of operations also depend on the demand and prices for our finished steel products, the manufacture of which uses
internally sourced ferrous recycled scrap metal as the primary feedstock, as well as other raw materials. Our steel mill in Oregon
sells to industrial customers primarily in North America.
Our quarterly operating results fluctuate based on a variety of factors including, but not limited to, changes in market conditions for
ferrous and nonferrous recycled metal and finished steel products, the supply of scrap metal in our domestic markets, and varying
demand for used auto parts from our self-service retail stores. Certain of these factors are influenced, to a degree, by the impact of
seasonal changes including severe weather conditions, which can impact the timing of shipments and inhibit construction activity
utilizing our products, scrap metal collection at our facilities and production levels in our yards, and retail admissions and parts sales
at our auto parts stores. Further, trade actions, including tariffs and any retaliation by affected countries, and licensing and inspection
requirements can impact the level of profitability on sales of our products and, in certain cases, impede or restrict our ability to sell to
certain export markets or require us to direct our sales to alternative market destinations, which can cause our quarterly operating
results to fluctuate. For further information regarding the potential impact of changing conditions in global markets including the
impact of sanctions and tariffs, quotas and other trade actions and import restrictions on our business and results of operations, see
Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors of this report.
Strategic Priorities
As we continue to closely monitor economic conditions, we remain focused on the following core strategies and plans to meet our
business goals and objectives:
 •Long-term expansion of ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal supply and processing, sales volumes and operating margins;
 •Technology investments and process improvements to increase the separation and recovery of recycled materials from our
shredding process and to expand product optionality;
 •Development of new products and expansion of recycling services and capabilities to reach a broader market, enhance
customer value and increase operating margins;
 •Productivity and continuous improvement initiatives to ensure the safety of our employees, increase operating efficiency
and effectiveness, advance sustainable business practices, improve natural resource stewardship, and reduce operating
expense;
 •Use of our seven deep water ports and ground-based logistics network to directly access customers domestically and
internationally to meet demand for our products wherever it is greatest;
 •Further optimization of our integrated recycling and steel manufacturing operating platforms to maximize opportunities for
synergies, cost efficiencies and volumes; and
 •Increase market share through initiatives to maximize volumes and through selective partnerships, alliances and
acquisitions.
Key economic factors and trends affecting the industries in which we operate
We sell recycled metals to the global steel industry for the production of finished steel. Our financial results largely depend on
supply of raw materials in the U.S. and Western Canada and demand for recycled metal in foreign and domestic markets and for
finished steel products in the Western U.S. Demand for most of our products is cyclical in nature and sensitive to changes in general
economic conditions. The timing and magnitude of the economic cycles in the industries in which our products are used, including
global steel manufacturing and nonresidential and infrastructure construction in the U.S., are difficult to predict. Global economic
conditions, including impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic discussed below in this section, changes in supply and demand conditions,
the strength of the U.S. dollar, the availability and price of raw material alternatives, and trade actions such as tariffs affect market
prices for and sales volumes of recycled ferrous and nonferrous metal in global markets and steel products in the Western U.S. and
can have a significant impact on the results of operations for our reportable segments.
In fiscal 2020, operating results at AMR decreased significantly compared to fiscal 2019 as weaker market conditions resulted in
declining commodity prices and lower sales prices and volumes for our recycled metal products compared to the prior year. AMR
experienced operating margin compression in fiscal 2020 as declining average net selling prices for our recycled metal products
outpaced the reduction in purchase costs for raw materials. Market conditions for recycled metals weakened entering fiscal 2020 due
to softer demand for finished steel globally at the time and structural changes to the market for certain recycled nonferrous products
resulting primarily from Chinese import restrictions and tariffs. Market selling prices for ferrous recycled metal declined by
approximately $60 per ton, or approximately 20%, between the beginning of August 2019 and October 2019, before recovering
moderately during the remainder of the first half of fiscal 2020. Global economic conditions deteriorated significantly beginning in
March 2020 in large part due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic resulting in weaker market conditions for recycled metals
and steel products. Market selling prices for ferrous recycled metal declined by approximately $70 per ton, or approximately 25%, in
March
35 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
2020. The sharply declining price environment in combination with economic and other restrictions on suppliers relating to COVID-
19 severely constricted the supply of scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles, which resulted in significantly lower processed
volumes and a substantial adverse impact on operating margins and overall operating results at AMR. Market selling prices for
ferrous recycled metal began to recover in May 2020 and continued to improve through the end of fiscal 2020, resulting in stronger
demand for our products in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020 compared to the prior quarter.
In fiscal 2019, market conditions for recycled metals weakened primarily due to slower global economic growth and the effects of
tariffs and other regulatory measures, resulting in lower average net selling prices for our ferrous and nonferrous recycled metal
products and lower ferrous export sales volumes compared to fiscal 2018. Operating results at AMR in fiscal 2019 decreased
significantly compared to fiscal 2018 as a result of operating margin compression from the decline in average net selling prices for
our recycled metal products which outpaced the reduction in purchase costs for raw materials. Domestic ferrous sales volumes in
fiscal 2019 increased compared to the prior year, reflecting strong demand in the U.S. market particularly during the first half of
fiscal 2019, partially offsetting the adverse impact of the weaker ferrous export market conditions and lower average net selling
prices. Nonferrous average net selling prices in fiscal 2019 decreased significantly compared to fiscal 2018 primarily reflecting
reduced demand for nonferrous products globally, as well as the continued impact of Chinese import restrictions and tariffs on
certain nonferrous products put into place starting in the second half of fiscal 2018.
In fiscal 2020, CSS was impacted by an overall lower price environment for finished steel products compared to the prior year and,
partially due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic, reduced sales of ferrous recycled scrap metal. The effects of COVID-19 did
not have a significant impact on sales volumes for our finished steel products as demand in West Coast construction markets
remained steady.
In fiscal 2019, CSS benefited from reduced pressure from steel imports and higher net selling prices for finished steel products
particularly during the first quarter of fiscal 2019, resulting in higher finished steel margins in fiscal 2019 compared to fiscal 2018.
However, these benefits were more than offset by lower finished steel and recycled metal sales volumes and increased steel-making
consumables costs compared to fiscal 2018, resulting in lower operating results at CSS year-over-year.
Coronavirus Disease 2019 (“COVID-19”)
In March 2020, the World Health Organization characterized COVID-19 as a pandemic, and the President of the United States
declared the COVID-19 outbreak a national emergency. The outbreak resulted in governments around the world implementing
stringent measures to help control the spread of the virus, followed by phased regulations and guidelines for reopening communities
and economies. In addition, governments and central banks in several parts of the world have enacted fiscal and monetary stimulus
measures to counteract the impacts of COVID-19. For example, on March 27, 2020, the President of the United States signed and
enacted into law the Coronavirus Aid, Relief and Economic Security (“CARES”) Act, a $2 trillion economic relief bill aimed at
supporting individuals and businesses affected by the pandemic and economic downturn. See “Income Taxes” within Results of
Operations below in this Item 7 for discussion of the impact of the CARES Act on our accounting for income taxes.
We are a company operating in a critical infrastructure industry, as defined by the U.S. Department of Homeland Security. Consistent
with federal guidelines and with state and local orders to date, we have continued to operate across our footprint throughout the
COVID-19 pandemic. Ensuring the health and welfare of our employees, and all who visit our sites, is our top priority and we are
following all U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and state and local health department guidelines. Further, we
implemented infection control measures at all our sites and put in place restrictions on travel and in-person meetings and other
physical distancing measures. Notwithstanding our continued operations, COVID-19 has negatively impacted and may have further
unfavorable impacts on our financial performance, operations, supply chain and flows of raw materials, transportation and logistics
networks and customers. Due in large part to the impacts of and response to the spread of COVID-19, global economic conditions
declined sharply during the third quarter of fiscal 2020, resulting in historic unemployment levels, rapid changes in supply and
demand in certain industry sectors, businesses switching to remote work or ceasing operations, and consumers eliminating,
restricting or redirecting spending. The economic downturn adversely affected demand for our products and contributed to weaker
supply and demand conditions affecting prices and volumes in the markets for our products, services and raw materials. Global
economic conditions partially recovered during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020, resulting in improved demand for our products
compared to the third quarter. During fiscal 2020, in particular the third quarter, our operations, margins and results were adversely
impacted by lower sales volumes of recycled metals driven by severely constrained supplies of scrap metal including end-of-life
vehicles, leading to lower processed volumes at our recycling facilities. We also experienced significant decreases in selling prices
for our recycled metal products, softer demand, supply chain disruptions, reduced availability of shipping containers, and other
logistics constraints.
36 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
While we expect the COVID-19 pandemic to continue to negatively impact our results of operations, cash flows and financial
position, the current level of uncertainty over the economic and operational impacts of COVID-19 means the related financial impact
cannot be reasonably estimated at this time. For further discussion of the risks related to this matter, refer to Risk Factors in Part I,
Item 1A of this report.
Executive Overview of Financial Results
We generated consolidated revenues of $1.7 billion in fiscal 2020, a decrease of 20% from the $2.1 billion of consolidated revenues
generated in fiscal 2019, primarily due to significantly lower average net selling prices for our ferrous, nonferrous and finished steel
products, and reduced ferrous and nonferrous sales volumes compared to the prior year. These decreases were driven by weaker
market conditions for recycled metals and steel products compared to the prior year including as a result of the sharp decline in
global economic conditions during the third quarter of fiscal 2020 primarily due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic. Market
selling prices for ferrous recycled metal declined sharply by approximately $70 per ton, or approximately 25%, in March 2020,
before gradually recovering through the end of the fiscal year. In fiscal 2020, the average net selling prices for ferrous and
nonferrous recycled metal at AMR were 18% and 7% lower, respectively, compared to the prior year. Steel revenues in fiscal 2020
decreased by 8% compared to the prior year reflecting the impact of lower average net selling prices for our finished steel products
partially offset by higher finished steel sales volumes compared to the prior year.
Consolidated operating income was $7 million in fiscal 2020, compared to $84 million in fiscal 2019. Adjusted consolidated
operating income was $27 million in fiscal 2020, compared to $89 million in fiscal 2019. See the reconciliation of adjusted
consolidated operating income in Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the end of this Item 7.
AMR reported operating income in fiscal 2020 of $34 million, compared to $96 million in the prior year period. The decrease in
AMR operating results in fiscal 2020 was primarily the result of operating margin compression from the decline in average net
selling prices for our ferrous and nonferrous products which outpaced the reduction in purchase costs for raw materials. AMR’s
fiscal 2020 operating margins and overall operating results were adversely impacted by periods of sharply declining commodity
prices and reduced scrap metal supply flows due to weaker market conditions for recycled metals, including during the third quarter
of fiscal 2020 in large part due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic. Market selling prices for ferrous recycled metal began to
recover in May 2020 and continued to improve through the end of fiscal 2020, resulting in stronger demand for our products and
improved scrap metal supply flows in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020 compared to the prior quarter. The adverse effects of the
market conditions on AMR’s operating results in fiscal 2020 were partially offset by benefits from productivity and restructuring
initiatives implemented during the year.
CSS reported operating income of $23 million in fiscal 2020, compared to $32 million in the prior year, with the decrease primarily
reflecting the impact of the lower price environment compared to the prior year. Finished steel average net selling prices in fiscal
2020 declined $83 per ton, or 12%, compared to the prior year, the adverse effects of which were partially offset by higher finished
steel sales volumes and benefits from productivity initiatives compared to the prior year.
Consolidated selling, general and administrative (“SG&A”) expense in fiscal 2020 decreased by $4 million, or 2%, compared to the
prior year primarily driven by lower employee-related expenses as a result of cost savings initiatives and reduced travel resulting
from restrictions due to COVID-19, partially offset by higher legacy and other environmental-related expenses.
Net loss from continuing operations attributable to SSI shareholders in fiscal 2020 was $(4) million, or $(0.15) per diluted share,
compared to income of $57 million, or $2.01 per diluted share, in the prior year. Adjusted net income from continuing operations
attributable to SSI shareholders in fiscal 2020 was $12 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, compared to $61 million, or $2.16 per
diluted share, in the prior year. See the reconciliation of adjusted net (loss) income from continuing operations attributable to SSI
shareholders and adjusted diluted (loss) earnings per share from continuing operations attributable to SSI shareholders in Non-
GAAP Financial Measures at the end of this Item 7.
The following items further highlight selected liquidity and capital structure metrics:
 •Net cash provided by operating activities of $125 million in fiscal 2020, compared to $145 million in the prior year;
 •Debt of $104 million as of August 31, 2020, compared to $105 million as of the prior year-end;
 •Debt, net of cash, of $87 million as of August 31, 2020, compared to $93 million as of the prior year-end (see the
reconciliation of debt, net of cash, in Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the end of this Item 7).
 
37 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Results of Operations
 
  For the Year Ended August 31,  
              % Increase / (Decrease)  
($ in thousands)  2020   2019   2018   2020 vs
2019  2019 vs 2018 
Revenues:                     
Auto and Metals Recycling  $1,307,812  $1,684,977  $1,908,966   (22)%  (12)%
Cascade Steel and Scrap   413,257   459,416   480,641   (10)%  (4)%
Intercompany revenue eliminations(1)   (8,726)  (11,612)  (24,892)  (25)%  (53)%
Total revenues   1,712,343   2,132,781   2,364,715   (20)%  (10)%
Cost of goods sold:                     
Auto and Metals Recycling   1,138,063   1,458,212   1,607,628   (22)%  (9)%
Cascade Steel and Scrap   374,512   412,209   427,459   (9)%  (4)%
Intercompany cost of goods sold
eliminations(1)   (8,850)  (11,886)  (24,602)  (26)%  (52)%
Total cost of goods sold   1,503,725   1,858,535   2,010,485   (19)%  (8)%
Selling, general and administrative expense:                     
Auto and Metals Recycling   130,006   130,920   133,044   (1)%  (2)%
Cascade Steel and Scrap   16,302   16,499   17,044   (1)%  (3)%
Corporate(2)   41,568   43,986   58,789   (5)%  (25)%
Total selling, general and administrative
   expense   187,876   191,405   208,877   (2)%  (8)%
(Income) loss from joint ventures:                     
Auto and Metals Recycling   (294)  (209)  107   41% NM 
Cascade Steel and Scrap   (540)  (1,243)  (2,060)  (57)%  (40)%
Total income from joint ventures   (834)  (1,452)  (1,953)  (43)%  (26)%
Asset impairment charges (recoveries), net:                     
Auto and Metals Recycling   5,599   63   (933) NM  NM 
Cascade Steel and Scrap   —   —   (88) NM  NM 
Corporate   130   —   —  NM  NM 
Total asset impairment charges (recoveries), net  5,729   63   (1,021) NM  NM 
Operating income:                     
Auto and Metals Recycling   34,438   95,991   169,120   (64)%  (43)%
Cascade Steel and Scrap   22,983   31,951   38,286   (28)%  (17)%
Segment operating income   57,421   127,942   207,406   (55)%  (38)%
Restructuring (charges) recoveries and other
   exit-related activities(3)   (8,993)  (365)  661  NM  NM 
Corporate expense(2)   (41,699)  (43,986)  (58,789)  (5)%  (25)%
Change in intercompany profit elimination(4)  125   274   (290)  (54)% NM 
Total operating income   6,854  $ 83,865  $148,988   (92)%  (44)%
 
NM = Not meaningful
(1)Intercompany sales of recycled metal are at prices that approximate local market rates. These intercompany revenues and cost of goods sold are eliminated in
consolidation.
(2)Corporate expense consists primarily of unallocated expenses for management and certain administrative services that benefit both reportable segments.
(3)Restructuring charges and other exit-related activities consist of expense for severance, contract termination and other restructuring costs that management does
not include in its measurement of the performance of the reportable segments.
(4)Intercompany profits are not recognized until the finished products are sold to third parties; therefore, intercompany profit is eliminated while the products
remain in inventory.
38 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
We operate our business across two reportable segments: AMR and CSS. Additional financial information relating to these
reportable segments is contained in Note 18 - Segment Information in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II,
Item 8 of this report.
Auto and Metals Recycling (AMR)
 
  For the Year Ended August 31,  
              % Increase / (Decrease) 
($ in thousands, except for prices)  2020   2019   2018   2020 vs 2019  2019 vs 2018 
Ferrous revenues  $825,316  $1,123,180  $1,288,287   (27)%  (13)%
Nonferrous revenues   360,308   430,361   481,777   (16)%  (11)%
Retail and other revenues   122,188   131,436   138,902   (7)%  (5)%
Total segment revenues   1,307,812   1,684,977   1,908,966   (22)%  (12)%
Cost of goods sold   1,138,063   1,458,212   1,607,628   (22)%  (9)%
Selling, general and administrative expense   130,006   130,920   133,044   (1)%  (2)%
(Income) loss from joint ventures   (294)  (209)  107   41% NM 
Asset impairment charges (recoveries), net   5,599   63   (933) NM  NM 
Segment operating income  $ 34,438  $ 95,991  $169,120   (64)%  (43)%
Average recycled ferrous metal sales prices
($/LT):(1)                     
Domestic  $ 219  $ 272  $ 291   (19)%  (7)%
Foreign  $ 241  $ 295  $ 328   (18)%  (10)%
Average  $ 236  $ 289  $ 317   (18)%  (9)%
Ferrous sales volume (LT, in thousands):                     
Domestic   993   1,265   1,085   (22)%  17%
Foreign   2,379   2,475   2,623   (4)%  (6)%
Total ferrous sales volume (LT, in thousands)   3,372   3,740   3,708   (10)%  1%
Average nonferrous sales price ($/pound)(1)(2)  $ 0.55  $ 0.59  $ 0.72   (7)%  (18)%
Nonferrous sales volumes (pounds, in thousands)
(2)   497,508   608,294   571,705   (18)%  6%
Cars purchased (in thousands)(3)   316   386   424   (18)%  (9)%
Number of auto parts stores at period end   50   51   52   (2)%  (2)%
 
LT = Long Ton, which is equivalent to 2,240 pounds
NM = Not meaningful
(1)Price information is shown after netting the cost of freight incurred to deliver the product to the customer.
(2)Average sales price and volume information excludes platinum group metals (“PGMs”) in catalytic converters.
(3)Cars purchased by auto parts stores only.
AMR Segment Revenues
Revenues in fiscal 2020 decreased by 22% compared to fiscal 2019 primarily due to significantly lower average net selling prices for
our ferrous and nonferrous products, and reduced sales volumes when compared to fiscal 2019. The decrease was driven by weaker
market conditions for recycled metals when compared to the prior year, including as a result of the sharp decline in global economic
conditions during the third quarter of fiscal 2020 due in large part to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic. Nonferrous revenues
in fiscal 2020 decreased by 16% compared to the prior year, as average net selling prices decreased by 7% compared to fiscal 2019,
primarily reflecting structural changes to the market for certain recycled nonferrous products resulting primarily from Chinese
import restrictions and tariffs.
39 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
AMR Segment Operating Income
Operating income for fiscal 2020 was $34 million, compared to $96 million in fiscal 2019. The decrease in AMR operating results in
fiscal 2020 was primarily the result of operating margin compression from the decline in average net selling prices for our ferrous
and nonferrous products which outpaced the reduction in purchase costs for raw materials. AMR’s fiscal 2020 operating margins and
overall operating results were adversely impacted by periods of sharply declining commodity prices experienced during the first and
third quarters of fiscal 2020, due to weaker market conditions for recycled metals. Market conditions partially recovered during the
fourth quarter of fiscal 2020, resulting in a moderate improvement in sales volumes and net selling prices for our ferrous and
nonferrous products compared to the third quarter and an increase in scrap metal supply flows.
Ferrous metal spreads at AMR in fiscal 2020 and average net selling prices for its nonferrous joint products that are recovered from
the shredding process, comprising primarily zorba, declined by approximately 16% and 11%, respectively, compared to the prior
year. The lower price environment in combination with the impact of economic slowdowns and other restrictions on suppliers
relating to COVID-19 also severely constricted the supply of scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles, primarily in the third
quarter, which resulted in lower processed volumes compared to the prior year. The lower average ferrous and nonferrous selling
prices in fiscal 2020 also reflected the effects of tariffs and other regulatory measures on demand for recycled metals in our export
markets, the weaker price environment for recycled metals in our domestic markets, and reduced demand for nonferrous products
globally. The adverse effects of the market conditions on AMR’s operating results in fiscal 2020 were partially offset by positive
contributions from increased sales revenues from higher priced PGM products compared to the prior year and benefits from
productivity and restructuring initiatives implemented subsequent to the prior year. AMR SG&A expense in fiscal 2020 decreased by
$1 million, or 1%, compared to the end of the prior year primarily due to lower employee-related and advertising expenses, partially
offset by higher charges related to environmental matters. Operating results at AMR in fiscal 2019 included $20 million in positive
contributions from a limited-duration contract, which was substantially complete at the end of fiscal 2019, and which had provided a
high margin source of supply.
Cascade Steel and Scrap (CSS)
 
  For the Year Ended August 31,  
               % Increase / (Decrease) 
($ in thousands, except price)  2020   2019   2018   2020 vs 2019  2019 vs 2018 
Steel revenues(1)  $336,980  $367,956  $367,560    (8)%  —%
Recycling revenues(2)   76,277   91,460   113,081    (17)%  (19)%
Total segment revenues   413,257   459,416   480,641    (10)%  (4)%
Cost of goods sold   374,512   412,209   427,459    (9)%  (4)%
Selling, general and administrative expense   16,302   16,499   17,044    (1)%  (3)%
Income from joint ventures   (540)  (1,243)  (2,060)   (57)%  (40)%
Asset impairment recoveries, net   —   —   (88)  NM  NM 
Segment operating income  $ 22,983  $ 31,951  $ 38,286    (28)%  (17)%
Finished steel average sales price ($/ST)(3)  $ 630  $ 713  $ 666    (12)%  7%
Finished steel products sold (ST, in thousands)  505   478   519    6%  (8)%
Rolling mill utilization(4)   86%  88%  88%   (2)%  —%
 
ST = Short Ton, which is equivalent to 2,000 pounds
(1)Steel revenues include primarily sales of finished steel products, semi-finished goods (billets) and manufacturing scrap.
(2)Recycling revenues include primarily sales of ferrous and nonferrous recycled scrap metal to export markets.
(3)Price information is shown after netting the cost of freight incurred to deliver the product to the customer.
(4)Rolling mill utilization is based on effective annual production capacity under current conditions of 580 thousand tons of finished steel products.
CSS Segment Revenues
Revenues in fiscal 2020 decreased by $46 million, or 10%, compared to fiscal 2019 primarily reflecting lower average net selling
prices for our finished steel products and, partially due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic, decreased sales of ferrous
recycled scrap metal, partially offset by increased finished steel sales volumes. Sales volumes for our finished steel products in fiscal
2020 were not significantly impacted by the effects of COVID-19 primarily due to steady demand in West Coast construction
markets. The higher average net selling prices for our finished steel products in the prior year reflected the impacts of reduced
pressure from steel imports and higher steel-making raw material costs at the time.
40 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
CSS Segment Operating Income
Operating income for fiscal 2020 was $23 million, compared to operating income of $32 million in the prior year. Decreased
operating results in fiscal 2020 primarily reflected the impact of the lower price environment for finished steel compared to the prior
year and decreased sales of ferrous recycled scrap metal compared to fiscal 2019, partially due to the weaker market conditions for
recycled metals as a result of the adverse impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic. Finished steel average net selling prices in fiscal 2020
declined 12% compared to the prior year, the adverse effects of which were partially offset by reduced raw material purchase prices
and other input costs and the benefits from productivity initiatives compared to the prior year.
Corporate
Corporate SG&A expense decreased by $2 million, or 5%, compared to the prior year primarily due to lower employee-related
expenses as a result of reduced incentive compensation accruals and cost savings initiatives, and reduced travel resulting from
restrictions due to COVID-19, partially offset by increased charges related to legacy environmental matters.
Productivity Initiatives and Restructuring Charges
In fiscal 2020, we implemented productivity initiatives aimed at further reducing our annual operating expenses at Corporate, AMR
and CSS, mainly through reductions in non-trade procurement spend, including outside and professional services, lower employee-
related expenses and other non-headcount measures. We targeted $15 million in realized benefits in fiscal 2020 from these additional
initiatives, and we exceeded this target with achievement of approximately $18 million of benefits in fiscal 2020. In fiscal 2019, we
also implemented productivity initiatives aimed at delivering $35 million in annual benefits primarily through a combination of
production cost efficiencies and reductions in SG&A expense. We achieved approximately $30 million in benefits as a result of these
initiatives in fiscal 2019 and achieved the full run rate of benefits in fiscal 2020.
In April 2020, we announced our intention to modify our internal organizational and reporting structure to a functionally based,
integrated model. This change in structure is intended to result in a more agile organization and solidify recent productivity
improvement and cost reduction initiatives. We expect to complete this transition in the first quarter of fiscal 2021.
During fiscal 2020, we incurred aggregate restructuring charges and other exit-related costs of approximately $9 million in
connection with these initiatives, comprising severance costs of $2 million, costs associated with a lease contract termination of $1
million and professional services costs of $6 million. The substantial majority of the restructuring charges and other exit-related
costs related to these initiatives were recognized in fiscal 2020 and required us to make cash payments.
Income Taxes
 
  Year Ended August 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
(Loss) income from continuing operations before income taxes  $ (1,939) $ 76,240  $ 141,853 
Income tax (expense) benefit  $ (166) $ (17,670) $ 17,590 
Effective tax rate   (8.6)%  23.2%  (12.4)%
Our effective tax rate from continuing operations for fiscal 2020 was an expense of 8.6%, compared to 23.2% for fiscal 2019. Our
effective tax rate from continuing operations for fiscal 2020 was lower than the U.S. federal statutory rate of 21%, and reflective of
income tax expense on a pre-tax loss from continuing operations, primarily due to the partially offsetting impacts of individually
immaterial permanent differences from non-deductible expenses and research and development credits, the effects of unrecognized
tax benefits and the aggregate impact of state taxes.
We assess the realizability of our deferred tax assets on a quarterly basis through an analysis of potential sources of future taxable
income, including prior year taxable income available to absorb a carryback of tax losses, reversals of existing taxable temporary
differences, tax planning strategies, and forecasts of taxable income. We consider all negative and positive evidence, including the
weight of the evidence, to determine if valuation allowances against deferred tax assets are required. We continue to maintain
valuation allowances against certain deferred tax assets related to certain jurisdictions as a result of negative objective evidence,
including the effects of historical losses in these tax jurisdictions, outweighing positive objective and subjective evidence, indicating
that it is more-likely-than-not that the associated tax benefit will not be realized. Realization of the deferred tax assets is dependent
upon generating sufficient taxable income in the associated tax jurisdictions in future years to benefit from the reversal of net
deductible temporary differences and from the utilization of net operating losses. We will continue to regularly assess the
realizability of deferred tax assets. Changes in historical earnings performance and future earnings projections, among other factors,
may cause us to adjust our valuation allowance on deferred tax assets, which would impact our results of operations in the period we
determine that these factors have changed.
41 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
CARES Act
On March 27, 2020, the President of the United States signed and enacted into law the CARES Act, which contains several income
tax provisions, as well as other measures, aimed at assisting businesses impacted by the economic effects of the COVID-19
pandemic. Among other provisions, the CARES Act removes certain limitations on utilization of net operating losses (“NOLs”) and
allows for carrybacks of certain past and future NOLs. We applied the NOL carryback provisions of the CARES Act to our NOL for
fiscal 2020, which resulted in the reclassification of a $11 million NOL deferred income tax asset to refundable income taxes and
recognition of a $1 million income tax benefit in the third quarter of fiscal 2020. We do not anticipate the other income tax
provisions of the CARES Act to have a material impact on our financial statements.
See Note 14 - Income Taxes in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report for further
discussion.
 
Liquidity and Capital Resources
We rely on cash provided by operating activities as a primary source of liquidity, supplemented by current cash on hand and
borrowings under our existing credit facilities.
Sources and Uses of Cash
We had cash balances of $18 million and $12 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Cash balances are intended to be
used primarily for working capital, capital expenditures, dividends, share repurchases, investments and acquisitions. We use excess
cash on hand to reduce amounts outstanding under our credit facilities. As of August 31, 2020, debt was $104 million, compared to
$105 million as of August 31, 2019, and debt, net of cash, was $87 million as of August 31, 2020 compared to $93 million as of
August 31, 2019 (see the reconciliation of debt, net of cash, in Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the end of this Item 7).
Operating Activities
Net cash provided by operating activities in fiscal 2020 was $125 million, compared to $145 million in fiscal 2019.
Sources of cash in fiscal 2020 included a $39 million decrease in inventories due to lower raw material purchase prices and the
timing of purchases and sales and a $13 million increase in accrued payroll and related liabilities due to increased incentive
compensation liabilities and deferred payroll taxes as permitted under the CARES Act. Uses of cash in fiscal 2020 included an $8
million decrease in accounts payable primarily due to lower raw material purchase prices and the timing of payments.
Sources of cash other than from earnings in fiscal 2019 included a $33 million decrease in inventories due to lower raw material
purchase prices and timing of payments and sales and a $9 million decrease in accounts receivable due to lower selling prices and
the timing of sales and collections. Uses of cash in fiscal 2019 included a $19 million decrease in accrued payroll and related
liabilities primarily due to incentive compensation payments made in the first quarter of fiscal 2019, and a $17 million decrease in
accounts payable primarily due to lower raw material purchase prices and the timing of payments.
Investing Activities
Net cash used in investing activities in fiscal 2020 was $79 million, compared to $90 million in fiscal 2019.
Cash used in investing activities in fiscal 2020 included capital expenditures of $82 million to upgrade our equipment and
infrastructure and for additional investments in nonferrous processing technologies and environmental and safety-related assets,
compared to $95 million in the prior year. The significant majority of capital expenditures were associated with projects at AMR.
Financing Activities
Net cash used in financing activities for fiscal 2020 was $41 million, compared with $47 million in fiscal 2019.
Uses of cash in both fiscal 2020 and 2019 included $21 million for the payment of dividends and $1 million and $13 million,
respectively, for share repurchases. Uses of cash in fiscal 2020 also included $8 million in net repayments of debt, compared to $4
million in the prior year (refer to Non-GAAP Financial Measures at the end of this Item 7). Additionally, during the third quarter of
fiscal 2020, we borrowed an incremental $250 million under our credit facilities in order to increase our cash position and preserve
financial flexibility in light of the COVID-19 outbreak. We repaid the $250 million of additional borrowings in the fourth quarter of
fiscal 2020.
42 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Debt
Following is a summary of our outstanding balances and availability on credit facilities and long-term debt, exclusive of finance
lease obligations (in thousands):
 
  Outstanding as of
August 31, 2020  Remaining
Availability 
Bank secured revolving credit facilities(1)  $ 90,000  $ 611,489 
Other debt obligations  $ 6,911  N/A
 
 
(1)Remaining availability is net of $10 million of outstanding stand-by letters of credit as of August 31, 2020.
Our senior secured revolving credit facilities, which provide for revolving loans of $700 million and C$15 million, mature in August
2023 pursuant to a credit agreement with Bank of America, N.A., as administrative agent, and other lenders party thereto. The $700
million credit facility includes a $50 million sublimit for letters of credit, a $25 million sublimit for swingline loans and a $50
million sublimit for multicurrency borrowings. As of August 31, 2020, interest rates on outstanding indebtedness under the credit
agreement were based, at our option, on either the London Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”) (or the Canadian equivalent for C$
loans), plus a spread of between 1.25% and 3.50%, with the amount of the spread based on a pricing grid tied to our ratio of
consolidated funded debt to EBITDA (as defined by the credit agreement), or the greater of (a) the prime rate, (b) the federal funds
rate plus 0.50% or (c) the daily rate equal to one-month LIBOR plus 1.75%, in each case, plus a spread of between 0.00% and 2.50%
based on a pricing grid tied to our consolidated funded debt to EBITDA ratio. In addition, commitment fees are payable on the
unused portion of the credit facilities at rates between 0.20% and 0.50% based on a pricing grid tied to our ratio of consolidated
funded debt to EBITDA.
On June 30, 2020, in large part due to the uncertainties resulting from the effects of COVID-19, we entered into an amendment to
our existing credit agreement with Bank of America, N.A., as administrative agent, and other lenders party thereto. The principal
changes to the existing credit agreement effected by the amendment are (i) the reduction of the consolidated fixed charge coverage
from a minimum ratio of 1.50 to 1.00 to a minimum ratio of 1.20 to 1.00 for the fiscal quarter ending August 31, 2020, and to a
minimum ratio of 1.10 to 1.00 for the fiscal quarters ending November 30, 2020, February 28, 2021 and May 31, 2021, and (ii) the
introduction of a minimum consolidated asset coverage ratio of 1.00 to 1.00 for each of the fiscal quarters ending August 31, 2020
through May 31, 2021. The amendment further provides for revisions to the definition of LIBOR to include a 0.50% floor and
mechanics by which the parties may replace the benchmark interest rate used in the agreement from LIBOR to one or more rates
based on the secured overnight financing rate administered by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York.
We had borrowings outstanding under our credit facilities of $90 million and $97 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively. The weighted average interest rate on amounts outstanding under our credit facilities was 4.59% and 3.78% as of
August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
We use the credit facilities to fund working capital, capital expenditures, dividends, share repurchases, investments and acquisitions.
Our credit agreement contains various representations and warranties, events of default and financial and other customary covenants
which limit (subject to certain exceptions) our ability to, among other things, incur or suffer to exist certain liens, make investments,
incur or guaranty additional indebtedness, enter into consolidations, mergers, acquisitions, and sales of assets, make distributions and
other restricted payments, change the nature of our business, engage in transactions with affiliates and enter into restrictive
agreements, including agreements that restrict the ability of our subsidiaries to make distributions. The financial covenants under the
credit agreement include (a) a consolidated fixed charge coverage ratio, defined as the four-quarter rolling sum of consolidated
EBITDA less defined maintenance capital expenditures and certain environmental expenditures divided by consolidated fixed
charges, (b) a consolidated leverage ratio, defined as consolidated funded indebtedness divided by the sum of consolidated net worth
and consolidated funded indebtedness, and (c) a consolidated asset coverage ratio, defined as consolidated asset values divided by
consolidated funded indebtedness.
As of August 31, 2020, we were in compliance with the financial covenants under our credit agreement. The consolidated fixed
charge coverage ratio was required to be no less than 1.20 to 1.00 and was 2.17 to 1.00 as of August 31, 2020. The consolidated
leverage ratio was required to be no more than 0.55 to 1.00 and was 0.14 to 1.00 as of August 31, 2020. The consolidated asset
coverage ratio was required to be no less than 1.00 to 1.00 and was 2.71 to 1.00 as of August 31, 2020.
43 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Our obligations under our credit agreement are guaranteed by substantially all of our subsidiaries. The credit facilities and the related
guarantees are secured by senior first priority liens on certain of our and our subsidiaries’ assets, including equipment, inventory and
accounts receivable.
While we currently expect to remain in compliance with the financial covenants under the credit agreement, we may not be able to
do so in the event market conditions, COVID-19 or other negative factors have a significant adverse impact on our results of
operations and financial position. If we do not maintain compliance with our financial covenants and are unable to obtain an
amendment or waiver from our lenders, a breach of a financial covenant would constitute an event of default and allow the lenders to
exercise remedies under the agreements, the most severe of which is the termination of the credit facility under our committed bank
credit agreement and acceleration of the amounts owed under the agreement. In such case, we would be required to evaluate
available alternatives and take appropriate steps to obtain alternative funds. We cannot assure that any such alternative funds, if
sought, could be obtained or, if obtained, would be adequate or on acceptable terms.
Other debt obligations primarily relate to an equipment purchase, the contract consideration for which includes an obligation to make
future monthly payments to the vendor in the form of licensing fees. For accounting purposes, such obligation is treated as a partial
financing of the purchase price by the equipment vendor. Monthly payments commence when the equipment is placed in service and
continue for a period of four years thereafter. We impute interest on this obligation at a rate of 4.25% reflecting the estimated rate
that would be recorded in a market transaction with similar terms.
Capital Expenditures
Capital expenditures totaled $82 million for fiscal 2020, compared to $95 million for fiscal 2019. Capital expenditures in each of
fiscal 2020 and 2019 were primarily to upgrade our equipment, facilities and infrastructure, and for additional investments in
nonferrous processing technologies and environmental and safety-related assets. We currently plan to invest up to $125 million in
capital expenditures in fiscal 2021, including approximately $65 million for investments in growth, including new nonferrous
processing technologies and to support volume initiatives and other growth projects, using cash generated from operations and
available credit facilities. The COVID-19 pandemic has caused some delays in construction activities and equipment deliveries
related to our capital projects, including delays in obtaining permits from government agencies, resulting in the deferral of certain
capital expenditures to fiscal 2021. Given the continually evolving nature of the COVID-19 pandemic, the extent to which forecasted
capital expenditures could be further deferred is uncertain.
Environmental Compliance
Building on our commitment to recycling and operating our business in an environmentally responsible manner, we continue to
invest in facilities that improve our environmental presence in the communities in which we operate. As part of our capital
expenditures discussed in the prior paragraph, we invested $10 million and $36 million for environmental projects in fiscal 2020 and
2019, respectively. We plan to invest in the range of $24 million of our planned capital expenditures for environmental projects in
fiscal 2021. These projects include investments in storm water systems and equipment to ensure ongoing compliance with air quality
and other environmental regulations.
We have been identified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (“EPA”) as one of the potentially responsible parties
that own or operate or formerly owned or operated sites which are part of or adjacent to the Portland Harbor Superfund site (the
“Site”). See Note 9 - Commitments and Contingencies in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this
report for a discussion of this matter, as well as other legacy environmental loss contingencies. We believe it is not possible to
reasonably estimate the amount or range of costs which we are likely to or which it is reasonably possible that we will incur in
connection with the Site, although such costs could be material to our financial position, results of operations, cash flows and
liquidity. We have insurance policies that we believe will provide reimbursement for costs we incur for defense, remediation and
mitigation for natural resource damages claims in connection with the Site, although there are no assurances that those policies will
cover all of the costs which we may incur. Significant cash outflows in the future related to the Site could reduce the amounts
available for borrowing that could otherwise be used for working capital, capital expenditures, dividends, share repurchases,
investments and acquisitions and could result in our failure to maintain compliance with certain covenants in our debt agreements,
and could adversely impact our liquidity.
44 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Dividends
On July 31, 2020, our Board of Directors declared a dividend for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020 of $0.1875 per common share,
which equates to an annual cash dividend of $0.75 per common share. Dividends of $0.75 per common share, totaling $21 million,
were declared and paid during fiscal 2020.
On October 20, 2020, our Board of Directors declared a dividend for the first quarter of fiscal 2021 of $0.1875 per common share
payable November 16, 2020 to shareholders of record on November 2, 2020.
 
Share Repurchase Program
Pursuant to our share repurchase program as amended in 2001, 2006 and 2008, we were authorized to repurchase up to nine million
shares of our Class A common stock. As of August 31, 2020, we have authorization to repurchase up to a remaining 706 thousand
shares of our Class A common stock when we deem such repurchases to be appropriate. We may repurchase our common stock for a
variety of reasons, such as to optimize our capital structure and to offset dilution related to share-based compensation arrangements.
We consider several factors in determining whether to make share repurchases including, among other factors, our cash needs, the
availability of funding, our future business plans and the market price of our stock. As of the beginning of fiscal 2019, we had
repurchased approximately 7.7 million shares of our Class A common stock under the program. We repurchased approximately 527
thousand shares for a total of $13 million in open-market transactions in fiscal 2019, and approximately 53 thousand shares for a
total of $0.9 million in open-market transactions in fiscal 2020.
Assessment of Liquidity and Capital Resources
Historically, our available cash resources, internally generated funds, credit facilities and equity offerings have financed our
acquisitions, capital expenditures, working capital and other financing needs.
We generally believe our current cash resources, internally generated funds, existing credit facilities and access to the capital markets
will provide adequate short-term and long-term liquidity needs for working capital, capital expenditures, dividends, share
repurchases, investments and acquisitions, joint ventures, debt service requirements, environmental obligations and other
contingencies. However, in the event of a sustained market deterioration, we may need to evaluate alternative sources of liquidity
and take appropriate steps to obtain sufficient additional funds. There can be no assurances that any such supplemental funding, if
sought, could be obtained or, if obtained, would be adequate or on acceptable terms.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
None requiring disclosure pursuant to Item 303 of Regulation S-K under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Contractual Obligations and Commitments
We have certain contractual obligations to make future payments. The following table summarizes these future obligations as of
August 31, 2020 (in thousands):
 
  Payment Due by Period  
   2021   2022   2023   2024   2025  Thereafter  Totals 
Contractual Obligations                             
Credit facilities(1)  $ —  $ —  $90,000  $ —  $ —  $ —  $90,000 
Interest payments on credit facilities(2)   4,133   4,133   4,054   —   —   —   12,320 
Other debt, including interest(3)   1,122   1,872   1,872   1,872   822   156   7,716 
Finance leases, including interest   1,837   1,768   1,694   1,410   656   1,778   9,143 
Operating leases(4)   24,223   23,292   22,810   18,619   13,212   72,064   174,220 
Purchase obligations(5)   78,094   3,961   2,648   2,630   1,730   2,489   91,552 
Other(6)   221   353   348   344   339   5,409   7,014 
Total  $109,630  $35,379  $123,426  $24,875  $16,759  $81,896  $391,965
 
 
(1)Credit facilities include the principal amount of borrowings outstanding under bank secured revolving credit facilities, which mature in August 2023.
(2)Interest payments on credit facilities are based on interest rates in effect as of August 31, 2020. As contractual interest rates and the amount of debt outstanding
is variable in certain cases, actual cash payments may differ from the estimates provided.
45 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
(3)Other debt obligations primarily relate to an equipment purchase, the contract consideration for which includes an obligation to make future monthly payments
to the vendor in the form of licensing fees. For accounting purposes, such obligation is treated as a partial financing of the purchase price by the equipment
vendor. Monthly payments commence when the equipment is placed in service and continue for a period of four years thereafter.
(4)Operating lease payments reflect those embedded in the measurement of our operating lease liabilities and, thus, include future lease payments for the remaining
non-cancellable period of the lease together with periods covered by renewal (or termination) options which we are reasonably certain to exercise (or not to
exercise).
(5)Purchase obligations include all enforceable, legally binding agreements to purchase goods or services that specify all significant terms, regardless of the
duration of the agreement.
(6)Other contractual obligations consist of pension funding obligations and other accrued liabilities.
We maintain stand-by letters of credit to provide support for certain obligations, including workers’ compensation and performance
bonds. At August 31, 2020, we had $10 million outstanding under these arrangements.
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
The preparation of financial statements in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America
requires us to make certain judgments, estimates, and assumptions regarding uncertainties that affect the reported amounts of assets,
liabilities, revenues and expenses, and related disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities. An accounting policy is deemed to be
critical if it requires an accounting estimate to be made based on assumptions and judgments about matters that are inherently
uncertain at the time the estimate is made, if different estimates reasonably could have been used, or if changes in the estimate that
are reasonably likely to occur could materially impact our consolidated financial statements. We deem critical accounting policies to
be those that are most important to the portrayal of our financial condition and results of operations. Because of the uncertainty
inherent in these matters, actual results could differ from the estimates we use in applying the critical accounting policies. We are not
currently aware of any reasonably likely events or circumstances that would result in materially different amounts being reported.
Our critical accounting estimates include those related to inventories, long-lived assets, leases, goodwill, environmental costs, and
income taxes.
Inventories
Our inventories consist of processed and unprocessed scrap metal (ferrous, nonferrous, and mixed nonferrous recovered joint
products arising from the manufacturing process), semi-finished steel products (billets), finished steel products (primarily rebar, wire
rod, and merchant bar), used and salvaged vehicles, and supplies. Inventories are stated at the lower of cost and net realizable value.
We consider estimated future selling prices when determining the estimated net realizable value of our inventory. As we generally
sell our recycled ferrous metal under contracts that provide for shipment within 30 to 60 days after the price is agreed, we utilize the
selling prices under committed contracts and sales orders for determining the estimated net realizable value of quantities on hand that
will be shipped under these contracts and sales orders.
The accounting process we use to record ferrous scrap metal quantities relies on significant estimates. With respect to estimating the
quantities of unprocessed ferrous scrap metal inventory that are moved into production, we rely on weighed quantities of the
processed ferrous material, adjusted for estimated metal recoveries and yields that are based on historical trends and other judgments
by management. Actual recoveries and yields can vary depending on product quality, moisture content and source of the unprocessed
metal. The Company’s estimates are intended to reasonably reflect the quantities of unprocessed ferrous scrap metal that are used in
the production of processed ferrous metal. To assist in validating the reasonableness of these estimates, we periodically review shrink
factors and perform monthly physical inventories. Due to the inherent nature of our scrap metal inventories, including variations in
product density, holding period and production processes utilized to manufacture the products, physical inventories will not
necessarily detect all variances for scrap metal inventory such that estimates of quantities are required. To mitigate this risk, we
further adjust our ferrous physical inventories when the volume of a commodity is low and a physical inventory count is deemed to
more accurately estimate the remaining volume.
Long-Lived Assets
We test long-lived tangible and intangible assets for impairment at the asset group level, which is determined based on the lowest
level for which identifiable cash flows are largely independent of the cash flows of other groups of assets and liabilities. Operating
lease right-of-use assets are considered long-lived assets subject to this impairment testing. For our metals recycling operations
reported within AMR, an asset group generally consists of the regional shredding and export operation along with surrounding
feeder yards. For regions with no shredding and export operations, each metals recycling yard is an asset group. For our auto parts
operations, generally each auto parts store is an asset group. The combined steel manufacturing and metals recycling operations
within CSS are a single asset group. We test our asset groups for impairment when certain triggering events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the carrying value of the asset group may be impaired. If the carrying value of the asset group is not
recoverable because it exceeds the estimate of
46 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
future undiscounted cash flows from the use and eventual disposition of the asset group, an impairment loss is recognized by the
amount the carrying value exceeds its fair value, if any. The impairment loss is allocated to the long-lived assets of the group on a
pro rata basis using the relative carrying amounts of those assets, except that the loss allocated to an individual long-lived asset of the
group shall not reduce the carrying amount of that asset below its fair value. Fair value is determined using one or more of the
income, market or cost approaches, depending on the nature of the asset group. Determination of fair value is considered a critical
accounting estimate.
Leases
We determine whether an arrangement contains a lease at inception by assessing whether the Company receives the right to direct
the use of and obtain substantially all of the economic benefit from use of the underlying asset. Lease classification, measurement,
and recognition are determined at lease commencement, which is the date the underlying asset is available for use by the Company.
The accounting classification of a lease is based on whether the arrangement is effectively a financed purchase of the underlying
asset (finance lease) or not (operating lease). Leases that, at lease commencement, have a non-cancellable lease term of 12 months or
less and do not include an option to either purchase the underlying asset or renew the lease beyond 12 months that the Company is
reasonably certain to exercise are classified as short-term leases and are not recognized on the balance sheet.
For leases other than short-term leases, we recognize right-of-use assets and lease liabilities based primarily on the present value of
future minimum lease payments over the lease term at lease commencement. Right-of-use assets represent the Company’s right to
use the underlying asset during the lease term, while lease liabilities represent the Company’s obligation to make future lease
payments. The lease term is the non-cancellable period of the lease, together with periods covered by renewal (or termination)
options which the Company is reasonably certain to exercise (or not to exercise). Determination of the lease term is considered a
critical accounting estimate. Lease payments are discounted to present value using the Company’s incremental borrowing rate,
unless the discount rate implicit in the lease is readily determinable. The Company’s incremental borrowing rate for each lease is the
estimated rate of interest that the Company would have to pay to borrow the aggregate lease payments on a collateralized basis over
the lease term. Estimation of the incremental borrowing rate is considered a critical accounting estimate as it requires judgment by
management and reflects an assessment of the Company’s credit standing to derive an implied secured credit rating and
corresponding yield curve. The Company used the incremental borrowing rate to recognize all operating lease right-of-use assets and
liabilities as of the new lease accounting standard application date. Right-of-use assets and lease liabilities are subject to
remeasurement after lease commencement when certain events or changes in circumstances arise, such as a change in the lease term
due to reassessment of whether the Company is reasonably certain to exercise a renewal or termination option.
For operating leases, lease expense is recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term. For finance leases, the lease right-of-use
asset is amortized on a straight-line basis and interest expense is recognized on the lease liability using the effective interest rate
method. Many of the Company’s real property leases contain variable lease payments that depend on an index or a rate, which are
included in the measurement of the right-of-use asset and lease liability using the index or rate at lease commencement, or with
respect to the Company’s transition to the new lease accounting standard the index or rate at the application date. Subsequent
changes in variable lease payments are recorded as variable lease expenses during the period in which they are incurred. The
Company elected a practical expedient to not separate lease and related non-lease components for accounting purposes and, thus,
costs related to such non-lease components are disclosed as lease expense. Payments for short-term leases are recognized in the
income statement on a straight-line basis over the lease term.
Goodwill
We evaluate goodwill for impairment annually on July 1 and upon the occurrence of certain triggering events or substantive changes
in circumstances that indicate that the fair value of goodwill may be impaired. Impairment of goodwill is tested at the reporting unit
level. A reporting unit is an operating segment or one level below an operating segment (referred to as a ‘component’).
When testing goodwill for impairment, we have the option to first assess qualitative factors to determine whether the existence of
events or circumstances leads to a determination that it is more-likely-than-not that the estimated fair value of a reporting unit is less
than its carrying amount. If we elect to perform a qualitative assessment and determine that an impairment is more-likely-than-not,
we are then required to perform the quantitative impairment test, otherwise no further analysis is required. We also may elect not to
perform the qualitative assessment and, instead, proceed directly to the quantitative impairment test. When performing the
quantitative impairment test, we apply a one-step quantitative test and record the amount of goodwill impairment as the excess of a
reporting unit’s carrying amount over its fair value, not to exceed the total amount of goodwill allocated to that reporting unit.
47 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
We estimate the fair value of a reporting unit using an income approach based on the present value of expected future cash flows
utilizing a market-based weighted average cost of capital (“WACC”) determined separately for the reporting unit. To estimate the
present value of the cash flows that extend beyond the final year in the discounted cash flow analysis, we employ a terminal value
technique, whereby we use estimated operating cash flows minus capital expenditures, adjust for changes in working capital
requirements in the final year of the analysis, and then discount these estimated cash flows by the WACC to establish the terminal
value.
The determination of fair value using the income approach requires judgment and involves the use of estimates and assumptions
about expected future cash flows derived from internal forecasts and the impact of market conditions on those assumptions.
Assumptions primarily include revenue growth rates driven by future ferrous and nonferrous commodity price and sales volume
expectations, gross margins, selling, general and administrative expense relative to total revenues, capital expenditures, working
capital requirements, discount rate (WACC), tax rate, terminal growth rate, benefits associated with a taxable transaction and
synergistic benefits available to market participants.
We also use a market approach based on earnings multiple data and our Company’s market capitalization to corroborate our
reporting units’ valuations. We reconcile the Company’s market capitalization to the aggregated estimated fair value of all reporting
units, including consideration of a control premium representing the estimated amount a market participant would pay to obtain a
controlling interest in the Company.
In the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020, we performed the annual goodwill impairment test as of July 1, 2020. As of the testing date, the
balance of our goodwill was $169 million, and all but $1 million of such balance was carried by a single reporting unit within AMR.
We had last performed the quantitative impairment test of goodwill carried by this reporting unit in the second quarter of fiscal 2016
using a measurement date of February 1, 2016. Based on the changes in market conditions related to the general economy and the
metals recycling industry and the increase in the carrying amount of the reporting unit since the last quantitative impairment test, we
elected not to perform the qualitative assessment for the reporting unit and, instead, proceeded directly to the quantitative
impairment test. For the reporting unit within AMR subject to the quantitative impairment test, the estimated fair value of the
reporting unit exceeded its carrying amount by approximately 29% as of July 1, 2020. The projections used in the income approach
for the reporting unit took into consideration the impact of current market conditions for ferrous and nonferrous recycled metals, the
cost of obtaining adequate supply flows of scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles, and recent trends in retail auto parts sales. The
projections assumed a limited recovery of operating margins from current levels over a multi-year period. The WACC used in the
income approach valuation for the reporting unit was 11.1%, and the terminal growth rate used was 2.0%. Assuming all other
components of the fair value estimate were held constant, an increase in the WACC of 228 basis points or more or weaker than
anticipated improvements in operating margins could have resulted in a failure of the quantitative impairment test for the reporting
unit. See Note 7 - Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8
of this report for further detail.
As a result of the inherent uncertainty associated with forming the estimates described above, actual results could differ from those
estimates. Future events and changing market conditions may impact our assumptions as to future revenue and operating margin
growth, WACC and other factors that may result in changes in our estimates of the reporting units’ fair value. Although we believe
the assumptions used in testing our reporting units’ goodwill for impairment are reasonable, a lack of recovery or further
deterioration in market conditions from current levels, a trend of weaker than anticipated financial performance for the reporting unit
with allocated goodwill, a decline in our share price from current levels for a sustained period of time, or an increase in the WACC,
among other factors, could significantly impact our impairment analysis and may result in future goodwill impairment charges that,
if incurred, could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations.
48 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Environmental Costs
We operate in industries that inherently possess environmental risks. To manage these risks, we employ both our own environmental
staff and outside consultants. Environmental management and finance personnel meet regularly to discuss environmental risks. We
estimate future costs for known environmental remediation requirements and accrue for them on an undiscounted basis when it is
probable that we have incurred a liability and the related costs can be reasonably estimated but the timing of incurring the estimated
costs is unknown. The regulatory and government management of these projects is complex, which is one of the primary factors that
make it difficult to assess the cost of potential and future remediation. When only a wide range of estimated amounts can be
reasonably established and no other amount within the range is better than any other, the low end of the range is recorded in the
financial statements. If further developments or resolution of an environmental matter result in facts and circumstances that are
significantly different than the assumptions used to develop these liabilities, the accrual for environmental remediation could be
materially understated or overstated. Adjustments to these liabilities are made when additional information becomes available that
affects the estimated costs to study or remediate any environmental issues or when expenditures for which accruals are established
are made. The factors we consider in the recognition and measurement of environmental liabilities include:
 •Current regulations, both at the time the liability is established and during the course of the investigation or remediation
process, which specify standards for acceptable remediation;
 •Information about the site which becomes available as the site is studied and remediated;
 •The professional judgment of senior level internal staff and outside consultants, who take into account similar, recent
instances of environmental remediation issues, and studies of our sites, among other considerations;
 •Available technologies that can be used for remediation; and
 •The number and financial condition of other potentially responsible parties and the extent of their responsibility for the
costs of study and remediation.
Our accrued environmental liabilities as of August 31, 2020 included $4 million related to the Portland Harbor Superfund site.
Because the final remedial actions have not yet been designed and there has not been a determination of the amount of natural
resource damages or of the allocation among the potentially responsible parties of costs of the investigations, remedial action costs
or natural resource damages, we believe it is not possible to reasonably estimate the amount or range of costs which we are likely or
which it is reasonably possible that we may incur in connection with the Site, although such costs could be material to our financial
position, results of operations, cash flows and liquidity. Therefore, no additional amounts have been accrued. Further, we have been
notified that we are or may be a potentially responsible party at sites other than Portland Harbor which are currently or formerly
owned or operated by us or at other sites where we may have responsibility for such costs due to past disposal or other activities. See
“Contingencies – Environmental” in Note 9 - Commitments and Contingencies in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial
Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
Income Taxes
Valuation Allowances
We assess the realizability of our deferred tax assets on a quarterly basis through an analysis of potential sources of future taxable
income, including prior year taxable income available to absorb a carryback of tax losses, reversals of existing taxable temporary
differences, tax planning strategies, and forecasts of taxable income. We consider all negative and positive evidence, including the
weight of the evidence, to determine if valuation allowances against deferred tax assets are required. Due to the significant judgment
involved, realizability of our deferred tax assets is considered a critical accounting estimate. In fiscal 2018, we released valuation
allowances against certain U.S. federal and state and Canadian deferred tax assets resulting in discrete tax benefits totaling $37
million. The release of these valuation allowances was the result of sufficient positive evidence at the time, including cumulative
income in recent years and projections of future taxable income based primarily on our improved financial performance, that it is
more-likely-than-not that the deferred tax assets will be realized. We continue to maintain valuation allowances against certain state,
Canadian and all Puerto Rican deferred tax assets.
49 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Recently Issued Accounting Standards
We have not identified any recent accounting pronouncements that are expected to have a material impact on our financial condition,
results of operations or cash flows upon adoption.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Debt, net of cash
Debt, net of cash is the difference between (i) the sum of long-term debt and short-term borrowings (i.e., total debt) and (ii) cash and
cash equivalents. We believe that debt, net of cash is a useful measure for investors because, as cash and cash equivalents can be
used, among other things, to repay indebtedness, netting this against total debt is a useful measure of our leverage.
The following is a reconciliation of debt, net of cash (in thousands):
 
  August 31,
2020   August 31,
2019   August 31,
2018  
Short-term borrowings  $ 2,184  $ 1,321  $ 1,139 
Long-term debt, net of current maturities   102,235   103,775   106,237 
Total debt   104,419   105,096   107,376 
Less cash and cash equivalents   17,887   12,377   4,723 
Total debt, net of cash  $ 86,532  $ 92,719  $ 102,653
 
 
Net borrowings (repayments) of debt
Net borrowings (repayments) of debt is the sum of borrowings from long-term debt and repayments of long-term debt. We present
this amount as the net change in our borrowings (repayments) for the period because we believe it is useful for investors as a
meaningful presentation of the change in debt.
The following is a reconciliation of net borrowings (repayments) of debt (in thousands):
 
  Fiscal 2020  Fiscal 2019  Fiscal 2018 
Borrowings from long-term debt  $ 690,162  $ 431,048  $ 515,480 
Repayments of long-term debt   (698,492)  (435,353)  (556,456)
Net borrowings (repayments) of debt  $ (8,330) $ (4,305) $ (40,976)
 
Adjusted consolidated operating income, adjusted AMR operating income, adjusted CSS operating income, adjusted Corporate
expense, adjusted net (loss) income from continuing operations attributable to SSI shareholders, and adjusted diluted (loss)
earnings per share from continuing operations attributable to SSI shareholders
Management believes that providing these non-GAAP financial measures adds a meaningful presentation of our results from
business operations excluding adjustments for restructuring charges and other exit-related activities, asset impairment charges (net of
recoveries), charges for legacy environmental matters (net of recoveries), business development costs not related to ongoing
operations, charges related to the settlement of a wage and hour class action lawsuit, recoveries related to the resale or modification
of previously contracted shipments, and income tax (benefit) expense allocated to these adjustments, items which are not related to
underlying business operational performance, and improves the period-to-period comparability of our results from business
operations.
50 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
The following is a reconciliation of adjusted consolidated operating income, adjusted AMR operating income, adjusted CSS
operating income and adjusted Corporate expense (in thousands):
 
  Fiscal 2020  Fiscal 2019  Fiscal 2018 
Consolidated operating income:             
As reported  $ 6,854  $ 83,865  $ 148,988 
Restructuring charges and other exit-related activities   8,993   365   (661)
Asset impairment charges (recoveries), net   5,729   63   (1,021)
Charges for legacy environmental matters, net(1)   4,097   2,419   7,268 
Business development costs   1,619   —   — 
Charges related to the settlement of a wage and hour class action lawsuit   73   2,330   — 
Recoveries related to the resale or modification of previously contracted shipments  —   —   (417)
Adjusted  $ 27,365  $ 89,042  $ 154,157 
             
AMR operating income:             
As reported  $ 34,438  $ 95,991  $ 169,120 
Asset impairment charges (recoveries), net   5,599   63   (933)
Charges for legacy environmental matters, net(1)   —   —   1,586 
Recoveries related to the resale or modification of previously contracted shipments  —   —   (417)
Adjusted  $ 40,037  $ 96,054  $ 169,356 
             
CSS operating income:             
As reported  $ 22,983  $ 31,951  $ 38,286 
Asset impairment recoveries, net   —   —   (88)
Adjusted  $ 22,983  $ 31,951  $ 38,198 
             
Corporate expense:             
As reported  $ 41,699  $ 43,986  $ 58,789 
Asset impairment (charges) recoveries, net   (130)  —   — 
Charges for legacy environmental matters, net(1)   (4,097)  (2,419)  (5,682)
Business development costs   (1,619)  —   — 
Charges related to the settlement of a wage and hour class action lawsuit   (73)  (2,330)  — 
Adjusted  $ 35,780  $ 39,237  $ 53,107
 
 
(1)Legal and environmental charges for legacy environmental matters (net of recoveries). Legacy environmental matters include charges (net of recoveries) related
to the Portland Harbor Superfund site and to other legacy environmental loss contingencies. See Note 9 – Commitments and Contingencies, “Portland Harbor”
and “Other Legacy Environmental Loss Contingencies” in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
51 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
The following is a reconciliation of adjusted net (loss) income from continuing operations attributable to SSI shareholders and
adjusted diluted (loss) earnings per share from continuing operations attributable to SSI shareholders (in thousands, except per share
data):
 
  Fiscal 2020  Fiscal 2019  Fiscal 2018 
Net (loss) income from continuing operations attributable to SSI shareholders:             
As reported  $ (4,050) $ 56,593  $ 156,105 
Restructuring charges and other exit-related activities   8,993   365   (661)
Asset impairment charges (recoveries), net   5,729   63   (1,021)
Charges for legacy environmental matters, net(1)   4,097   2,419   7,268 
Business development costs   1,619   —   — 
Charges related to the settlement of a wage and hour class action lawsuit   73   2,330   — 
Recoveries related to the resale or modification of previously contracted shipments  —   —   (417)
Income tax (benefit) expense allocated to adjustments(2)   (4,494)  (794)  34 
Adjusted  $ 11,967  $ 60,976  $ 161,308 
             
Diluted (loss) earnings per share from continuing operations attributable to SSI
shareholders:             
As reported  $ (0.15) $ 2.01  $ 5.46 
Restructuring charges and other exit-related activities, per share   0.32   0.01   (0.02)
Asset impairment charges (recoveries), net, per share   0.21   —   (0.04)
Charges for legacy environmental matters, net, per share(1)   0.15   0.09   0.25 
Business development costs, per share   0.06   —   — 
Charge related to the settlement of a wage and hour class action lawsuit, per share  —   0.08   — 
Recoveries related to the resale or modification of previously contracted
   shipments, per share   —   —   (0.01)
Income tax (benefit) expense allocated to adjustments, per share(2)   (0.16)  (0.03)  — 
Adjusted  $ 0.43  $ 2.16  $ 5.64
 
 
(1)Legal and environmental charges for legacy environmental matters (net of recoveries). Legacy environmental matters include charges (net of recoveries) related
to the Portland Harbor Superfund site and to other legacy environmental loss contingencies. See Note 9 - Commitments and Contingencies, “Portland Harbor”
and “Other Legacy Environmental Loss Contingencies” in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this report.
(2)The income tax allocated to the aggregate adjustments reconciling reported and adjusted net (loss) income from continuing operations attributable to SSI
shareholders and diluted (loss) earnings per share from continuing operations attributable to SSI shareholders is determined based on a tax provision calculated
with and without the adjustments.
 
We believe that these non-GAAP financial measures allow for a better understanding of our operating and financial performance.
These non-GAAP financial measures should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, the most directly comparable
U.S. GAAP measures. Although we find these non-GAAP financial measures useful in evaluating the performance of our business,
our reliance on these measures is limited because the adjustments often have a material impact on our consolidated financial
statements presented in accordance with U.S. GAAP. Therefore, we typically use these adjusted amounts in conjunction with our
U.S. GAAP results to address these limitations.
52 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Commodity Price Risk
We are exposed to commodity price risk, mainly associated with variations in the market price for ferrous and nonferrous metals,
including scrap metal, finished steel products, auto bodies and other commodities. The timing and magnitude of industry cycles are
difficult to predict and are impacted by general economic conditions. We respond to increases and decreases in forward selling prices
by adjusting purchase prices. We actively manage our exposure to commodity price risk and monitor the actual and expected spread
between forward selling prices and purchase costs and processing and shipping expense. Sales contracts are based on prices
negotiated with our customers, and generally orders are placed 30 to 60 days ahead of shipment date. However, financial results may
be negatively impacted when forward selling prices fall more quickly than we can adjust purchase prices or when customers fail to
meet their contractual obligations. We assess the net realizable value of inventory (“NRV”) each quarter based upon committed
contracts and sales orders and estimated future selling prices. For our uncommitted inventories, a 10% decrease in the selling price
of inventory would not have had a material NRV impact on any of our reportable segments as of August 31, 2020 and 2019.
Interest Rate Risk
We are exposed to market risk associated with changes in interest rates related to our debt obligations. Our revolving credit facility is
subject to variable interest rates and therefore have exposure to changes in interest rates. If market interest rates had changed 10%
from actual interest rate levels in fiscal 2020 or 2019, the effect on our interest expense and net income would not have been
material.
Credit Risk
Credit risk relates to the risk of loss that might occur as a result of non-performance by counterparties of their contractual obligations
to take delivery of scrap metal and finished steel products and to make financial settlements of these obligations, or to provide
sufficient quantities of scrap metal or payment to settle advances, loans and other contractual receivables in connection with
demolition and scrap extraction projects. We manage our exposure to credit risk through a variety of methods, including shipping
ferrous scrap metal exports under letters of credit, collection of deposits prior to shipment for certain nonferrous export customers,
establishment of credit limits for certain sales on open terms, credit insurance and designation of collateral and financial guarantees
securing advances, loans and other contractual receivables. As a result of COVID-19, we have experienced reductions in the
availability of credit insurance that we have historically used to cover a portion of our recycled metal and finished steel sales to
domestic customers, which reduced availability may increase our exposure to customer credit risk.
Historically, we have shipped almost all of our large shipments of ferrous scrap metal to foreign customers under contracts supported
by letters of credit issued or confirmed by banks deemed creditworthy. The letters of credit ensure payment by the customer. As we
generally sell export recycled ferrous metal under contracts or orders that generally provide for shipment within 30 to 60 days after
the price is agreed, our customers typically do not have difficulty obtaining letters of credit from their banks in periods of rising
ferrous prices, as the value of the letters of credit are collateralized by the value of the inventory on the ship. However, in periods of
significantly declining prices, our customers may not be able to obtain letters of credit for the full sales value of the inventory to be
shipped.
As of August 31, 2020 and 2019, 40% and 32%, respectively, of our accounts receivable balance were covered by letters of credit.
Of the remaining balance, 98% and 96% was less than 60 days past due as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Foreign Currency Exchange Rate Risk
We are exposed to foreign currency exchange rate risk, mainly associated with sales transactions and related accounts receivable
denominated in the U.S. Dollar by our Canadian subsidiary with a functional currency of the Canadian Dollar. In certain instances,
we may use derivatives to manage some portion of this risk. As of August 31, 2020 and 2019, we did not have any derivative
contracts.
 
53 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Management of the Company is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting, as
such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The Company’s internal control
over financial reporting is a process designed by, or under the supervision of, the Company’s principal executive and principal
financial officers and effected by the Company’s Board of Directors, management and other personnel to provide reasonable
assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
The Company’s internal control over financial reporting includes policies and procedures that relate to the maintenance of records
that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of assets of the Company; provide reasonable
assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit the preparation of the Company’s consolidated financial statements in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and that the receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made
only in accordance with authorization of the Company’s management and directors; and provide reasonable assurance regarding
prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the Company’s assets that could have a material
effect on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projection
of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods is subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in
conditions or that the degree of compliance with the policies and procedures may deteriorate.
Management of the Company assessed the effectiveness of the Company’s internal control over financial reporting using the criteria
established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (“COSO”). Based on its assessment, management determined that the Company’s internal control over
financial reporting was effective as of August 31, 2020.
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, the independent registered public accounting firm that audited the Company’s consolidated financial
statements included in this Annual Report, also audited the effectiveness of the Company’s internal control over financial reporting
as of August 31, 2020, as stated in their report included herein.
 
 
   
Tamara L. Lundgren  Richard D. Peach
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer
 Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Chief
Strategy Officer
October 22, 2020  October 22, 2020
 
 
 
54 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc.
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. and its subsidiaries (the
“Company”) as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, and the related consolidated statements of operations, of comprehensive (loss) income,
of equity and of cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended August 31, 2020, including the related notes and financial
statement schedule listed in the index appearing under Item 15(a)(2) (collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial
statements”). We also have audited the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of August 31, 2020, based on criteria
established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of
the Company as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the
period ended August 31, 2020 in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Also in
our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of August 31,
2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Change in Accounting Principle
As discussed in Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company changed the manner in which it accounts for leases as
of September 1, 2019 and the manner in which it accounts for revenue from contracts with customers as of September 1, 2018.
Basis for Opinions
The Company's management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control
over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the
accompanying Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express opinions
on the Company’s consolidated financial statements and on the Company's internal control over financial reporting based on our
audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB)
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the
applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether
due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial
statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as
well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial
reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness
exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits
also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide
a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to
the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the
company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements
in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only
in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding
prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material
effect on the financial statements.
55 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relate to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or
complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the
critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Volume of Ferrous Metal Inventory
As described in Notes 2 and 4 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company’s processed and unprocessed scrap metal
inventory was $63 million as of August 31, 2020, which includes processed and unprocessed ferrous metal inventory, among other
types of inventory. The accounting process the Company uses to record ferrous scrap metal quantities relies on significant estimates.
With respect to estimating the quantities of unprocessed ferrous scrap metal inventory that are moved into production, management
relies on weighed quantities of the processed ferrous material, adjusted for estimated metal recoveries and yields that are based on
historical trends and other judgments by management. Actual recoveries and yields can vary depending on product quality, moisture
content and the source of the unprocessed metal. The Company’s estimates are intended to reasonably reflect the quantities of
unprocessed ferrous scrap metal that are used in the production of processed ferrous metal. To assist in validating the reasonableness
of these estimates, management periodically reviews shrink factors and performs monthly physical inventories. Due to the inherent
nature of the Company’s scrap metal inventories, including variations in product density, holding period and production processes
utilized to manufacture the products, physical inventories will not necessarily detect all variances for scrap metal inventory such that
estimates of quantities are required. To mitigate this risk, the Company further adjusts its ferrous physical inventories when the
volume of a commodity is low and a physical inventory count is deemed to more accurately estimate the remaining volume.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the volume of ferrous metal inventory is a
critical audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by management in the estimation of metal recoveries and yields specific to
ferrous metal inventory volumes, and (ii) significant auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing our audit procedures
and in evaluating audit evidence related to the estimates made by management.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall opinion
on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to the estimation of
metal recoveries and yields specific to ferrous metal inventory volumes. These procedures also included, among others, testing
inventory quantities received, assessing the reasonableness of management’s estimated yields by comparing them to actual yields of
ultimate inventory recoveries, testing ferrous metal inventory shipments including the volume ultimately recovered, observing
management’s physical inventory counts, assessing rollforward activity between the time of the inventory counts and year-end, and
considering whether evidence obtained in other areas of the audit is consistent with management’s estimates related to ferrous metal
inventory volumes.
Goodwill Impairment Assessment - Reporting Unit within Auto and Metals Recycling (“AMR”) Operating Segment
As described in Notes 2 and 7 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company’s goodwill balance was $170 million as of
August 31, 2020, and all but $1 million of such balance was carried by a single reporting unit within AMR. Management evaluates
goodwill for impairment annually on July 1 and upon the occurrence of certain triggering events or substantive changes in
circumstances that indicate that the fair value of goodwill may be impaired. Impairment of goodwill is tested at the reporting unit
level. The quantitative impairment test entails estimating the fair value of the reporting unit and comparing it to the reporting unit’s
carrying amount. In the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020, management performed the annual goodwill impairment test as of July 1, 2020.
Management estimated the fair value of the reporting unit within AMR using an income approach based on the present value of
expected future cash flows, including terminal value, utilizing a market-based weighted average cost of capital (“WACC”) assessed
specifically for the reporting unit. The determination of fair value involves the use of estimates and assumptions, including revenue
growth rates driven by future ferrous and nonferrous commodity price and sales volume expectations, gross margins, selling, general
and administrative expense relative to total revenues, capital expenditures, working capital requirements, discount rate (WACC), tax
rate, terminal growth rate, benefits associated with a taxable transaction and synergistic benefits available to market participants.
56 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.  
 
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the goodwill impairment assessment of a
reporting unit within AMR is a critical audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by management when estimating the fair value of
the reporting unit; (ii) significant auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing procedures and evaluating management’s
significant assumptions related to the WACC, expected ferrous metal selling prices and sales volumes, gross margins, and selling,
general and administrative costs relative to total revenues; and (iii) the audit effort involved the use of professionals with specialized
skill and knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall opinion
on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to management’s
goodwill impairment assessment, including controls over the valuation of the reporting unit within AMR. These procedures also
included, among others, testing management’s process for developing the fair value estimate, evaluating the appropriateness of the
discounted cash flow model, testing the completeness and accuracy of underlying data used in the model, and evaluating the
significant assumptions used by management related to the WACC, expected ferrous metal selling prices and sales volumes, gross
margins, and selling, general and administrative costs relative to total revenues. Evaluating management’s assumptions related to the
expected ferrous metal selling prices and sales volumes, gross margins, and selling, general and administrative costs relative to total
revenues involved evaluating whether the assumptions used by management were reasonable considering the current and past
performance of the reporting unit, the consistency with external market and industry data, and whether these assumptions were
consistent with evidence obtained in other areas of the audit. Professionals with specialized skill and knowledge were used to assist
in the evaluation of the Company’s discounted cash flow model and the WACC assumption.
 
 
 
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Portland, Oregon
October 22, 2020
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1976, which includes periods before the Company became subject to SEC reporting
requirements.
 
 
57 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
  August 31,  
  2020   2019  
Assets         
Current assets:         
Cash and cash equivalents  $ 17,887  $ 12,377 
Accounts receivable, net   139,147   145,617 
Inventories   157,269   187,320 
Refundable income taxes   18,253   5,867 
Prepaid expenses and other current assets   30,075   115,107 
Total current assets   362,631   466,288 
Property, plant and equipment, net   487,004   456,400 
Operating lease right-of-use assets   140,584   — 
Investments in joint ventures   10,057   10,276 
Goodwill   169,627   169,237 
Intangibles, net   4,585   4,482 
Deferred income taxes   27,152   28,850 
Other assets   28,287   25,213 
Total assets  $ 1,229,927  $ 1,160,746 
Liabilities and Equity         
Current liabilities:         
Short-term borrowings  $ 2,184  $ 1,321 
Accounts payable   106,676   110,297 
Accrued payroll and related liabilities   41,436   27,547 
Environmental liabilities   6,302   6,030 
Operating lease liabilities   19,760   — 
Other accrued liabilities   47,306   123,035 
Total current liabilities   223,664   268,230 
Deferred income taxes   38,292   25,466 
Long-term debt, net of current maturities   102,235   103,775 
Environmental liabilities, net of current portion   47,162   45,769 
Operating lease liabilities, net of current maturities   125,001   — 
Other long-term liabilities   13,137   16,210 
Total liabilities   549,491   459,450 
Commitments and contingencies (Note 9)         
Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. (“SSI”) shareholders’ equity:         
Preferred stock – 20,000 shares $1.00 par value authorized, none issued   —   — 
Class A common stock – 75,000 shares $1.00 par value authorized,
   26,899 and 26,464 shares issued and outstanding   26,899   26,464 
Class B common stock – 25,000 shares $1.00 par value authorized,
   200 and 200 shares issued and outstanding   200   200 
Additional paid-in capital   36,616   33,700 
Retained earnings   649,863   675,363 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss   (36,871)  (38,763)
Total SSI shareholders’ equity   676,707   696,964 
Noncontrolling interests   3,729   4,332 
Total equity   680,436   701,296 
Total liabilities and equity  $ 1,229,927  $ 1,160,746
 
 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
58 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
  Year Ended August 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
Revenues  $ 1,712,343  $ 2,132,781  $ 2,364,715 
Operating expense:             
Cost of goods sold   1,503,725   1,858,535   2,010,485 
Selling, general and administrative   187,876   191,405   208,877 
(Income) from joint ventures   (834)  (1,452)  (1,953)
Asset impairment charges (recoveries), net   5,729   63   (1,021)
Restructuring charges and other exit-related activities   8,993   365   (661)
Operating income   6,854   83,865   148,988 
Interest expense   (8,669)  (8,266)  (8,983)
Other (expense) income, net   (124)  641   1,848 
(Loss) income from continuing operations before income taxes   (1,939)  76,240   141,853 
Income tax (expense) benefit   (166)  (17,670)  17,590 
(Loss) income from continuing operations   (2,105)  58,570   159,443 
(Loss) income from discontinued operations, net of tax   (95)  (248)  346 
Net (loss) income   (2,200)  58,322   159,789 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests   (1,945)  (1,977)  (3,338)
Net (loss) income attributable to SSI shareholders  $ (4,145) $ 56,345  $ 156,451 
             
Net (loss) income per share attributable to SSI shareholders:             
Basic:             
(Loss) income per share from continuing operations  $ (0.15) $ 2.06  $ 5.65 
Net (loss) income per share  $ (0.15) $ 2.05  $ 5.66 
Diluted:             
(Loss) income per share from continuing operations  $ (0.15) $ 2.01  $ 5.46 
Net (loss) income per share  $ (0.15) $ 2.00  $ 5.47 
Weighted average number of common shares:             
Basic   27,672   27,527   27,645 
Diluted   27,672   28,222   28,589
 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
59 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE (LOSS) INCOME
(In thousands)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
  Year Ended August 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
Net (loss) income  $ (2,200) $ 58,322  $ 159,789 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax:             
Foreign currency translation adjustments   1,505   (1,560)  (2,301)
Pension obligations, net   387   34   357 
Total other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax   1,892   (1,526)  (1,944)
Comprehensive (loss) income   (308)  56,796   157,845 
Less comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests   (1,945)  (1,977)  (3,338)
Comprehensive (loss) income attributable to SSI shareholders  $ (2,253) $ 54,819  $ 154,507
 
 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
60 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF EQUITY
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
                          Accumulated             
  Common Stock   Additional      Other   Total SSI         
  Class A   Class B   Paid-in  Retained  Comprehensive  Shareholders’  Noncontrolling  Total 
  Shares  Amount  Shares  Amount  Capital  Earnings  Loss   Equity   Interests  Equity 
Balance as of
September 1, 2017  26,859  $26,859   200  $ 200  $38,050  $503,770  $ (35,293) $ 533,586  $ 3,907  $537,493 
Net income   —   —   —   —   —   156,451   —   156,451   3,338   159,789 
Other comprehensive
loss, net of tax  —   —   —   —   —   —   (1,944)  (1,944)  —   (1,944)
Reclassification of
stranded tax effects
of the Tax Act(1)  —   —   —   —   —   517   —   517   —   517 
Distributions to
noncontrolling
interests  —   —   —   —   —   —   —   —   (2,796)  (2,796)
Purchase of
noncontrolling
interest  —   —   —   —   —   (183)  —   (183)  (417)  (600)
Share repurchases   (516)  (516)  —   —   (16,845)  —   —   (17,361)  —   (17,361)
Restricted stock
withheld for taxes  (103)  (103)  —   —   (2,979)  —   —   (3,082)  —   (3,082)
Issuance of restricted
stock  262   262   —   —   (262)  —   —   —   —   — 
Share-based
compensation cost  —   —   —   —   18,965   —   —   18,965   —   18,965 
Dividends ($0.75 per
common share)  —   —   —   —   —   (20,871)  —   (20,871)  —   (20,871)
Balance as of
August 31, 2018  26,502   26,502   200   200   36,929   639,684   (37,237)  666,078   4,032   670,110 
Net income   —   —   —   —   —   56,345   —   56,345   1,977   58,322 
Other comprehensive
loss, net of tax  —   —   —   —   —   —   (1,526)  (1,526)  —   (1,526)
Distributions to
noncontrolling
interests  —   —   —   —   —   —   —   —   (1,677)  (1,677)
Share repurchases   (527)  (527)  —   —   (12,556)  —   —   (13,083)  —   (13,083)
Restricted stock
withheld for taxes  (278)  (278)  —   —   (7,206)  —   —   (7,484)  —   (7,484)
Issuance of restricted
stock  767   767   —   —   (767)  —   —   —   —   — 
Share-based
compensation cost  —   —   —   —   17,300   —   —   17,300   —   17,300 
Dividends ($0.75 per
common share)  —   —   —   —   —   (20,666)  —   (20,666)  —   (20,666)
Balance as of
August 31, 2019  26,464   26,464   200   200   33,700   675,363   (38,763)  696,964   4,332   701,296 
Cumulative effect on
adoption of new
    accounting
guidance for leases,
net of tax   —   —   —   —   —   (463)  —   (463)  —   (463)
Balance as of
September 1, 2019  26,464   26,464   200   200   33,700   674,900   (38,763)  696,501   4,332   700,833 
Net (loss) income   —   —   —   —   —   (4,145)  —   (4,145)  1,945   (2,200)
Other comprehensive
income, net of tax   —   —   —   —   —   —   1,892   1,892   —   1,892 
Distributions to
noncontrolling
interests   —   —   —   —   —   —   —   —   (2,548)  (2,548)
Share repurchases   (53)  (53)  —   —   (861)  —   —   (914)  —   (914)
Issuance of restricted
stock   762   762   —   —   (762)  —   —   —   —   — 
Restricted stock
withheld for taxes   (274)  (274)  —   —   (5,571)  —   —   (5,845)  —   (5,845)
Share-based
compensation cost  —   —   —   —   10,110   —   —   10,110   —   10,110 
Dividends ($0.75 per
common share)   —   —   —   —   —   (20,892)  —   (20,892)  —   (20,892)
Balance as of
August 31, 2020   26,899  $26,899   200  $ 200  $36,616  $649,863  $ (36,871) $ 676,707  $ 3,729  $680,436
 
 
(1)Refers to the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act signed and enacted into law December 22, 2017.
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
  
61 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
  Year Ended August 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
Cash flows from operating activities:             
Net (loss) income  $ (2,200) $ 58,322   $ 159,789  
Adjustments to reconcile net (loss) income to cash provided by operating activities:             
Asset impairment char ges (recoveries), net   5,729    63   (1,021 )
Exit-related asset impairments (gains)   971   23   (1,000 )
Depreciation and amortization   58,173    53,336    49,672  
Inventory write-downs   —   775   38 
Deferred income taxes   15,096    14,613    (37,995 )
Undistributed equity in earnings of joint ventures   (834)  (1,452 )  (1,953 )
Share-based compensation expense   10,033    17,300    18,965  
Loss (gain) on the disposal of assets, net   530   (1,545 )  56 
Unrealized foreign exchange (gain) loss, net   (67)  148   (104)
Bad debt expense, net   66   74   323 
Changes in assets and liabilities, net of acquisitions:             
Accounts receivable   (2,252 )  9,478    (44,941 )
Inventories   39,226    33,466    (24,280 )
Income taxes   (15,433 )  (1,158 )  (1,755 )
Prepaid expenses and other current assets   63   (859)  (109)
Other long-term assets   (216)  1,167    (1,620 )
Operating lease assets and liabilities   334   —   — 
Accounts payable   (7,971 )  (17,068 )  26,049  
Accrued payroll and related liabilities   13,465    (19,117)  4,889  
Other accrued liabilities   7,148    (3,560 )  6,066  
Environmental liabilities   1,602    (2,476 )  3,053  
Other long-term liabilities   134   518   4,404  
Distributed equity in earnings of joint ventures   1,000    2,692    1,150  
Net cash provided by operating activities   124,597   144,740    159,676  
Cash flows from investing activities:             
Capital expenditures   (82,005 )  (94,613 )  (77,626 )
Acquisitions   —   (1,553 )  (2,300 )
Joint venture receipts, net   —   641   11 
Proceeds from sale of assets   1,290    4,070    6,517  
Deposit on land option   1,860    1,890    — 
Net cash used in investing activities   (78,855 )  (89,565 )  (73,398 )
Cash flows from financing activities:             
Borrowings from long-term debt   690,162    431,048    515,480  
Repayments of long-term debt   (698,492 )  (435,353 )  (556,456 )
Payment of debt issuance costs   (1,983 )  (102)  (2,590 )
Repurchase of Class A common stock   (914)  (13,083 )  (17,361 )
Taxes paid related to net share settlement of share-based payment awards   (5,845 )  (7,484 )  (3,082 )
Distributions to noncontrolling interests   (2,548 )  (1,677 )  (2,796 )
Purchase of noncontrolling interest   —   —   (600)
Dividends paid   (20,884 )  (20,615 )  (20,736 )
Net cash used in financing activities   (40,504 )  (47,266 )  (88,141 )
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash   272   (255)  (701)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents   5,510    7,654    (2,564 )
Cash and cash equivalents as of beginning of year   12,377    4,723    7,287  
Cash and cash equivalents as of end of year  $ 17,887   $ 12,377   $ 4,723
 
 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
62 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS (CONTINUED)
(In thousands)
(Currency – U.S. Dollar)
 
  Year Ended August 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
SUPPLEMENT AL DISCLOSURES:             
Cash paid during the year for:             
Interest  $ 5,503   $ 6,191   $ 8,113 
Income taxes, net  $ 478  $ 3,527   $ 17,203  
Schedule of noncash investing and financing transactions:             
Purchases of property , plant and equipment included in liabilities  $ 27,319   $ 17,191   $ 18,768
 
 
See Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
 
63 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 1 - Nature of Operations
Founded in 1906, Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc., an Oregon corporation, is one of North America’s largest recyclers of ferrous and
nonferrous scrap metal, including end-of-life vehicles, and a manufacturer of finished steel products. Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc.
and its consolidated subsidiaries, together, are referred to as the Company.
The Company’s internal organizational and reporting structure includes two operating and reportable segments: the Auto and Metals
Recycling (“AMR”) business and the Cascade Steel and Scrap (“CSS”) business.
AMR acquires and recycles ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal for sale to foreign and domestic metal producers, processors and
brokers, and procures salvaged vehicles and sells serviceable used auto parts from these vehicles through a network of self-service
auto parts stores. These auto parts stores also supply the Company’s shredding facilities with auto bodies that are processed into
saleable recycled scrap metal.
CSS operates a steel mini-mill that produces a range of finished steel long products using ferrous recycled scrap metal and other raw
materials. CSS’s steel mill obtains substantially all of its scrap metal raw material requirements from its integrated metals recycling
and joint venture operations. CSS’s metals recycling operations also sell recycled metal to external customers primarily in export
markets.
Refer to Note 18 – Segment Information for financial information on the Company’s reportable segments.
As of August 31, 2020, all of the Company’s facilities were located in the United States (“U.S.”) and its territories and Canada.
In April 2020, the Company announced its intention to modify its internal organizational and reporting structure to a functionally
based, integrated model. The Company will consolidate its operations, sales, services and other functional capabilities at an
enterprise level. The Company expects to complete this transition in the first quarter of fiscal 2021 resulting in a single operating and
reportable segment.
Note 2 - Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Principles of Consolidation
The Consolidated Financial Statements include the accounts of Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. and its majority-owned and wholly-
owned subsidiaries. The equity method of accounting is used for investments in joint ventures over which the Company has
significant influence but does not have effective control. All significant intercompany account balances, transactions, profits and
losses have been eliminated. All transactions and relationships with variable interest entities are evaluated to determine whether the
Company is the primary beneficiary of the entities, therefore requiring consolidation. The Company does not have any variable
interest entities requiring consolidation.
Accounting Changes
As of the beginning of the first quarter of fiscal 2020, the Company adopted an accounting standards update, initially issued in
February 2016, that requires a lessee to recognize a lease liability and a lease right-of-use asset on its balance sheet for all leases
greater than 12 months, including those classified as operating leases. The update supersedes the previous lease accounting standard.
The Company adopted the new lease accounting standard using the modified retrospective transition method, whereby it applied the
new requirements by recognizing a cumulative-effect adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings as of September 1,
2019. Such cumulative-effect adjustment for the Company was not material. Adoption using the modified retrospective transition
method did not have an impact on any prior period earnings of the Company, and no comparative prior periods were adjusted for the
new guidance. The Company elected a package of practical expedients permitted under the transition guidance within the new lease
accounting standard, which among other things, permit carrying forward the historical lease classification. The Company also
elected the practical expedient exempting short-term leases from balance sheet recognition, whereby payments for such leases are
recognized in the income statement on a straight-line basis over the lease term. In addition, the Company elected the practical
expedient to not separate lease and non-lease components, which the Company elected to apply to all classes of underlying assets.
Adoption of the new standard resulted in recognition of $126 million and $128 million of operating lease right-of-use assets and
liabilities, respectively, as of September 1, 2019, which are presented as separate line items on the balance sheet. Operating lease
right-of-use assets are considered long-lived assets subject to existing long-lived asset impairment guidance. Adoption also resulted
in the reclassification of the Company’s capital lease assets and obligations as finance lease right-of-use assets and liabilities as of
September 1, 2019, with such reclassification having no impact on the carrying amounts or financial statement line items within
which the leases are reported. See Note 5 - Leases for the disclosures required under the new standard.
64 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
As of the beginning of the first quarter of fiscal 2019, the Company adopted an accounting standards update initially issued in May
2014 that clarifies the principles for recognizing revenue from contracts with customers. The Company adopted the accounting
standard using the modified retrospective approach and recorded no cumulative-effect adjustment to the opening balance of retained
earnings as of September 1, 2018. The Company identified certain scrap purchase and sale arrangements for which it recognized
revenue for the gross amount of consideration it expected to be entitled to from the customer (as principal) under the previous
revenue guidance, but for which under the new revenue standard it recognizes revenue as the net amount of consideration that it
expects to retain after paying the scrap metal supplier (as agent). The foregoing change in the classification of the cost of scrap metal
purchased under such arrangements has the effect of reducing the amount of revenue and cost of goods sold reported in the financial
statements, while having no impact on net income. If the Company had continued using the accounting guidance in effect before the
adoption of the new revenue accounting standard, its consolidated revenues for fiscal 2019 would have been higher by
approximately $28 million, or 1%, and its consolidated cost of goods sold would have been higher by the same amount. No other
line items in the consolidated financial statements were materially impacted by adoption of the new requirements. Fiscal 2018
amounts and disclosures continue to be reported in accordance with guidance in effect prior to the date of adoption. See Note 11 -
Revenue for the disclosures required under the new standard.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
Cash and cash equivalents include short-term securities that are not restricted by third parties and have an original maturity date of
90 days or less. Included in accounts payable are book overdrafts representing outstanding checks in excess of funds on deposit of
$20 million and $27 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Accounts Receivable, net
Accounts receivable represent amounts primarily due from customers on product and other sales. These accounts receivable, which
are reduced by an allowance for doubtful accounts, are recorded at the invoiced amount and do not bear interest. The Company
extends credit to customers under contracts containing customary and explicit payment terms, and payment is generally required
within 30 to 60 days of shipment. Nonferrous export sales typically require a deposit prior to shipment. Historically, almost all of the
Company’s ferrous export sales have been made with letters of credit. Ferrous metal sales, nonferrous metal sales and finished steel
sales to domestic customers are generally made on open account, and a portion of these sales are covered by credit insurance.
The Company evaluates the collectibility of its accounts receivable based on a combination of factors, including whether sales were
made pursuant to letters of credit or credit insurance is in place. In cases where management is aware of circumstances that may
impair a customer’s ability to meet its financial obligations, management records a specific allowance against amounts due and
reduces the receivable to the amount the Company believes will be collected. For all other customers, the Company maintains an
allowance that considers the total receivables outstanding, historical collection rates and economic trends. Accounts are written off
when all efforts to collect have been exhausted. The allowance for doubtful accounts was $2 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019.
Also included in accounts receivable are short-term advances to scrap metal suppliers used as a mechanism to acquire unprocessed
scrap metal. The advances are generally repaid with scrap metal, as opposed to cash. Repayments of advances with scrap metal are
treated as noncash operating activities in the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows and totaled $9 million, $15 million and $15
million for the fiscal years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
65 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Inventories
The Company’s inventories consist of processed and unprocessed scrap metal (ferrous, nonferrous, and mixed nonferrous recovered
joint products arising from the manufacturing process), semi-finished steel products (billets), finished steel products (primarily rebar,
wire rod, and merchant bar), used and salvaged vehicles, and supplies. Inventories are stated at the lower of cost and net realizable
value. The Company determines the cost of ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal inventories using the average cost method and
capitalizes substantially all direct processing costs and yard costs into inventory. The Company allocates material and production
costs to joint products using the gross margin method. AMR determines the cost of used and salvaged vehicle inventory at its auto
parts stores, which is reported within finished goods, based on the average price the Company pays for a vehicle and capitalizes the
vehicle cost and substantially all production costs into inventory. CSS determines the cost of its semi-finished and finished steel
product inventories based on average costs and capitalizes all direct and indirect costs of manufacturing into inventory. Indirect costs
of manufacturing include general plant costs, maintenance and yard costs. The Company determines the cost of the substantial
majority of its supplies inventory using the average cost method and reduces the carrying value for losses due to obsolescence. The
Company considers estimated future selling prices when determining the estimated net realizable value of its inventory. As the
Company generally sells its recycled ferrous metal under contracts that provide for shipment within 30 to 60 days after the price is
agreed, it utilizes the selling prices under committed contracts and sales orders for determining the estimated net realizable value of
quantities on hand that will be shipped under these contracts and sales orders.
The accounting process the Company uses to record ferrous scrap metal quantities relies on significant estimates. With respect to
estimating the quantities of unprocessed ferrous scrap metal inventory that are moved into production, management relies on
weighed quantities of the processed ferrous material, adjusted for estimated metal recoveries and yields that are based on historical
trends and other judgments by management. Actual recoveries and yields can vary depending on product quality, moisture content
and the source of the unprocessed metal. The Company’s estimates are intended to reasonably reflect the quantities of unprocessed
ferrous scrap metal that are used in the production of processed ferrous metal. To assist in validating the reasonableness of these
estimates, management periodically reviews shrink factors and performs monthly physical inventories. Due to the inherent nature of
the Company’s scrap metal inventories, including variations in product density, holding period and production processes utilized to
manufacture the products, physical inventories will not necessarily detect all variances for scrap metal inventory such that estimates
of quantities are required. To mitigate this risk, the Company further adjusts its ferrous physical inventories when the volume of a
commodity is low and a physical inventory count is deemed to more accurately estimate the remaining volume.
Leases
The Company enters into leases to obtain access to real property, machinery and equipment assets. Most of the Company’s lease
obligations relate to real property leases for AMR operating sites, including the substantial majority of its auto parts stores, and for
the Company’s administrative offices. The Company determines whether an arrangement contains a lease at inception by assessing
whether it receives the right to direct the use of and obtain substantially all of the economic benefit from use of the underlying asset.
Lease classification, measurement, and recognition are determined at lease commencement, which is the date the underlying asset is
available for use by the Company. The accounting classification of a lease is based on whether the arrangement is effectively a
financed purchase of the underlying asset (finance lease) or not (operating lease). Leases that, at lease commencement, have a non-
cancellable lease term of 12 months or less and do not include an option to either purchase the underlying asset or renew the lease
beyond 12 months that the Company is reasonably certain to exercise are classified as short-term leases and are not recognized on
the balance sheet.
For leases other than short-term leases, the Company recognizes right-of-use assets and lease liabilities based primarily on the
present value of future minimum lease payments over the lease term at lease commencement. Right-of-use assets represent the
Company’s right to use the underlying asset during the lease term, while lease liabilities represent the Company’s obligation to make
future lease payments. The lease term is the non-cancellable period of the lease, together with periods covered by renewal (or
termination) options which the Company is reasonably certain to exercise (or not to exercise). Lease payments are discounted to
present value using the Company’s incremental borrowing rate, unless the discount rate implicit in the lease is readily determinable.
The Company’s incremental borrowing rate for each lease is the estimated rate of interest that the Company would have to pay to
borrow the aggregate lease payments on a collateralized basis over the lease term. Estimation of the incremental borrowing rate
requires judgment by management and reflects an assessment of the Company’s credit standing to derive an implied secured credit
rating and corresponding yield curve. The Company used the incremental borrowing rate to recognize all operating lease right-of-use
assets and liabilities as of the new lease accounting standard application date. Right-of-use assets and lease liabilities are subject to
remeasurement after lease commencement when certain events or changes in circumstances arise, such as a change in the lease term
due to reassessment of whether the Company is reasonably certain to exercise a renewal or termination option.
66 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
For operating leases, lease expense is recognized on a straight-line basis over the lease term. For finance leases, the lease right-of-use
asset is amortized on a straight-line basis and interest expense is recognized on the lease liability using the effective interest rate
method. Many of the Company’s real property leases contain variable lease payments that depend on an index or a rate, which are
included in the measurement of the right-of-use asset and lease liability using the index or rate at lease commencement, or with
respect to the Company’s transition to the new lease accounting standard the index or rate at the application date. Subsequent
changes in variable lease payments are recorded as variable lease expenses during the period in which they are incurred. The
Company elected a practical expedient to not separate lease and related non-lease components for accounting purposes and, thus,
costs related to such non-lease components are disclosed as lease expense. Payments for short-term leases are recognized in the
income statement on a straight-line basis over the lease term. See Note 5 - Leases for further detail.
Property, Plant and Equipment, net
Property, plant and equipment are recorded at cost. Expenditures for major additions and improvements are capitalized, while routine
repair and maintenance costs are expensed as incurred. Interest related to the construction of qualifying assets is capitalized as part of
the construction costs and was not material to any of the periods presented. When assets are retired or sold, the related cost and
accumulated depreciation are removed from the accounts and resulting gains or losses are generally included in operating expense.
Gains and losses from sales of assets related to an exit activity are reported within restructuring charges and other exit-related
activities in the Consolidated Statements of Operations. Depreciation is recorded on a straight-line basis over the estimated useful
lives of the assets. Upon idling an asset, depreciation continues to be recorded. Leasehold improvements are amortized over the
shorter of their estimated useful lives or the remaining lease term.
As of August 31, 2020, the useful lives used for depreciation and amortization were as follows:
  Useful Life
(in years)
Machinery and equipment  3 to 40
Land improvements  3 to 35
Buildings and leasehold improvements  5 to 40
Office equipment and other software licenses  3 to 10
Enterprise Resource Planning (“ERP”) systems  6 to 17
 
Prepaid Expenses
The Company’s prepaid expenses, reported within prepaid expenses and other current assets in the Consolidated Balance Sheets,
totaled $23 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, and consisted primarily of deposits on capital projects, prepaid insurance,
prepaid services and prepaid property taxes.
Other Assets
The Company’s other assets, exclusive of prepaid expenses and assets relating to certain retirement plans, consist primarily of spare
parts, an equity investment, receivables from insurers, debt issuance costs, capitalized implementation costs for cloud computing
arrangements, and notes and other contractual receivables. Other assets are reported within either prepaid expenses and other current
assets or other assets in the Consolidated Balance Sheets based on their expected use either during or beyond the current operating
cycle of one year from the reporting date. See Note 12 – Employee Benefits for further detail on the Company’s assets relating to
retirement plans.
The Company invested $6 million in the equity of a privately-held waste and recycling entity in fiscal 2017. The equity investment
does not have a readily determinable fair value and, therefore, is carried at cost and adjusted for impairments and observable price
changes. The investment is presented as part of the AMR reportable segment and reported within other assets in the Consolidated
Balance Sheets. The carrying value of the investment was $6 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019. The Company has not
recorded any impairments or upward or downward adjustments to the carrying value of the investment since its acquisition.
Receivables from insurers represent the portion of insured losses expected to be recovered from the Company’s insurance carriers.
The receivable is recorded at an amount not to exceed the recorded loss and only if the terms of legally enforceable insurance
contracts support that the insurance recovery will not be disputed and is deemed collectible. Receivables from insurers totaled $5
million and $89 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, with the decrease in fiscal 2020 resulting primarily from full
payment by the Company’s insurers of settlements for lawsuits arising from a 2016 motor vehicle collision. See “Contingencies –
Other” in Note 9 - Commitments and Contingencies for further discussion of this matter.
67 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Debt issuance costs consist primarily of costs incurred by the Company to enter into or modify its credit facilities. The Company
reports deferred debt issuance costs within other assets in the Consolidated Balance Sheets and amortizes them to interest expense on
a straight-line basis over the contractual term of the arrangement.
The Company’s cloud computing arrangements primarily comprise hosting arrangements which are service contracts, whereby the
Company gains remote access to use enterprise software hosted by the vendor or another third party on an as-needed basis for a
period of time in exchange for a subscription fee. Subscription fees are usually prepaid and recorded in expense over the period that
the Company has access to use the software. Implementation costs for cloud computing arrangements are capitalized if certain
criteria are met and consist of internal and external costs directly attributable to developing and configuring cloud computing
software for its intended use. Amortization of capitalized implementation costs is recorded on a straight-line basis over the term of
the cloud computing arrangement, which is the non-cancellable period of the agreement, together with periods covered by renewal
options which the Company is reasonably certain to exercise.
Notes and other contractual receivables consist primarily of advances to entities in the business of extracting scrap metal through
demolition and other activities, as well as receivables from counterparties to sales of equipment assets and to legal settlements.
Repayment of these advances to suppliers is in either cash or scrap metal. The Company performs periodic reviews of its notes and
other contractual receivables to identify credit risks and to assess the overall collectibility of the receivables, which typically
involves consideration of the value of collateral which in the case of advances to suppliers is generally in the form of scrap metal
extracted from demolition and construction projects. A note or other contractual receivable is considered impaired when, based on
current information and events, it is probable that the Company will be unable to collect all amounts due in accordance with the
contractual terms of the agreement. Once a note or other contractual receivable has been identified as impaired, it is measured based
on the present value of payments expected to be received, discounted at the receivable’s contractual interest rate, or for arrangements
that are solely dependent on collateral for repayment, the estimated fair value of the collateral less estimated costs to sell. If the
carrying value of the receivable exceeds its recoverable amount, an impairment is recorded for the difference.
Long-Lived Assets
The Company tests long-lived tangible and intangible assets for impairment at the asset group level, which is determined based on
the lowest level for which identifiable cash flows are largely independent of the cash flows of other groups of assets and liabilities.
Operating lease right-of-use assets are considered long-lived assets subject to this impairment testing. For the Company’s metals
recycling operations reported within AMR, an asset group generally consists of the regional shredding and export operation along
with surrounding feeder yards. For regions with no shredding and export operations, each metals recycling yard is an asset group.
For the Company’s auto parts operations, generally each auto parts store is an asset group. The combined steel manufacturing and
metals recycling operations within CSS are a single asset group. The Company tests its asset groups for impairment when certain
triggering events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of the asset group may be impaired. If the carrying
value of the asset group is not recoverable because it exceeds the Company’s estimate of future undiscounted cash flows from the
use and eventual disposition of the asset group, an impairment loss is recognized by the amount the carrying value exceeds its fair
value, if any. The impairment loss is allocated to the long-lived assets of the group on a pro rata basis using the relative carrying
amounts of those assets, except that the loss allocated to an individual long-lived asset of the group shall not reduce the carrying
amount of that asset below its fair value. Fair value is determined using one or more of the income, market or cost approaches,
depending on the nature of the asset group.
With respect to individual long-lived assets, changes in circumstances may merit a change in the estimated useful lives or salvage
values of the assets, which are accounted for prospectively in the period of change. For such assets, the useful life is shortened based
on the Company’s plans to dispose of or abandon the asset before the end of its original useful life and depreciation is accelerated
beginning when that determination is made.
68 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Long-lived asset impairment charges (recoveries) and accelerated depreciation are reported in the Consolidated Statements of
Operations within (1) asset impairment charges (recoveries), net and (2) restructuring charges and other exit-related activities if
related to a site closure. During fiscal 2020, the Company reported $6 million of such items within asset impairment charges
(recoveries), net, comprising primarily $2 million related to abandonment of obsolete machinery and equipment assets, $2 million
related to impairment of two auto parts stores and $2 million related to accelerated depreciation due to the shortening of the useful
lives of certain metals recovery assets, each in the AMR reportable segment.
Investments in Joint Ventures
As of August 31, 2020, the Company had two 50%-owned joint venture interests which were accounted for under the equity method
of accounting. One of the joint venture interests is presented as part of AMR operations, and one interest is presented as part of CSS
operations. The joint venture within CSS sells recycled scrap metal to other operations within CSS at prices that approximate local
market rates, which produces intercompany profit. This intercompany profit is eliminated while the products remain in inventory and
is not recognized until the finished products are sold to third parties. As of August 31, 2020, the Company’s investments in equity
method joint ventures have generated $8 million in cumulative undistributed earnings.
A loss in value of an investment in a joint venture is recognized when the decline is other than temporary. Management considers all
available evidence to evaluate the realizable value of its investments including the length of time and the extent to which the fair
value has been less than cost, the financial condition and near-term prospects of the joint venture business, and the Company’s intent
and ability to retain the investment for a period of time sufficient to allow for any anticipated recovery in fair value. Once
management determines that an other-than-temporary impairment exists, the investment is written down to its fair value, which
establishes a new cost basis. The Company determines fair value using Level 3 inputs under the fair value hierarchy using an income
approach based on a discounted cash flow analysis.
During fiscal 2018, the Company declassified two of its 50% joint venture interests from equity method classification as a result of
the agreed-upon dissolution of the joint venture entities. The joint venture interests had previously been presented as part of AMR
operations. See Note 17 - Related Party Transactions for further detail on transactions with joint ventures.
 
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net
Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price over the net amount of identifiable assets acquired and liabilities assumed in a
business combination measured at fair value. The Company evaluates goodwill for impairment annually on July 1 and upon the
occurrence of certain triggering events or substantive changes in circumstances that indicate that the fair value of goodwill may be
impaired. Impairment of goodwill is tested at the reporting unit level. A reporting unit is an operating segment or one level below an
operating segment (referred to as a ‘component’). A component of an operating segment is required to be identified as a reporting
unit if the component is a business for which discrete financial information is available and segment management regularly reviews
its operating results.
When testing goodwill for impairment, the Company has the option to first assess qualitative factors to determine whether the
existence of events or circumstances leads to a determination that it is more-likely-than-not that the estimated fair value of a
reporting unit is less than its carrying amount. If the Company elects to perform a qualitative assessment and determines that an
impairment is more-likely-than-not, the Company is then required to perform the quantitative impairment test, otherwise no further
analysis is required. The Company also may elect not to perform the qualitative assessment and, instead, proceed directly to the
quantitative impairment test. When performing the quantitative impairment test, the Company applies a one-step quantitative test
and records the amount of goodwill impairment as the excess of a reporting unit’s carrying amount over its fair value, not to exceed
the total amount of goodwill allocated to that reporting unit.
When the Company performs a quantitative goodwill impairment test, it estimates the fair value of the reporting unit using an
income approach based on the present value of expected future cash flows, including terminal value, utilizing a market-based
weighted average cost of capital (“WACC”) determined separately for the reporting unit. The determination of fair value involves the
use of estimates and assumptions, including revenue growth rates driven by future ferrous and nonferrous commodity price and sales
volume expectations, gross margins, selling, general and administrative expense relative to total revenues, capital expenditures,
working capital requirements, discount rate (WACC), tax rate, terminal growth rate, benefits associated with a taxable transaction
and synergistic benefits available to market participants. In addition, to corroborate the reporting units’ valuation, the Company uses
a market approach based on earnings multiple data and a reconciliation of the Company’s estimate of the aggregate fair value of all
reporting units to the Company’s market capitalization, including consideration of a control premium. The Company did not record
goodwill impairment charges in any of the periods presented.
69 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
The Company tests indefinite-lived intangible assets for impairment by first assessing qualitative factors to determine whether it is
necessary to perform a quantitative impairment test. If the Company believes, as a result of its qualitative assessment, that it is more-
likely-than-not that the fair value of the indefinite-lived intangible asset is less than its carrying amount, the quantitative impairment
test is required. Otherwise, no further testing is required. The Company did not record impairment charges on indefinite-lived
intangible assets in any of the periods presented. See Note 7 - Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net for further detail.
Business Acquisitions
The Company recognizes the assets acquired, the liabilities assumed, and any noncontrolling interest in the acquiree at the
acquisition date, measured at their fair values as of that date. Contingent purchase consideration is recorded at fair value at the date
of acquisition. Any excess purchase price over the fair value of the net assets acquired is recorded as goodwill. Within one year from
the date of acquisition, the Company may update the value allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed and the resulting
goodwill balance as a result of information received regarding the valuation of such assets and liabilities that was not available at the
time of purchase. Measuring assets and liabilities at fair value requires the Company to determine the price that would be paid by a
third party market participant based on the highest and best use of the assets or interests acquired. Acquisition costs are expensed as
incurred.
The Company acquired certain assets of an auto recycling business in northern California in fiscal 2019 and certain assets of a metals
recycling business in Columbus, Georgia in fiscal 2018. These acquisitions were not material to the Company’s financial position or
results of operations. Pro forma operating results for these acquisitions are not presented, since the aggregate results would not be
significantly different than reported results. There were no business acquisitions in fiscal 2020. See Note 7 - Goodwill and Other
Intangible Assets, net for further detail.
Restructuring Charges and Other Exit-Related Activities
Restructuring charges consist of severance, contract termination and other restructuring-related costs. A liability for severance costs
is typically recognized when the plan of termination has been communicated to the affected employees and is measured at its fair
value at the communication date. A liability for contract termination or other restructuring-related costs is measured at its fair value
in the period in which the liability is incurred. Exit-related activities consist of asset impairments in connection with closure of
certain operations and sites, net of gains on exit-related disposals.
Accrued Workers’ Compensation Costs
The Company is self-insured for the significant majority of workers’ compensation claims with exposure limited by various stop-loss
insurance policies. The Company estimates the costs of workers’ compensation claims based on the nature of the injury incurred and
on guidelines established by the applicable state. An accrual is recorded based upon the amount of unpaid claims as of the balance
sheet date. Accrued amounts recorded for individual claims are reviewed periodically as treatment progresses and adjusted to reflect
additional information that becomes available. The estimated cost of claims incurred but not reported is included in the accrual. The
Company accrued $8 million for the estimated cost of unpaid workers’ compensation claims as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, which
are included in other accrued liabilities in the Consolidated Balance Sheets, with corresponding workers’ compensation insurance
receivables of $4 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019 included in other current assets.
Environmental Liabilities
The Company estimates future costs for known environmental remediation requirements and accrues for them on an undiscounted
basis when it is probable that the Company has incurred a liability and the related costs can be reasonably estimated but the timing of
incurring the estimated costs is unknown. The Company considers various factors when estimating its environmental liabilities.
Adjustments to the liabilities are recorded to selling, general and administrative expense in the Consolidated Statements of
Operations when additional information becomes available that affects the estimated costs to study or remediate any environmental
issues or when expenditures are made for which liabilities were established. Legal costs incurred in connection with environmental
contingencies are expensed as incurred.
70 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
When only a wide range of estimated amounts can be reasonably established and no other amount within the range is a better
estimate than another, the low end of the range is recorded in the financial statements. In a number of cases, it is possible that the
Company may receive reimbursement through insurance or from other third parties for a site or matter. In these situations, recoveries
of environmental remediation costs from other parties are recognized when realization of the claim for recovery is deemed probable.
The amounts recorded for environmental liabilities are reviewed periodically as assessment and remediation progresses at individual
sites or for particular matters and adjusted to reflect additional information that becomes available. Due to evolving remediation
technology, changing regulations, possible third party contributions, the subjective nature of the assumptions used and other factors,
amounts accrued could vary significantly from amounts paid. See “Contingencies – Environmental” in Note 9 - Commitments and
Contingencies for further detail.
Loss Contingencies
The Company is subject to certain legal proceedings and contingencies in addition to those related to environmental liabilities
discussed above in this Note, the outcomes of which are subject to significant uncertainty. The Company accrues for estimated losses
if it is probable that a liability has been incurred and the amount of the loss can be reasonably estimated. Legal costs incurred in
connection with loss contingencies are expensed as incurred. The Company uses judgment and evaluates whether a loss contingency
arising from litigation or an unasserted claim should be disclosed or recorded. The outcome of legal proceedings and other
contingencies is inherently uncertain and often difficult to estimate. Accrued legal contingencies are reported within other accrued
liabilities in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. See “Contingencies – Other” in Note 9 - Commitments and Contingencies for further
detail.
Financial Instruments
The Company’s financial instruments include cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable, accounts payable, and debt. The
Company uses the market approach to value its financial assets and liabilities, determined using available market information. The
net carrying amounts of cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable and accounts payable approximate fair value due to the short-
term nature of these instruments. For long-term debt, which is primarily at variable interest rates, fair value is estimated using
observable inputs (Level 2) and approximates its carrying value.
Fair Value Measurements
Fair value is measured using inputs from the three levels of the fair value hierarchy. Classification within the hierarchy is determined
based on the lowest level input that is significant to the fair value measurement. The three levels are described as follows:
 •Level 1 – Unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical assets and liabilities.
 •Level 2 – Inputs other than quoted prices included within Level 1 that are observable for the determination of the fair value
of the asset or liability, either directly or indirectly.
 •Level 3 – Unobservable inputs that are significant to the determination of the fair value of the asset or liability.
When developing the fair value measurements, the Company uses quoted market prices whenever available or seeks to maximize the
use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs when quoted market prices are not available.
Derivatives
Derivative contracts for commodities used in normal business operations that are settled by physical delivery, among other criteria,
are eligible for and may be designated as normal purchases and normal sales. Contracts that qualify as normal purchases or normal
sales are not marked-to-market. The Company does not use derivative instruments for trading or speculative purposes.
71 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Foreign Currency Translation and Transactions
Assets and liabilities of the Company’s operations in Canada are translated into U.S. dollars at the period-end exchange rate,
revenues and expenses of these operations are translated into U.S. dollars at the average exchange rate for the period, and cash flows
of these operations are translated into U.S. dollars using the exchange rates in effect at the time of the cash flows. Translation
adjustments are not included in determining net income for the period, but are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income,
a separate component of shareholders’ equity. Foreign currency transaction gains and losses are generated from the effects of
exchange rate changes on transactions denominated in a currency other than the functional currency. Gains and losses on foreign
currency transactions are generally included in determining net income for the period. The Company reports these gains and losses
within other (expense) income, net in the Consolidated Statements of Operations. Net realized and unrealized foreign currency
transaction gains and losses were not material for fiscal 2020, 2019 or 2018.
Common Stock
Each share of Class A and Class B common stock is entitled to one vote. Additionally, each share of Class B common stock may be
converted to one share of Class A common stock. As such, the Company reserves one share of Class A common stock for each share
of Class B common stock outstanding. There are currently no meaningful distinctions between the rights of holders of Class A shares
and Class B shares.
Share Repurchases
The Company accounts for the repurchase of stock at par value. All shares repurchased are deemed retired. Upon retirement of the
shares, the Company records the difference between the weighted average cost of such shares and the par value of the stock as an
adjustment to additional paid-in capital, with the excess recorded to retained earnings when additional paid-in capital is not
sufficient.
Revenue Recognition
The Company recognizes revenue upon satisfying its promises to transfer goods or services to customers under the terms of its
contracts. Nearly all of these promises, referred to as performance obligations, consist of the transfer of physical goods, including
ferrous and nonferrous recycled scrap metal, auto bodies, auto parts, and finished steel products, to customers. These performance
obligations are satisfied at the point in time the Company transfers control of the goods to the customer, which in nearly all cases is
when title to and risk of loss of the goods transfer to the customer. The timing of transfer of title and risk of loss is dictated by
customary or explicitly stated contract terms. For example, the Company recognizes revenue on partially loaded bulk shipments of
ferrous recycled scrap metal when contractual terms support revenue recognition based on transfer of title and risk of loss. The
significant majority of the Company’s sales involve transfer of control to the customer, and thus revenue recognition, before delivery
to the customer’s destination; for example, upon release of the goods to the shipper. The Company’s bill-and-hold arrangements
involve transfer of control to the customer when the goods have been segregated from other inventory at the Company’s facility and
are ready for physical transfer to the customer. Shipping and handling activities that occur after a customer has obtained control of a
good are accounted for as fulfillment costs rather than an additional promise in a contract. As such, shipping and handling
consideration (freight revenue) is recognized when control of the goods transfers to the customer, and freight expense is accrued to
cost of goods sold when the related revenue is recognized.
In certain regional markets, the Company enters into contracts whereby it arranges for, or brokers, the transfer of scrap material
between scrap suppliers and end customers. For transactions in which the Company obtains substantive control of the scrap material
before the goods are transferred to the end customer, for example by arranging for the processing or warehousing of the material, the
Company recognizes revenue equal to the gross amount of the consideration it expects to receive from the customer (as principal).
Alternatively, for transactions in which the Company does not obtain substantive control of the scrap material before the product is
transferred to the end customer, the Company recognizes revenue equal to the net amount of the consideration it expects to retain
after paying the supplier for the purchase of the scrap material (as agent). The Company is the agent in the transaction for the
substantial majority of brokerage arrangements.
Nearly all of the Company’s sales contracts reflect market pricing at the time the contract is executed, are one year or less, and
generally provide for shipment within 30 to 60 days after the price has been agreed upon with the customer. The Company’s retail
auto parts sales are at listed prices and are recognized at the point of sale.
72 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
The Company recognizes revenue based on contractually stated selling prices and quantities shipped, net of sales tax, and adjusted
for estimated claims and discounts. Claims are customary in the recycled scrap metal industry and arise from variances in the
quantity or quality of delivered products. Revenue adjustments may be required if the settlement of claims exceeds original
estimates. Discounts offered to certain finished steel customers qualify as variable consideration as the discounts are contingent upon
future events. Variable consideration arising from discounts is recognized upon the transfer of finished steel products to customers
based upon either the expected value or the most likely amount and was not material for each of the years ended August 31, 2020
and 2019. The Company experiences very few sales returns and, therefore, no material provisions for returns have been made when
sales are recognized. During each of the years ended August 31, 2020 and 2019, revenue adjustments related to performance
obligations that were satisfied in previous periods were not material.
Advertising Costs
The Company expenses advertising costs when incurred. Advertising expense was $5 million in fiscal 2020 and $6 million in each of
fiscal 2019 and 2018.
Share-Based Compensation
The Company estimates grant-date fair value of stock-based compensation awards based on the market closing price of the
underlying Class A common stock on the date of grant, except for performance share awards with a total shareholder return (“TSR”)
market performance metric for which the Company estimates fair value using a Monte-Carlo simulation model. The Company
recognizes compensation expense for all awards, net of estimated forfeitures, over the requisite service period. Compensation
expense is based on the grant-date fair value as described above, except for performance share awards with a non-market return on
capital employed (“ROCE") performance metric. For these awards compensation expense is based on the probable outcome of
achieving the specified performance conditions. The Company reassesses whether achievement of the ROCE performance metric is
probable at each reporting date. See Note 13 - Share-Based Compensation for further detail.
Income Taxes
Income taxes are accounted for using the asset and liability method. This requires the recognition of taxes currently payable or
refundable and the recognition of deferred tax assets and liabilities for the future tax consequences of events that are recognized in
one reporting period on the Consolidated Financial Statements but in a different reporting period on the tax returns. Tax credits are
recognized as a reduction of income tax expense in the year the credit arises. Valuation allowances are recorded to reduce deferred
tax assets when it is more-likely-than-not that a tax benefit will not be realized. The Company assesses the realizability of its
deferred tax assets on a quarterly basis through an analysis of potential sources of future taxable income, including prior year taxable
income available to absorb a carryback of tax losses, reversals of existing taxable temporary differences, tax planning strategies, and
forecasts of taxable income. The Company considers all negative and positive evidence, including the weight of the evidence, to
determine if valuation allowances against deferred tax assets are required. Tax benefits arising from uncertain tax positions are
recognized when it is more-likely-than-not that the position will be sustained upon examination by the relevant tax authorities. The
amount recognized in the financial statements is the largest amount of tax benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely of being
realized upon ultimate settlement with a taxing authority that has full knowledge of all relevant information. The Company
recognizes interest and penalties, if any, related to uncertain tax positions in income tax expense. Note 14 - Income Taxes for further
detail.
Net (Loss) Income Per Share
Basic net (loss) income per share attributable to SSI shareholders is computed by dividing net (loss) income attributable to SSI
shareholders by the weighted average number of outstanding common shares during the period presented including vested deferred
stock units (“DSUs”) and restricted stock units (“RSUs”) meeting certain criteria. Diluted net (loss) income per share attributable to
SSI shareholders is computed by dividing net (loss) income attributable to SSI shareholders by the weighted average number of
common shares outstanding, assuming dilution. Potentially dilutive common shares include the assumed vesting of performance
share, RSU and DSU awards using the treasury stock method. Certain of the Company’s performance share and RSU awards were
excluded from the calculation of diluted net (loss) income per share attributable to SSI shareholders because they were antidilutive;
however, certain of these performance share and RSU awards could be dilutive in the future. Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests is deducted from (loss) income from continuing operations to arrive at (loss) income from continuing
operations attributable to SSI shareholders for the purpose of calculating (loss) income per share from continuing operations
attributable to SSI shareholders. See Note 16 - Net (Loss) Income Per Share for further detail.
73 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Use of Estimates
The preparation of the Company’s Consolidated Financial Statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in
the United States of America (“U.S. GAAP”) requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported
amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the Consolidated Financial
Statements and reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting period. Examples include revenue recognition; the
allowance for doubtful accounts; estimates of contingencies, including environmental liabilities and other legal liabilities; goodwill,
long-lived asset and indefinite-lived intangible asset valuation; valuation of equity investments; valuation of certain share-based
awards; other asset valuation; inventory measurement and valuation; pension plan assumptions; and the assessment of the valuation
of deferred income taxes and income tax contingencies. Actual results may differ from estimated amounts.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Financial instruments that potentially subject the Company to significant concentration of credit risk consist primarily of cash and
cash equivalents, accounts receivable, and notes and other contractual receivables. The majority of cash and cash equivalents is
maintained with major financial institutions. Balances with these and certain other institutions exceeded the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation insured amount of $250 thousand as of August 31, 2020. Concentration of credit risk with respect to accounts
receivable is limited because a large number of geographically diverse customers make up the Company’s customer base. The
Company controls credit risk through credit approvals, credit limits, credit insurance, letters of credit or other collateral, cash
deposits and monitoring procedures. The Company is exposed to a residual credit risk with respect to open letters of credit by virtue
of the possibility of the failure of a bank providing a letter of credit. The Company had $58 million and $49 million of open letters of
credit as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Note 3 - Recent Accounting Pronouncements
The Company does not expect its adoption in the future of any recently issued accounting pronouncements will have a material
impact on its consolidated financial statements.
Note 4 - Inventories
Inventories consisted of the following as of August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2020    2019  
Processed and unprocessed scrap metal  $ 63,058  $ 81,313 
Semi-finished goods   6,909   8,712 
Finished goods   44,476   53,796 
Supplies   42,826   43,499 
Inventories  $ 157,269  $ 187,320
 
 
74 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 5 - Leases
The Company’s operating leases for real property underlying its auto parts stores, metals recycling facilities, and administrative
offices generally have non-cancellable lease terms of 5 to 10 years, and the significant majority, but not all, contain multiple renewal
options for a further 5 to 20 years. Renewal options which the Company is reasonably certain to exercise are included in the
measurement of lease term. The Company’s finance leases and other operating leases involve primarily transportation equipment
assets, have non-cancellable lease terms of less than 10 years and usually do not include renewal options.
The Company’s fiscal 2020 total lease cost was $28 million, consisting primarily of operating lease expense of $23 million and
short-term lease expense of $4 million. The other components of the Company’s total lease cost for fiscal 2020, including finance
lease amortization and interest expense, variable lease expense and sublease income, were not material both individually and in
aggregate. The substantial majority of the Company’s total lease cost for fiscal 2020 is presented within cost of goods sold in the
Consolidated Statements of Operations. Rent expense was $27 million for each of fiscal 2019 and 2018.
 
Finance lease-related assets and liabilities consisted of the following (in thousands):
 
  Balance Sheet Classification  August 31, 2020 
Assets:       
Finance lease right-of-use assets(1)  Property, plant and equipment, net  $ 6,274 
Liabilities:       
Finance lease liabilities - current  Short-term borrowings  $ 1,341 
Finance lease liabilities - non-current  Long-term debt, net of current maturities   6,167 
Total finance lease liabilities    $ 7,508
 
 
(1)Presented net of accumulated amortization of $1 million as of August 31, 2020.
 
The weighted average remaining lease terms and weighted average discount rates for the Company’s leases were as follows:
 
  August 31, 2020  
  Weighted Average
Remaining Lease
Term (Years)  Weighted Average
Discount Rate 
Operating leases   10.2   3.37%
Finance leases   6.0   8.22%
 
Maturities of lease liabilities by fiscal year as of August 31, 2020 were as follows (in thousands):
 
Year Ending August 31,  Finance Leases  Operating
Leases  
2021  $ 1,837  $ 24,223 
2022   1,768   23,292 
2023   1,694   22,810 
2024   1,410   18,619 
2025   656   13,212 
Thereafter   1,778   72,064 
Total lease payments   9,143   174,220 
Less amounts representing interest   (1,635)  (29,459)
Total lease liabilities   7,508   144,761 
Less current maturities   (1,341)  (19,760)
Lease liabilities, net of current maturities  $ 6,167  $ 125,001
 
 
Supplemental cash flow information and non-cash activity related to leases are as follows (in thousands):
 
75 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
  Fiscal 2020  
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities:     
Operating cash flows for operating leases  $ 22,225 
Operating cash flows for finance leases  $ 628 
Financing cash flows for finance leases  $ 1,336 
Lease liabilities arising from obtaining right-of-use assets(1):     
Operating leases  $ 34,586 
Finance leases  $ 1,230
 
 
(1)Amounts include new leases and adjustments to lease balances as a result of remeasurement.
 
As a result of adopting the new lease accounting guidance on September 1, 2019 using the modified retrospective transition method,
the Company is required to present future minimum lease commitments for capital leases and operating leases that were previously
disclosed in the Company’s 2019 Annual Report on Form 10-K and accounted for under previous lease guidance.
 
Principal payments on capital lease obligations during the next five fiscal years and thereafter as of August 31, 2019 are as follows
(in thousands):
 
Year Ending August 31,  Capital Lease
Obligations  
2020  $ 1,917 
2021   1,799 
2022   1,751 
2023   1,622 
2024   1,346 
Thereafter   1,694 
Total   10,129 
Amounts representing interest   (2,355)
Total less interest  $ 7,774
 
 
The table below sets forth the Company’s future minimum obligations under non-cancellable operating leases as of August 31, 2019
(in thousands):
 
Year Ending August 31,  Operating
Leases  
2020  $ 21,286 
2021   15,301 
2022   12,488 
2023   10,419 
2024   5,035 
Thereafter   16,095 
Total  $ 80,624
 
 
76 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 6 - Property, Plant and Equipment, net
Property, plant and equipment, net consisted of the following as of August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2020    2019  
Machinery and equipment  $ 746,845  $ 697,746 
Land and improvements   295,575   283,348 
Buildings and leasehold improvements   138,380   112,244 
Office equipment and other software licenses   44,103   43,960 
ERP systems   17,760   17,760 
Construction in progress   55,964   67,375 
Property, plant and equipment, gross   1,298,627   1,222,433 
Less accumulated depreciation   (811,623)  (766,033)
Property, plant and equipment, net  $ 487,004  $ 456,400
 
 
Depreciation expense for property, plant and equipment, which includes amortization expense for finance lease right-of-use assets,
was $57 million, $53 million and $49 million for the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively. See Note 5 –
Leases for additional disclosures of finance leases.
 
Note 7 - Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets, net
Acquisition of Goodwill
In the second quarter of fiscal 2019, the Company acquired certain assets of an auto recycling business in northern California for $2
million. The acquisition qualified as a business combination under the accounting guidance and resulted in the recognition of $2
million of goodwill during the second quarter of fiscal 2019. The Company allocated the acquired goodwill to the reporting unit
within the AMR operating segment which carries nearly all of the Company’s goodwill.
Goodwill Impairment Test
The Company evaluates goodwill for impairment annually on July 1 and upon the occurrence of certain triggering events or
substantive changes in circumstances that indicate that the fair value of goodwill may be impaired.
In the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020, the Company performed the annual goodwill impairment test as of July 1, 2020. As of the testing
date, the balance of the Company’s goodwill was $169 million, and all but $1 million of such balance was carried by a single
reporting unit within AMR. The Company had last performed the quantitative impairment test of goodwill carried by this reporting
unit in the second quarter of fiscal 2016 using a measurement date of February 1, 2016. Based on the changes in market conditions
related to the general economy and the metals recycling industry and the increase in the carrying amount of the reporting unit since
the last quantitative impairment test, the Company elected not to perform the qualitative assessment for the reporting unit and,
instead, proceeded directly to the quantitative impairment test. The quantitative impairment test entails estimating the fair value of
the reporting unit and comparing it to the reporting unit’s carrying amount. The Company records the amount of goodwill
impairment as the excess of the reporting unit’s carrying amount over its fair value, if any, not to exceed the total amount of goodwill
allocated to that reporting unit.
The Company estimated the fair value of the reporting unit within AMR carrying $168 million of goodwill as of July 1, 2020, using
an income approach based on the present value of expected future cash flows, including terminal value, utilizing a market-based
WACC assessed specifically for the reporting unit. The determination of fair value involves the use of estimates and assumptions,
including revenue growth rates driven by future ferrous and nonferrous commodity price and sales volume expectations, gross
margins, selling, general and administrative expense relative to total revenues, capital expenditures, working capital requirements,
discount rate (WACC), tax rate, terminal growth rate, benefits associated with a taxable transaction and synergistic benefits available
to market participants. In addition, to corroborate the reporting unit’s valuation, the Company used a market approach based on
earnings multiple data and a reconciliation of the Company’s estimate of the aggregate fair value of all reporting units to the
Company’s market capitalization, including consideration of a control premium.
For the reporting unit within AMR subject to the quantitative impairment test, the estimated fair value of the reporting unit exceeded
its carrying amount by approximately 29% as of July 1, 2020. The projections used in the income approach for the reporting unit
took into consideration the impact of current market conditions for ferrous and nonferrous recycled metals, the cost of obtaining
adequate supply flows of scrap metal including end-of-life vehicles, and recent trends in retail auto parts sales. The projections
assumed a limited
77 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
recovery of operating margins from current levels over a multi-year period. The WACC used in the income approach valuation for
the reporting unit was 11.1%, and the terminal growth rate used was 2.0%. Assuming all other components of the fair value estimate
were held constant, an increase in the WACC of 228 basis points or more or weaker than anticipated improvements in operating
margins could have resulted in a failure of the quantitative impairment test for the reporting unit.
The Company reconciled its market capitalization to the aggregated estimated fair value of all reporting units, including
consideration of a control premium representing the estimated amount a market participant would pay to obtain a controlling interest
in the Company. The implied control premium resulting from the difference between (i) the Company's market capitalization (based
on the average trading price of the Company's Class A common stock for the two-week period ended July 1, 2020) increased by the
estimated fair value of noncontrolling interests and (ii) the higher aggregated estimated fair value of all reporting units was within
the historical range of average and mean premiums observed for historical transactions within the steel-making, scrap processing and
metals industries. The Company identified specific reconciling items, including market participant synergies, tax amortization
benefits and benefits from in-process technology investments, which supported the implied control premium as of July 1, 2020.
The gross change in the carrying amount of goodwill for the years ended August 31, 2020 and 2019 was as follows (in thousands):
 
  Goodwill  
Balance as of September 1, 2018  $ 168,065 
Acquisition   1,575 
Foreign currency translation adjustment   (403)
Balance as of August 31, 2019   169,237 
Foreign currency translation adjustment   390 
Balance as of August 31, 2020  $ 169,627
 
 
Accumulated goodwill impairment charges were $471 million as of August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Other Intangible Assets, net
The following table presents the Company’s other intangible assets as of August 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019  
  Gross
Carrying
Amount  Accumulated
Amortization  Net  Gross
Carrying
Amount  Accumulated
Amortization  Net 
Covenants not to compete  $ 7,032  $ (3,528) $3,504  $ 5,746  $ (2,862) $2,884 
Other intangible assets subject to amortization(1)  —   —   —   771   (254)  517 
Indefinite-lived intangibles(2)   1,081   —   1,081   1,081   —   1,081 
Total  $ 8,113  $ (3,528) $4,585  $ 7,598  $ (3,116) $4,482
 
 
(1)Other intangible assets subject to amortization as of August 31, 2019 related to leasehold interests and were reclassified to operating lease right-of-use assets on
adoption of the new lease accounting guidance as of September 1, 2019.
(2)Indefinite-lived intangibles include trade names, permits and licenses.
78 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Total intangible asset amortization expense was $1 million in each of the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. There were
no impairments of intangible assets recognized for the periods presented.
The estimated amortization expense, based on current intangible asset balances, during the next five fiscal years and thereafter is as
follows (in thousands):
 
Years Ending August 31,  Estimated
Amortization
Expense  
2021  $ 763 
2022   763 
2023   458 
2024   409 
2025   249 
Thereafter   862 
Total  $ 3,504
 
 
Note 8 - Debt
Debt consisted of the following as of August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2020    2019  
Bank revolving credit facilities, interest primarily at LIBOR plus a spread  $ 90,000  $ 96,835 
Finance lease liabilities(1)   7,508   7,774 
Other debt obligations   6,911   487 
Total debt   104,419   105,096 
Less current maturities   (2,184)  (1,321)
Debt, net of current maturities  $ 102,235  $ 103,775
 
 
(1)Prior to adoption of the new lease accounting guidance as of September 1, 2019, the Company’s finance lease liabilities were classified as capital lease
obligations. The Company’s capital lease obligations as of August 31, 2019 are presented in this line item.
The Company’s senior secured revolving credit facilities, which provide for revolving loans of $700 million and C$15 million,
mature in August 2023 pursuant to a credit agreement with Bank of America, N.A., as administrative agent, and other lenders party
thereto. The $700 million credit facility includes a $50 million sublimit for letters of credit, a $25 million sublimit for swingline
loans and a $50 million sublimit for multicurrency borrowings. As of August 31, 2020, interest rates on outstanding indebtedness
under the credit agreement were based, at the Company’s option, on either the London Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”) (or the
Canadian equivalent for C$ loans), plus a spread of between 1.25% and 3.50%, with the amount of the spread based on a pricing grid
tied to the Company’s ratio of consolidated funded debt to EBITDA (as defined by the credit agreement), or the greater of (a) the
prime rate, (b) the federal funds rate plus 0.50% or (c) the daily rate equal to one-month LIBOR plus 1.75%, in each case, plus a
spread of between 0.00% and 2.50% based on a pricing grid tied to the Company’s consolidated funded debt to EBITDA ratio. In
addition, commitment fees are payable on the unused portion of the credit facilities at rates between 0.20% and 0.50% based on a
pricing grid tied to the Company’s ratio of consolidated funded debt to EBITDA.
 
On June 30, 2020, in large part due to the uncertainties resulting from the effects of Coronavirus Disease (“COVID-19”), the
Company entered into an amendment to the existing credit agreement with Bank of America, N.A., as administrative agent, and
other lenders party thereto. The principal changes to the existing credit agreement effected by the amendment are (i) the reduction of
the consolidated fixed charge coverage from a minimum ratio of 1.50 to 1.00 to a minimum ratio of 1.20 to 1.00 for the fiscal quarter
ending August 31, 2020, and to a minimum ratio of 1.10 to 1.00 for the fiscal quarters ending November 30, 2020, February 28,
2021 and May 31, 2021, and (ii) the introduction of a minimum consolidated asset coverage ratio of 1.00 to 1.00 for each of the
fiscal quarters ending August 31, 2020 through May 31, 2021. The amendment further provides for revisions to the definition of
LIBOR to include a 0.50% floor and mechanics by which the parties may replace the benchmark interest rate used in the agreement
from LIBOR to one or more rates based on the secured overnight financing rate administered by the Federal Reserve Bank of New
York.
 
79 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
As of August 31, 2020 and 2019, borrowings outstanding under the credit facilities were $90 million and $97 million, respectively.
The weighted average interest rate on amounts outstanding under the credit facilities was 4.59% and 3.78% as of August 31, 2020
and 2019, respectively.
The Company’s credit agreement contains certain customary covenants, including covenants that limit the ability of the Company
and its subsidiaries to enter into certain types of transactions. The financial covenants under the credit agreement include (a) a
consolidated fixed charge coverage ratio, defined as the four-quarter rolling sum of consolidated EBITDA less defined maintenance
capital expenditures and certain environmental expenditures divided by consolidated fixed charges, (b) a consolidated leverage ratio,
defined as consolidated funded indebtedness divided by the sum of consolidated net worth and consolidated funded indebtedness,
and (c) a consolidated asset coverage ratio, defined as consolidated asset values divided by consolidated funded indebtedness. The
Company’s obligations under the credit agreement are guaranteed by substantially all of its subsidiaries. The credit facilities and the
related guarantees are secured by senior first priority liens on certain of the Company’s and its subsidiaries’ assets, including
equipment, inventory and accounts receivable.
Other debt obligations primarily relate to an equipment purchase, the contract consideration for which includes an obligation to make
future monthly payments to the vendor in the form of licensing fees. For accounting purposes, such obligation is treated as a partial
financing of the purchase price by the equipment vendor. Monthly payments commence when the equipment is placed in service and
continue for a period of four years thereafter. The Company imputes interest on this obligation at a rate of 4.25% reflecting the
estimated rate that would be recorded in a market transaction with similar terms.
 
Principal payments on the Company’s bank revolving credit facilities and other debt obligations during the next five fiscal years and
thereafter are as follows (in thousands):
 
Year Ending August 31,  Credit Facilities  Other Debt
Obligations 
2021  $ —  $ 843 
2022   —   1,639 
2023   90,000   1,710 
2024   —   1,785 
2025   —   802 
Thereafter   —   132 
Total  $ 90,000  $ 6,911
 
 
See Note 5 - Leases for additional disclosures of finance lease obligations, including payments during the next five fiscal years and
thereafter. The Company maintains stand-by letters of credit to provide for certain obligations including workers’ compensation and
performance bonds. The Company had $10 million outstanding under these arrangements as of August 31, 2020 and 2019.
Note 9 - Commitments and Contingencies
 
Contingencies – Environmental
Changes in the Company’s environmental liabilities for the years ended August 31, 2020 and 2019 were as follows (in thousands):
 
Balance as of
September 1,
2018   Liabilities
Established
(Released),
Net   Payments and
Other   Ending
Balance
August 31,
2019   Liabilities
Established
(Released),
Net   Payments and
Other   Ending
Balance
August 31,
2020   Short-Term  Long-Term 
$ 53,832  $ 1,302  $ (3,335) $ 51,799  $ 5,713  $ (4,048) $ 53,464  $ 6,302  $ 47,162 
 
80 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Recycling Operations
As of August 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company’s recycling operations had environmental liabilities of $53 million and $52 million,
respectively, for the potential remediation of locations where it has conducted business or has environmental liabilities from
historical or recent activities. The liabilities relate to the investigation and potential future remediation of contaminated sediments
and riverbanks, soil contamination, groundwater contamination, storm water runoff issues and other natural resource damages.
Except for Portland Harbor and certain liabilities discussed under Other Legacy Environmental Loss Contingencies immediately
below, such liabilities were not individually material at any site.
Portland Harbor
In December 2000, the Company was notified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (“EPA”) under the
Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act (“CERCLA”) that it is one of the potentially responsible
parties (“PRPs”) that own or operate or formerly owned or operated sites which are part of or adjacent to the Portland Harbor
Superfund site (the “Site”). The precise nature and extent of cleanup of any specific areas within the Site, the parties to be involved,
the timing of any specific remedial action and the allocation of the costs for any cleanup among responsible parties have not yet been
determined. The process of site investigation, remedy selection, identification of additional PRPs and allocation of costs has been
underway for a number of years, but significant uncertainties remain. It is unclear to what extent the Company will be liable for
environmental costs or natural resource damage claims or third party contribution or damage claims with respect to the Site.
While the Company participated in certain preliminary Site study efforts, it was not party to the consent order entered into by the
EPA with certain other PRPs, referred to as the “Lower Willamette Group” (“LWG”), for a remedial investigation/feasibility study
(“RI/FS”). During fiscal 2007, the Company and certain other parties agreed to an interim settlement with the LWG under which the
Company made a cash contribution to the LWG RI/FS. The LWG has indicated that it had incurred over $155 million in
investigation-related costs over an approximately 18 year period working on the RI/FS. Following submittal of draft RI and FS
documents which the EPA largely rejected, the EPA took over the RI/FS process.
The Company has joined with approximately 100 other PRPs, including the LWG members, in a voluntary process to establish an
allocation of costs at the Site, including the costs incurred by the LWG in the RI/FS process. The LWG members have also
commenced federal court litigation, which has been stayed, seeking to bring additional parties into the allocation process.
In January 2008, the Portland Harbor Natural Resource Trustee Council (“Trustee Council”) invited the Company and other PRPs to
participate in funding and implementing the Natural Resource Injury Assessment for the Site. Following meetings among the Trustee
Council and the PRPs, funding and participation agreements were negotiated under which the participating PRPs, including the
Company, agreed to fund the first phase of the three-phase natural resource damage assessment. Phase 1, which included the
development of the Natural Resource Damage Assessment Plan (“AP”) and implementation of several early studies, was
substantially completed in 2010. In December 2017, the Company joined with other participating PRPs in agreeing to fund Phase 2
of the natural resource damage assessment, which includes the implementation of the AP to develop information sufficient to
facilitate early settlements between the Trustee Council and Phase 2 participants and the identification of restoration projects to be
funded by the settlements. In late May 2018, the Trustee Council published notice of its intent to proceed with Phase 3, which will
involve the full implementation of the AP and the final injury and damage determination. The Company is proceeding with the
process established by the Trustee Council regarding early settlements under Phase 2. It is uncertain whether the Company will enter
into an early settlement for natural resource damages or what costs it may incur in any such early settlement.
On January 30, 2017, one of the Trustees, the Confederated Tribes and Bands of the Yakama Nation, which withdrew from the
council in 2009, filed a suit against approximately 30 parties, including the Company, seeking reimbursement of certain past and
future response costs in connection with remedial action at the Site and recovery of assessment costs related to natural resources
damages from releases at and from the Site to the Multnomah Channel and the Lower Columbia River. The parties filed various
motions to dismiss or stay this suit, and in August 2019, the court issued an order denying the motions to dismiss and staying the
action. The Company intends to defend against the claims in this suit and does not have sufficient information to determine the
likelihood of a loss in this matter or to estimate the amount of damages being sought or the amount of such damages that could be
allocated to the Company.
Estimates of the cost of remedial action for the cleanup of the in-river portion of the Site have varied widely in various drafts of the
FS and in the EPA’s final FS issued in June 2016 ranging from approximately $170 million to over $2.5 billion (net present value),
depending on the remedial alternative and a number of other factors. In comments submitted to the EPA, the Company and certain
other stakeholders identified a number of serious concerns regarding the EPA’s risk and remedial alternatives assessments, cost
estimates, scheduling assumptions and conclusions regarding the feasibility and effectiveness of remediation technologies.
81 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
In January 2017, the EPA issued a Record of Decision (“ROD”) that identified the selected remedy for the Site. The selected remedy
is a modified version of one of the alternative remedies evaluated in the EPA’s FS that was expanded to include additional work at a
greater cost. The EPA has estimated the total cost of the selected remedy at $1.7 billion with a net present value cost of $1.05 billion
(at a 7% discount rate) and an estimated construction period of 13 years following completion of the remedial designs. In the ROD,
the EPA stated that the cost estimate is an order-of-magnitude engineering estimate that is expected to be within +50% to -30% of the
actual project cost and that changes in the cost elements are likely to occur as a result of new information and data collected during
the engineering design. The Company has identified a number of concerns regarding the remedy described in the ROD, which is
based on data that is more than a decade old, and the EPA’s estimates for the costs and time required to implement the selected
remedy. Because of ongoing questions regarding cost effectiveness, technical feasibility, and the use of stale data, it is uncertain
whether the ROD will be implemented as issued. In addition, the ROD did not determine or allocate the responsibility for
remediation costs among the PRPs.
In the ROD, the EPA acknowledged that much of the data used in preparing the ROD was more than a decade old and would need to
be updated with a new round of “baseline” sampling to be conducted prior to the remedial design phase. Accordingly, the ROD
provided for additional pre-remedial design investigative work and baseline sampling to be conducted in order to provide a baseline
of current conditions and delineate particular remedial actions for specific areas within the Site. This additional sampling was
required prior to proceeding with the next phase in the process which is the remedial design. The remedial design phase is an
engineering phase during which additional technical information and data are collected, identified and incorporated into technical
drawings and specifications developed for the subsequent remedial action. Moreover, the ROD provided only Site-wide cost
estimates and did not provide sufficient detail to estimate costs for specific sediment management areas within the Site. Following
issuance of the ROD, EPA proposed that the PRPs, or a subgroup of PRPs, perform the additional investigative work identified in the
ROD under a new consent order.
In December 2017, the Company and three other PRPs entered into a new Administrative Settlement Agreement and Order on
Consent with EPA to perform such pre-remedial design investigation and baseline sampling over a two-year period. The Company
estimated that its share of the costs of performing such work would be approximately $2 million, which it accrued in fiscal 2018.
Such costs were fully covered by existing insurance coverage and, thus, the Company also recorded an insurance receivable for $2
million in fiscal 2018, resulting in no net impact to the Company’s consolidated results of operations.
The pre-remedial design investigation and baseline sampling work has been completed, and the report evaluating the data was
submitted to EPA on June 17, 2019. The evaluation report concludes that Site conditions have improved substantially since the data
forming the basis of the ROD was collected over a decade ago. The analysis contained in the report has significant implications for
remedial design and remedial action at the Site. EPA has reviewed the report, finding with a few limited corrections that the data is
of suitable quality and generally acceptable and stating that such data will be used, in addition to existing and forthcoming design-
level data, to inform implementation of the ROD. However, EPA did not agree that the data or the analysis warrants a change to the
remedy at this time and reaffirmed its commitment to proceed with remedial design. The Company and other PRPs disagree with
EPA’s position on use of the more recent data and will continue to pursue limited, but critical, changes to the selected remedy for the
Site during the remedial design phase.
EPA encouraged PRPs to step forward (individually or in groups) to enter into consent agreements to perform remedial design
covering the entire Site and proposed dividing the Site into eight to ten subareas for remedial design. Certain PRPs have since
executed consent agreements for remedial design work covering a little more than half of the remedial action areas at the Site.
Because of EPA’s refusal to date to modify the remedy to reflect the most current data on Site conditions and because of concerns
with the terms of the consent agreement, the Company elected not to enter into a consent agreement for remedial design with respect
to any of the subareas at the Site. On March 26, 2020, EPA issued a unilateral administrative order (UAO) to the Company and
MMGL, LLC (“MMGL”), an unaffiliated company, for the remedial design work in the portion of one of the EPA identified subareas
within the Site designated as the River Mile 3.5 East Project Area. Following a conference with the Company to discuss the UAO
and written comments submitted by the Company, EPA made limited modifications to the UAO and issued an amendment to the
UAO on April 27, 2020 with an effective date of May 4, 2020. As required by the UAO, the Company notified EPA of its intent to
comply with the UAO on the effective date while reserving all of its sufficient cause defenses. Failure to comply with a UAO,
without sufficient cause, could subject the Company to significant penalties or treble damages. Pursuant to the optimized remedial
design timeline set forth in the UAO, EPA’s expected schedule for completion of the remedial design work is four years. EPA has
estimated the cost of the work at approximately $4 million. The Company has agreed with the other respondent to the UAO, MMGL,
that the Company will lead the performance and be responsible for a portion of the costs of the work for remedial design under the
UAO and also entered into an agreement with another PRP pursuant to which such other PRP has agreed to fund a portion of the
costs of such work. These agreements are not an allocation of liability or claims associated with the Site as between the respondents
or with respect to any third party. The Company estimated that its share of the costs of performing such work under the UAO would
be approximately $3 million, which it recorded to environmental liabilities and selling, general and administrative expense in the
consolidated financial statements in the third quarter of fiscal 2020. The Company has insurance policies that it believes will provide
reimbursement for costs it incurs for remedial design, but not for any penalties. The
82 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Company also expects to pursue in the future allocation or contribution from other PRPs for a portion of such remedial design costs.
An asset relating to recovery of such costs is recognized upon meeting certain accounting requirements, which had not yet been met
as of the end of fiscal 2020.
The Company’s environmental liabilities as of August 31, 2020 and 2019 include $4 million and $1 million, respectively, relating to
Portland Harbor.
Except for certain early action projects in which the Company is not involved, remediation activities are not expected to commence
for a number of years. Moreover, remediation activities at the Site are expected to be sequenced, and the order and timing of such
sequencing has not been determined. In addition, as discussed above, responsibility for implementing and funding the remedy will
be determined in a separate allocation process, which is on-going. The Company expects the next major stage of the allocation
process to proceed in parallel with the remedial design process.
Because the final remedial actions have not yet been designed and there has not been a determination of the amount of natural
resource damages or of the allocation among the PRPs of costs of the investigations, remedial action costs or natural resource
damages, the Company believes it is not possible to reasonably estimate the amount or range of costs which it is likely to or which it
is reasonably possible that it will incur in connection with the Site, although such costs could be material to the Company’s financial
position, results of operations, cash flows and liquidity. Among the facts currently being developed are detailed information on the
history of ownership of and the nature of the uses of and activities and operations performed on each property within the Site, which
are factors that will play a substantial role in determining the allocation of investigation and remedy costs among the PRPs.
The Company has insurance policies that it believes will provide reimbursement for costs it incurs for defense, remedial design,
remedial action and mitigation for natural resource damages claims in connection with the Site. Most of these policies jointly insure
the Company and MMGL, as the successor to a former subsidiary of the Company. The Company and MMGL have negotiated the
settlement with certain insurers of claims against them related to the Site, continue to seek settlements with other insurers and
formed a Qualified Settlement Fund (“QSF”) which became operative in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020 to hold such settlement
amounts until funds are needed to pay or reimburse costs incurred by the Company and MMGL in connection with the Site. These
insurance policies and the funds in the QSF may not cover all of the costs which the Company may incur. The QSF is an
unconsolidated variable interest entity (“VIE”) with no primary beneficiary. Two parties unrelated to each other, one appointed by
the Company and one appointed by MMGL, share equally the power to direct the activities of the VIE that most significantly impact
its economic performance. The Company’s appointee to co-manage the VIE is an executive officer of the Company. Neither MMGL
nor its appointee to co-manage the VIE is a related party of the Company for the purpose of the primary beneficiary assessment or
otherwise.
The Oregon Department of Environmental Quality is separately providing oversight of voluntary investigations and source control
activities by the Company involving the Company’s sites adjacent to the Portland Harbor which are focused on controlling any
current “uplands” releases of contaminants into the Willamette River. No liabilities have been established in connection with these
investigations because the extent of contamination (if any) and the Company’s responsibility for the contamination (if any) have not
yet been determined.
Other Legacy Environmental Loss Contingencies
The Company’s environmental loss contingencies as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, other than Portland Harbor, include actual or
possible investigation and cleanup costs from historical contamination at sites currently or formerly owned or formerly operated by
the Company or at other sites where the Company may have responsibility for such costs due to past disposal or other activities
(“legacy environmental loss contingencies”). These legacy environmental loss contingencies relate to the potential remediation of
waterways and soil and groundwater contamination and may also involve natural resource damages, governmental fines and
penalties and claims by third parties for personal injury and property damage. The Company has been notified that it is or may be a
potentially responsible party at certain of these sites, and investigation and cleanup activities are ongoing or may be required in the
future. The Company recognizes a liability for such matters when the loss is probable and can be reasonably estimated. When
investigation and cleanup activities are ongoing or where the Company has not yet been identified as having responsibility or the
contamination has not yet been identified, it is reasonably possible that the Company may need to recognize additional liabilities in
connection with such sites but the Company cannot currently reasonably estimate the possible loss or range of loss absent additional
information or developments. Such additional liabilities, individually or in the aggregate, may have a material adverse effect on the
Company’s results of operations, financial condition or cash flows.
During fiscal 2018, the Company accrued $4 million in expense at its Corporate division for the estimated costs related to
remediation of shredder residue disposed of in or around the 1970s at third party sites located near each other. Investigation activities
have been conducted under oversight of the applicable state regulatory agency. As of August 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company had
$4 million
83 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
accrued for this matter. It is reasonably possible that the Company may recognize additional liabilities in connection with this matter
at the time such losses are probable and can be reasonably estimated. The Company currently estimates a range of reasonably
possible losses related to this matter in excess of current accruals at between zero and $28 million based on a range of remedial
alternatives and subject to development and approval by regulators of a specific remedy implementation plan. However, subsequent
to the development of those remedial alternatives, the Company performed additional investigative activities under new state
requirements that has the potential to impact the required remedial actions and associated cost estimates pending further analysis and
discussion by the Company and regulators. The Company is investigating whether a portion or all of the current and future losses
related to this matter, if incurred, are covered by existing insurance coverage or may be offset by contributions from other
responsible parties.
In addition, the Company’s loss contingencies as of August 31, 2020 and 2019 include $8 million for the estimated costs related to
remediation of soil and groundwater conditions, including penalties in the amount of $2.7 million, in connection with a closed
facility owned and previously operated by an indirect, wholly-owned subsidiary. Investigation activities have been conducted under
the oversight of the applicable state regulatory agency, and the Company has also been working with local officials with respect to
the protection of public water supplies. It is reasonably possible that the Company may recognize additional liabilities in connection
with this matter at the time such additional losses are probable and can be reasonably estimated. However, the Company cannot
reasonably estimate at this time the possible additional loss or range of possible additional losses associated with this matter pending
completion of on-going studies and determination of remediation plans. As part of its activities relating to the protection of public
water supplies, the Company has agreed to reimburse the municipality for certain studies and plans, and it is reasonably possible that
it may incur additional liabilities and costs in the future, including for wellhead treatment, which in the case of costs for installation
of wellhead treatment, if incurred, could be in the range of $10 million to $13 million.
Steel Manufacturing Operations
The Company’s steel manufacturing operations had no known environmental liabilities as of August 31, 2020 and 2019.
The steel mill’s electric arc furnace generates dust (“EAF dust”) that is classified as hazardous waste by the EPA because of its zinc
and lead content. As a result, the Company captures the EAF dust and ships it in specialized rail cars to firms that apply treatments
that allow for the ultimate disposal of the EAF dust.
The Company’s steel mill has an operating permit issued under Title V of the Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990, which governs
certain air quality standards. The permit is based on an annual production capacity of approximately 950 thousand tons. The
Company’s permit was first issued in 1998 and has since been renewed multiple times, most recently in April 2020 extending the
permit through April 1, 2025.
Summary - Environmental Contingencies
With respect to environmental contingencies other than the Portland Harbor Superfund site and the Other Legacy Environmental
Loss Contingencies, which are discussed separately above, management currently believes that adequate provision has been made
for the potential impact of its environmental contingencies. Historically, the amounts the Company has ultimately paid for such
remediation activities have not been material in any given period, but there can be no assurance that such amounts paid will not be
material in the future.
Contingencies - Other
Schnitzer Southeast, LLC (a wholly-owned subsidiary of the Company, “SSE”), an SSE employee, the Company and one of the
Company’s insurance carriers had been named as defendants in five separate wrongful death lawsuits filed in the State of Georgia
arising from an accident in 2016 in Alabama involving a tractor trailer driven by the SSE employee and owned by SSE. In fiscal
2019, the Company settled three of the five lawsuits for a total of $35 million. In the first quarter of fiscal 2020, the Company settled
the two remaining lawsuits for a total of $68 million. The aggregate settlement amount of $103 million was substantially covered by
insurance, resulting in no net impact to the Company’s consolidated results of operations. As of August 31, 2019, the Company had
accrued loss contingencies and offsetting insurance receivables related to the lawsuits totaling $83 million. The full amount accrued
as of August 31, 2019 was paid by the Company’s insurers in the first quarter of fiscal 2020. There are no further contingencies in
relation to this matter.
In addition to legal proceedings relating to the contingencies described above, the Company is a party to various legal proceedings
arising in the normal course of business. The Company recognizes a liability for such matters when the loss is probable and can be
reasonably estimated. The Company does not anticipate that the resolution of such legal proceedings arising in the normal course of
business, after taking into consideration expected insurance recoveries, will have a material adverse effect on its results of
operations, financial condition, or cash flows.
 
84 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 10 - Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss
The components of accumulated other comprehensive loss, net of tax, are as follows as of August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 (in
thousands):
 
  Foreign Currency
Translation
Adjustments   Pension Obligations,
net   Total  
Balance as of September 1, 2017  $ (31,828) $ (3,465) $ (35,293)
Other comprehensive (loss) income before reclassifications   (2,301)  64   (2,237)
Income tax benefit   —   172   172 
Other comprehensive (loss) income before reclassifications,
   net of tax   (2,301)  236   (2,065)
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss  —   536   536 
Income tax benefit   —   (415)  (415)
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss,
   net of tax   —   121   121 
Net periodic other comprehensive (loss) income   (2,301)  357   (1,944)
Balance as of August 31, 2018   (34,129)  (3,108)  (37,237)
Other comprehensive loss before reclassifications   (1,560)  (326)  (1,886)
Income tax benefit   —   65   65 
Other comprehensive loss before reclassifications, net
   of tax   (1,560)  (261)  (1,821)
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss  —   369   369 
Income tax benefit   —   (74)  (74)
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss,
   net of tax   —   295   295 
Net periodic other comprehensive (loss) income   (1,560)  34   (1,526)
Balance as of August 31, 2019   (35,689)  (3,074)  (38,763)
Other comprehensive income before reclassifications   1,505   190   1,695 
Income tax expense   —   (42)  (42)
Other comprehensive income before reclassifications, net
   of tax   1,505   148   1,653 
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss  —   309   309 
Income tax benefit   —   (70)  (70)
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss,
   net of tax   —   239   239 
Net periodic other comprehensive income   1,505   387   1,892 
Balance as of August 31, 2020  $ (34,184) $ (2,687) $ (36,871)
In the second quarter of fiscal 2018, the Company adopted an accounting standard update that allowed for a reclassification from
accumulated other comprehensive income (AOCI) to retained earnings for stranded tax effects resulting from the Tax Cuts and Jobs
Act (“Tax Act”) enacted on December 22, 2017. Reclassifications from AOCI to retained earnings for stranded tax effects during the
year ended August 31, 2018, both individually and in the aggregate, were not material.
Reclassifications from accumulated other comprehensive loss to earnings, both individually and in the aggregate, were not material
to the impacted captions in the Consolidated Statements of Operations in all periods presented.
 
85 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 11 - Revenue
Disaggregation of Revenues
The table below illustrates the Company’s revenues disaggregated by major product and sales destination for each reportable
segment (in thousands):
 
  Year Ended August 31, 2020  
  AMR   CSS   Intercompany
Revenue
Eliminations  Total  
Major product information:                 
Ferrous revenues  $ 825,316  $ 44,041  $ (6,867) $ 862,490 
Nonferrous revenues   360,308   31,849   (1,859)  390,298 
Steel revenues(1)   —   336,980   —   336,980 
Retail and other revenues   122,188   387   —   122,575 
Total revenues  $ 1,307,812  $ 413,257  $ (8,726) $ 1,712,343 
Revenues based on sales destination:                 
Foreign  $ 820,379  $ 90,406  $ —  $ 910,785 
Domestic   487,433   322,851   (8,726)  801,558 
Total revenues  $ 1,307,812  $ 413,257  $ (8,726) $ 1,712,343
 
 
  Year Ended August 31, 2019  
  AMR   CSS   Intercompany
Revenue
Eliminations  Total  
Major product information:                 
Ferrous revenues  $ 1,123,180  $ 51,963  $ (10,424) $ 1,164,719 
Nonferrous revenues   430,361   38,809   (1,147)  468,023 
Steel revenues(1)   —   367,956   —   367,956 
Retail and other revenues   131,436   688   (41)  132,083 
Total revenues  $ 1,684,977  $ 459,416  $ (11,612) $ 2,132,781 
Revenues based on sales destination:                 
Foreign  $ 1,047,546  $ 93,531  $ —  $ 1,141,077 
Domestic   637,431   365,885   (11,612)  991,704 
Total revenues  $ 1,684,977  $ 459,416  $ (11,612) $ 2,132,781
 
 
(1)Steel revenues include primarily sales of finished steel products, semi-finished goods (billets) and manufacturing scrap.
 
Receivables from Contracts with Customers
The revenue accounting standard defines a receivable as an entity’s right to consideration that is unconditional, meaning that only the
passage of time is required before payment is due. As of August 31, 2020 and 2019, receivables from contracts with customers, net
of an allowance for doubtful accounts, totaled $135 million and $142 million, respectively, representing 97% of total accounts
receivable reported on the Consolidated Balance Sheets as of each reporting date.
Contract Liabilities
Contract consideration received from a customer prior to revenue recognition is recorded as a contract liability and is recognized as
revenue when the Company satisfies the related performance obligation under the terms of the contract. The Company’s contract
liabilities consist almost entirely of customer deposits for recycled scrap metal sales contracts, which are reported within accounts
payable on the Consolidated Balance Sheets and totaled $8 million and $3 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Unsatisfied performance obligations reflected in these contract liabilities relate to contracts with original expected durations of one
year or less and, therefore, are not disclosed. During the fiscal year ended August 31, 2020, the Company reclassified $3 million in
customer deposits as of August 31, 2019 to revenues as a result of satisfying performance obligations during the year. During the
fiscal year ended
86 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
August 31, 2019, the Company reclassified $8 million in customer deposits as of August 31, 2018 to revenues as a result of
satisfying performance obligations during the year.
Note 12 - Employee Benefits
The Company and certain of its subsidiaries have or contribute to qualified and nonqualified retirement plans covering substantially
all employees. These plans include a defined benefit pension plan, a supplemental executive retirement benefit plan (“SERBP”),
multiemployer pension plans and defined contribution plans.
Defined Benefit Pension Plan and Supplemental Executive Retirement Benefit Plan
The Company maintains a qualified defined benefit pension plan for certain nonunion employees. Effective June 30, 2006, the
Company froze this plan and ceased accruing further benefits for employee service. The Company reflects the funded status of the
defined benefit pension plan as a net asset or liability in its Consolidated Balance Sheets. Changes in its funded status are recognized
in comprehensive income. The Company amortizes as a component of net periodic pension benefit cost a portion of the net gain or
loss reported within accumulated other comprehensive loss if the beginning-of-year net gain or loss exceeds 5% of the greater of the
benefit obligation or the market value of plan assets. Net periodic pension benefit cost was not material for each of the years
presented in this report. The fair value of plan assets was $21 million and $20 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively,
and the projected benefit obligation was $18 million and $17 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The plan was
fully funded with the plan assets exceeding the projected benefit obligation by $4 million and $3 million as of August 31, 2020 and
2019, respectively. Under the fair value hierarchy, plan assets comprised Level 1 and Level 2 investments as of August 31, 2020 and
2019. Level 1 investments are valued based on quoted market prices of identical securities in the principal market. Level 2
investments are corporate bonds valued at the yields currently available on comparable securities of issuers with similar credit
ratings. No significant contributions are expected to be made to the defined benefit pension plan in the future; however, changes in
the discount rate or actual investment returns that are lower than the long-term expected return on plan assets could result in the need
for the Company to make additional contributions. The assumed discount rate used to calculate the projected benefit obligation was
2.38% and 2.83% as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The Company estimates future annual benefit payments to be
between $1 million and $4 million per year.
The Company also has a nonqualified SERBP for certain executives. A restricted trust fund has been established with assets invested
in life insurance policies that can be used for plan benefits, although the fund is subject to claims of the Company’s general creditors.
The trust fund is included in other assets, the current portion of the pension liability is included in other accrued liabilities, and the
noncurrent portion of the pension liability is included in other long-term liabilities in the Company’s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
The trust fund was valued at $3 million as of August 31, 2020 and $4 million as of August 31, 2019. The trust fund assets’ gains and
losses are included in other income, net in the Company’s Consolidated Statements of Operations. The benefit obligation and the
unfunded amount were $5 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019. Net periodic pension cost under the SERBP was not material for
each of the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Because the defined benefit pension plan and the SERBP are not material to the Consolidated Financial Statements, other disclosures
required by U.S. GAAP have been omitted.
Multiemployer Pension Plans
The Company contributes to 14 multiemployer pension plans in accordance with its collective bargaining agreements.
Multiemployer pension plans are defined benefit plans sponsored by multiple employers in accordance with one or more collective
bargaining agreements. The plans are jointly managed by trustees that include representatives from both management and labor
unions. Contributions to the plans are made based upon a fixed rate per hour worked and are agreed to by contributing employers
and the unions in collective bargaining. Benefit levels are set by a joint board of trustees based on the advice of an independent
actuary regarding the level of benefits that agreed-upon contributions can be expected to support. To the extent that the pension
obligation of other participating employers is unfunded, the Company may be required to make additional contributions in the future
to fund these obligations.
One of the multiemployer plans that the Company contributes to is the Steelworkers Western Independent Shops Pension Plan
(“WISPP,” EIN 90-0169564, Plan No. 001) benefiting the union employees of the Company’s steel manufacturing operations, which
are covered by a collective bargaining agreement that will expire on March 31, 2022. As of October 1, 2019, the WISPP was
certified by the plan’s actuaries as being in the Green Zone, as defined by the Pension Protection Act of 2006. The Company
contributed $3 million to the WISPP for each of the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018. These contributions represented
more than 5% of total contributions to the WISPP for each year.
87 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
In 2004, the Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”) approved a seven-year extension of the period over which the WISPP may amortize
unfunded liabilities, conditioned upon maintenance of certain minimum funding levels. In 2014, the WISPP obtained relief from the
specified funding requirements from the IRS, which requires that the WISPP meet a minimum funded percentage on each valuation
date and achieve a funded percentage of 100% as of October 1, 2029. Based on the most recent actuarial valuation for the WISPP,
the funded percentage using the valuation method prescribed by the IRS satisfied the minimum funded percentage requirement.
Company contributions to all of the multiemployer plans were $6 million for each of the years ended August 31, 2020 and 2019, and
$5 million for the year ended August 31, 2018.
Defined Contribution Plans
The Company has several defined contribution plans covering certain employees. Company contributions to the defined contribution
plans totaled $4 million for each of the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
 
Note 13 - Share-Based Compensation
The Company’s 1993 Stock Incentive Plan, as amended (the “SIP”), was established to provide for the grant of stock-based
compensation awards to its employees, consultants and directors. The SIP authorizes the grant of restricted shares, restricted stock
units, performance-based awards including performance share awards, stock options, stock appreciation rights and other stock-based
awards. The SIP is administered by the Compensation Committee of the Company’s Board of Directors (“Compensation
Committee”). There are 12.2 million shares of Class A common stock reserved for issuance under the SIP, of which 2.7 million were
available for future grants as of August 31, 2020. Share-based compensation expense recognized in cost of goods sold or selling,
general and administrative expense, as applicable, was $10 million, $17 million and $19 million for the years ended August 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Restricted Stock Units (“RSUs”)
During the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, the Compensation Committee granted 470,917, 261,642 and 252,865
RSUs, respectively, to the Company’s key employees under the SIP. RSUs generally vest 20% per year over five years commencing
October 31 of the year after grant. Each RSU entitles the recipient to receive one share of Class A common stock upon vesting.
The estimated fair value of an RSU is based on the market closing price of the underlying Class A common stock on the date of
grant. The weighted average grant date fair value of RSUs granted was $14.88, $27.61 and $26.60 per unit for the years ended
August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. The total estimated fair value of RSUs granted during each of the years ended August
31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 was $7 million. For RSUs granted in the year ended August 31, 2020, the compensation expense associated
with these RSUs is recognized over the requisite service period of the awards, net of forfeitures, which for participants who were
retirement eligible as of the grant date or who will become retirement eligible during the five-year term of the award is the longer of
two years or the period ending on the date retirement eligibility is achieved. For the awards granted in the years ended August 31,
2019 and 2018, RSU compensation expense is recognized over the requisite service period of the award, net of estimated forfeitures,
or to the date retirement eligibility is achieved (if before the end of the service period). RSU compensation expense was $4 million,
$6 million and $7 million for the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
A summary of the Company’s RSU activity for the year ended August 31, 2020 is as follows:
 
  Number of
Units
(in thousands)  Weighted Average
Grant Date
Fair Value  
Outstanding as of August 31, 2019   798  $ 24.14 
Granted   471  $ 14.88 
Vested   (268) $ 22.91 
Forfeited   (15) $ 21.63 
Outstanding as of August 31, 2020   986  $ 20.10 
 
The total fair value of RSUs which vested, based on the market closing price of the underlying Class A common stock on the vesting
date, was $6 million, $7 million and $8 million for the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. As of August 31,
2020, total unrecognized compensation costs related to unvested RSUs amounted to $10 million, which is expected to be recognized
over a weighted average period of three years.
88 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Performance Share Awards
The SIP authorizes performance-based awards to certain employees subject to certain conditions and restrictions. Vesting is subject
to both the continued employment of the participant with the Company and the achievement of certain performance goals established
by the Compensation Committee. A participant generally must be employed by the Company on October 31 following the end of the
performance period to receive an award payout. However, adjusted awards will be paid if employment terminates earlier on account
of a qualifying employment termination event such as death, disability, retirement, termination without cause after the first year of
the performance period or a sale of the Company or the reportable segments for which the participant works. 
The Compensation Committee determined that performance share awards granted in fiscal years 2020, 2019 and 2018 comprise two
separate and distinct awards with different vesting conditions. Awards vest if the threshold level under the specified metric is met at
the end of the approximately three-year performance period. The award performance metrics were the Company’s total shareholder
return (“TSR”) relative to a designated peer group and the Company’s return on capital employed (“ROCE”). Awards share payouts
depend on the extent to which the performance goals have been achieved. The number of shares that a participant receives is equal to
the award granted multiplied by a payout factor, which ranges from a threshold of 50% to a maximum of 200%. The TSR award
stipulates certain limitations to the payout in the event the payout reaches a defined ceiling level or the Company’s TSR is negative.
 
The Company estimates the fair value of TSR awards using a Monte-Carlo simulation model utilizing several key assumptions,
including the following for TSR awards granted during the fiscal years ended August 31:
 
  2020   2019   2018  
Expected share price volatility (SSI)   38.9%  42.5%  44.3%
Expected share price volatility (Peer group)   44.5%  51.4%  55.4%
Expected correlation to peer group companies   34.3%  35.6%  35.4%
Risk-free rate of return   1.58%  2.89%  1.79%
 
The compensation expense for the TSR awards based on the grant-date fair value, net of estimated forfeitures, is recognized over the
requisite service period (or to the date a qualifying employment termination event entitles the recipient to a prorated award, if before
the end of the service period), regardless of whether the market condition has been or will be satisfied. Compensation expense for
TSR awards was $3 million, $4 million and $3 million for the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively. 
The fair value of the ROCE awards granted is based on the market closing price of the underlying Class A common stock on the
grant date. The Company accrues compensation cost for ROCE awards based on the probable outcome of achieving specified
performance conditions, net of estimated forfeitures, over the requisite service period (or to the date a qualifying employment
termination event entitles the recipient to a prorated award, if before the end of the service period). The Company reassesses whether
achievement of the ROCE performance conditions is probable at each reporting date. If it is probable that the actual performance
results will exceed the stated target performance conditions, the Company accrues additional compensation cost for the additional
performance shares to be awarded. If, upon reassessment, it is no longer probable that the actual performance results will exceed the
stated target performance conditions, or that it is no longer probable that the target performance conditions will be achieved, the
Company reverses any recognized compensation cost for shares no longer probable of being issued. If the performance conditions
are not achieved at the end of the service period, all related compensation cost previously recognized is reversed. Compensation
expense for ROCE awards and other performance share awards with a non-market performance metric granted prior to fiscal 2018
was $2 million, $6 million and $8 million for the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.     
During the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, the Compensation Committee granted a total of 337,770 (165,834 TSR and
171,936 ROCE), 254,620 (123,812 TSR and 130,808 ROCE) and 246,161 (119,763 TSR and 126,398 ROCE) performance share
awards, respectively. The weighted average grant date fair value per share of performance share awards granted was $21.32, $28.37
and $27.32 for the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.       
89 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
A summary of the Company’s performance-based awards activity for the year ended August 31, 2020 is as follows:
 
  Number of
Awards
(in thousands)  Weighted Average
Grant Date
Fair Value  
Outstanding as of August 31, 2019   773  $ 25.49 
Granted   338  $ 21.32 
Performance achievement(1)   199  $ 20.84 
Vested   (485) $ 21.24 
Forfeited   (27) $ 24.11 
Outstanding as of August 31, 2020   798   25.19 
 
(1)Reflects the net number of awards achieved above target levels based on actual performance measured at the end of the performance period.
The total fair value of performance share awards which vested, based on the market closing price of the Company’s Class A common
stock on the vesting date, was $10 million and $13 million for the years ended August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. No
performance shares vested in fiscal year 2018. As of August 31, 2020, total unrecognized compensation costs related to unvested
performance share awards amounted to $6 million, which is expected to be recognized over a weighted average period of two
years.     
Deferred Stock Units (“DSUs”)
The Deferred Compensation Plan for Non-Employee Directors (“DSU Plan”) provides for the issuance of DSUs to non-employee
directors to be granted under the DSU Plan. Each DSU gives the director the right to receive one share of Class A common stock at a
future date. Immediately following the annual meeting of shareholders, each non-employee director will receive DSUs which will
become fully vested on the day before the next annual meeting, subject to continued service on the Board. The compensation
expense associated with the DSUs granted is recognized over the requisite service period of the awards. 
The Company will issue Class A common stock to a director pursuant to vested DSUs in a lump sum in January of the first year after
the director ceases to be a director of the Company, subject to the right of the director to elect an installment payment program under
the DSU Plan.
DSUs granted during the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 totaled 41,592 shares, 31,218 shares and 21,806 shares,
respectively. The compensation expense associated with DSUs and the total value of shares vested during each of the years ended
August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, as well as the unrecognized compensation expense as of August 31, 2020, were not material.
 
Note 14 - Income Taxes
(Loss) income from continuing operations before income taxes was as follows for the years ended August 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019   2018  
United States  $ (5,649) $ 69,476  $ 131,518 
Foreign   3,710   6,764   10,335 
Total  $ (1,939) $ 76,240  $ 141,853
 
 
90 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Income tax expense (benefit) from continuing operations consisted of the following for the years ended August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2020   2019   2018  
Current:             
Federal  $ (15,778) $ 2,690  $ 19,511 
State   329   315   894 
Foreign   519   52   — 
Total current tax (benefit) expense   (14,930)  3,057   20,405 
Deferred:             
Federal   12,292   12,930   (5,700)
State   1,338   794   (1,962)
Foreign   1,466   889   (30,333)
Total deferred tax expense (benefit)   15,096   14,613   (37,995)
Total income tax expense (benefit)  $ 166  $ 17,670  $ (17,590)
 
A reconciliation of the difference between the federal statutory rate and the Company’s effective tax rate for the years ended August
31 is as follows:
 
   2020    2019    2018  
Federal statutory rate   21.0%  21.0%  25.7%
State taxes, net of credits   (57.9)  1.2   0.4 
Foreign income taxed at different rates   (11.6)  (0.2)  (0.5)
Valuation allowance on deferred tax assets   (24.5)  (0.2)  (35.8)
Federal rate change   71.9   —   (4.9)
Non-deductible officers’ compensation   (46.9)  1.8   1.6 
Other non-deductible expenses   (66.0)  1.0   (0.6)
Noncontrolling interests   21.1   (0.5)  (0.6)
Research and development credits   99.3   (0.5)  (0.6)
Tax return to provision adjustment   89.2   0.5   — 
Unrecognized tax benefits   (97.3)  0.7   3.4 
Interest income   9.0   (0.4)  (0.2)
Excess tax benefit from stock-based compensation   3.0   (1.2)  (0.3)
Other   (18.9)  —   — 
Effective tax rate   (8.6)%  23.2%  (12.4)%
 
Effective Tax Rate
The Company’s effective tax rate from continuing operations for fiscal 2020 was an expense of 8.6%, compared to 23.2% for fiscal
2019. The reconciling differences between the Company’s effective tax rate from continuing operations for fiscal 2020 and the U.S.
federal statutory rate of 21% are exaggerated due to the Company’s near-break-even pre-tax loss from continuing operations of $2
million for fiscal 2020, despite none of the reconciling differences being individually material. The Company’s effective tax rate
from continuing operations for fiscal 2020 was lower than the U.S. federal statutory rate, and reflective of income tax expense on a
pre-tax loss from continuing operations, primarily due to the partially offsetting impacts of individually immaterial permanent
differences from non-deductible expenses and research and development credits, the effects of unrecognized tax benefits and the
aggregate impact of state taxes.
The Company reported a tax benefit on pre-tax income for fiscal 2018 primarily due to the release of valuation allowances against
certain deferred tax assets, resulting in recognition of discrete tax benefits totaling $37 million in fiscal 2018, and the impact of the
Tax Act enacted into law on December 22, 2017.
91 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
On March 27, 2020, the President of the United States signed and enacted into law the Coronavirus Aid, Relief and Economic
Security (“CARES”) Act, which contains several income tax provisions, as well as other measures, aimed at assisting businesses
impacted by the economic effects of the COVID-19 pandemic. Among other provisions, the CARES Act removes certain limitations
on utilization of net operating losses (“NOLs”) and allows for carrybacks of certain past and future NOLs. The Company applied the
NOL carryback provisions of the CARES Act to its NOL for fiscal 2020, which resulted in the reclassification of a $11 million NOL
deferred income tax asset to refundable income taxes and recognition of a $1 million income tax benefit in the third quarter of fiscal
2020. The Company does not anticipate the other income tax provisions of the CARES Act to have a material impact on its financial
statements.
Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities
Deferred tax assets and liabilities comprised the following as of August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2020    2019  
Deferred tax assets:         
Operating lease liabilities  $ 22,676  $ — 
Amortizable goodwill and other intangibles   17,455   22,646 
Employee benefit accruals   9,246   6,289 
Net operating loss carryforwards   8,484   7,122 
Environmental liabilities   7,938   7,164 
State credit carryforwards   7,933   8,202 
Federal credit carryforwards   5,116   — 
Inventory valuation methods   2,865   1,748 
Other   7,074   6,405 
Valuation allowances   (16,933)  (16,436)
Total deferred tax assets   71,854   43,140 
Deferred tax liabilities:         
Accelerated depreciation and other basis differences   39,596   30,716 
Operating lease right-of-use assets   21,104   — 
Investment in operating partnerships   14,703   6,777 
Uncertain tax positions   4,936   — 
Prepaid expense acceleration   2,655   2,263 
Total deferred tax liabilities   82,994   39,756 
Net deferred tax (liabilities) assets  $ (11,140) $ 3,384
 
 
As of August 31, 2020, foreign operating loss carryforwards were $19 million, which expire if not used between 2023 and 2039.
Federal and state credit carryforwards will expire if not used between 2020 and 2041.
Valuation Allowances
The Company assesses the realizability of its deferred tax assets on a quarterly basis through an analysis of potential sources of
future taxable income, including prior year taxable income available to absorb a carryback of tax losses, reversals of existing taxable
temporary differences, tax planning strategies, and forecasts of taxable income. The Company considers all negative and positive
evidence, including the weight of the evidence, to determine if valuation allowances against deferred tax assets are required. In fiscal
2018, the Company released valuation allowances against certain U.S. federal and state and Canadian deferred tax assets resulting in
discrete tax benefits totaling $37 million. The release of these valuation allowances was the result of sufficient positive evidence at
the time, including cumulative income in the Company’s U.S. and Canadian tax jurisdictions in recent years and projections of future
taxable income based primarily on the Company's improved financial performance, that it is more-likely-than-not that the deferred
tax assets will be realized. The Company continues to maintain valuation allowances against certain state, Canadian and all Puerto
Rican deferred tax assets. Canadian deferred tax assets against which the Company continues to maintain a valuation allowance
relate to indefinite-lived assets.
92 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes
The following table summarizes the activity related to the Company’s reserve for unrecognized tax benefits, excluding interest and
penalties, for the years ended August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2020    2019    2018  
Unrecognized tax benefits, as of the beginning of the year  $ 5,410  $ 5,054  $ 5,548 
Additions (reductions) for tax positions of prior years   1,368   (151)  171 
Additions for tax positions of the current year   852   507   596 
Reduction attributable to federal tax reform   —   —   (1,261)
Reductions for lapse of statutes   (174)  —   — 
Unrecognized tax benefits, as of the end of the year  $ 7,456  $ 5,410  $ 5,054
 
 
The Company does not anticipate any material changes to the reserve in the next 12 months. The recognized amounts of tax-related
penalties and interest were not material for all periods presented.
The Company files federal and state income tax returns in the U.S. and foreign tax returns in Puerto Rico and Canada. For U.S.
federal income tax returns, fiscal years 2013 to 2019 remain subject to examination under the statute of limitations.
Note 15 - Restructuring Charges and Other Exit-Related Activities
On January 8, 2020, subsequent to the end of the first quarter of fiscal 2020, the Company committed to certain restructuring
initiatives aimed at further reducing its annual operating expenses, primarily selling, general and administrative, at Corporate, AMR
and CSS, primarily through reductions in non-trade procurement spend, including outside and professional services, lower
employee-related expenses and other non-headcount measures. Additionally, the Company incurred professional service costs related
to the transition of its internal organizational and reporting structure to a functionally based, integrated model. During fiscal 2020,
the Company incurred aggregate restructuring charges and other exit-related costs of approximately $9 million in connection with
these initiatives, comprising severance costs of $2 million, costs associated with a lease contract termination of $1 million and
professional services costs of $6 million. The substantial majority of the restructuring charges related to these initiatives were
recognized in fiscal 2020 and required us to make cash payments.
Note 16 - Net (Loss) Income Per Share
The following table sets forth the information used to compute basic and diluted net income per share attributable to SSI
shareholders for the years ended August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2020    2019    2018  
(Loss) income from continuing operations  $ (2,105) $ 58,570  $ 159,443 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests   (1,945)  (1,977)  (3,338)
(Loss) income from continuing operations attributable to SSI shareholders  (4,050)  56,593   156,105 
(Loss) income from discontinued operations, net of tax   (95)  (248)  346 
Net (loss) income attributable to SSI shareholders  $ (4,145) $ 56,345  $ 156,451 
Computation of shares:             
Weighted average common shares outstanding, basic   27,672   27,527   27,645 
Incremental common shares attributable to dilutive performance
   share, RSU and DSU awards   —   695   944 
Weighted average common shares outstanding, diluted   27,672   28,222   28,589
 
 
Common stock equivalent shares of 629,223, 92,873 and 62,019 were considered antidilutive and were excluded from the
calculation of diluted net (loss) income per share attributable to SSI shareholders for the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively.
Note 17 - Related Party Transactions
The Company purchases recycled metal from its joint venture operations at prices that approximate fair market value. These
purchases totaled $11 million, $15 million and $16 million for the years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
93 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
Note 18 - Segment Information
The accounting standards for reporting information about operating segments define an operating segment as a component of an
enterprise that engages in business activities from which it may earn revenues and incur expenses for which discrete financial
information is available that is evaluated regularly by the chief operating decision maker in deciding how to allocate resources and in
assessing performance.
AMR acquires and recycles ferrous and nonferrous scrap metal for sale to foreign and domestic metal producers, processors and
brokers, and procures salvaged vehicles and sells serviceable used auto parts from these vehicles through a network of self-service
auto parts stores. These auto parts stores also supply the Company’s shredding facilities with auto bodies that are processed into
saleable recycled scrap metal.
CSS operates a steel mini-mill that produces a range of finished steel long products using ferrous recycled scrap metal and other raw
materials. CSS’s steel mill obtains substantially all of its scrap metal raw material requirements from its integrated metals recycling
and joint venture operations. CSS’s metals recycling operations also sell recycled metal to external customers primarily in export
markets.
The Company holds noncontrolling ownership interests in joint ventures, which are either in the metals recycling business or are
suppliers of unprocessed metal. The Company’s allocable portion of the results of these joint ventures is reported within the segment
results. As of August 31, 2020, the Company had two 50%-owned joint venture interests, one presented as part of AMR operations,
and one presented as part of CSS operations. The joint venture within CSS sells recycled scrap metal to other operations within CSS
at prices that approximate local market rates, which produces intercompany profit. This intercompany profit is eliminated while the
products remain in inventory and is not recognized until the finished products are sold to third parties. During fiscal 2018, two of the
Company’s 50% joint venture interests presented as part of AMR operations dissolved.
Intersegment sales are made at prices that approximate local market rates. These intercompany sales tend to produce intercompany
profit which is not recognized until the finished products are ultimately sold to third parties.
The information provided below is obtained from internal information that is provided to the Company’s chief operating decision
maker for the purpose of corporate management. The Company uses segment operating income to measure segment performance.
The Company does not allocate corporate interest income and expense, income taxes and other income and expense to its segments.
Certain expenses related to shared services that support operational activities and transactions are allocated from Corporate to the
segments. Unallocated Corporate expense consists primarily of expense for management and certain administrative services that
benefit both segments. In addition, the Company does not allocate certain items to segment operating income because management
does not include the information in its measurement of the performance of the segments. Such unallocated items include
restructuring charges and other exit-related activities, charges (net of recoveries) related to legacy environmental matters, and
provisions for certain legal matters. Because of the unallocated income and expense, the operating income of each segment does not
reflect the operating income the segment would report as a stand-alone business. The results of discontinued operations are excluded
from segment operating income and are presented separately, net of tax, from the results of ongoing operations for all periods
presented.
In the fourth quarter of fiscal 2018, the Company modified its measurement of segment operating income to classify all legacy
environmental charges within Corporate in order to align the measures with how the Chief Executive Officer, who is considered the
Company’s chief operating decision maker, reviews performance and makes decisions on resource allocation. The change has been
applied prospectively beginning in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2018, and such legacy environmental charges incurred during the
quarter are reported within the Corporate division. In the fourth quarter of fiscal 2018, the Company recorded $1 million of legacy
environmental charges to the Corporate division that, prior to the change, would have been classified within AMR. Legacy
environmental charges reflected in AMR’s operating results prior to the change are not material to the Consolidated Financial
Statements either individually or in the aggregate. Environmental charges are reported within selling, general and administrative
expense in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
 
94 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
The following is a summary of the Company’s total assets as of August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2020    2019  
Total assets:         
Auto and Metals Recycling(1)  $ 1,746,170  $ 1,561,267 
Cascade Steel and Scrap   793,305   769,930 
Total segment assets   2,539,475   2,331,197 
Corporate and eliminations(2)   (1,309,548)  (1,170,451)
Total assets  $ 1,229,927  $ 1,160,746 
Property, plant and equipment, net(3)  $ 487,004  $ 456,400
 
 
(1)AMR total assets include $2 million and $3 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, for investment in joint ventures. CSS total assets include $8
million and $7 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, for investment in joint ventures.
(2)The substantial majority of Corporate and eliminations total assets consist of Corporate intercompany payables to the Company’s operating segments and
intercompany eliminations.
(3)Property, plant and equipment, net includes $16 million and $14 million as of August 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, at the Company’s Canadian locations.
The table below illustrates the Company’s results from continuing operations by reportable segment for the years ended August 31
(in thousands):
 
  2020    2019    2018  
AMR:            
Revenues $ 1,307,812  $ 1,684,977  $ 1,908,966 
Less: Intersegment revenues  (7,634)  (11,612)  (24,892)
AMR external customer revenues  1,300,178   1,673,365   1,884,074 
CSS:            
Revenues  413,257   459,416   480,641 
Less: Intersegment revenues  (1,092)  —   — 
CSS external customer revenues  412,165   459,416   480,641 
Total revenues $ 1,712,343  $ 2,132,781  $ 2,364,715 
Depreciation and amortization:            
AMR $ 43,609  $ 38,816  $ 35,564 
CSS  12,009   11,781   11,724 
Segment depreciation and amortization  55,618   50,597   47,288 
Corporate  2,555   2,739   2,384 
Total depreciation and amortization $ 58,173  $ 53,336  $ 49,672 
Capital expenditures:            
AMR $ 62,008  $ 78,706  $ 67,099 
CSS  18,892   15,345   9,600 
Segment capital expenditures  80,900   94,051   76,699 
Corporate  1,105   562   927 
Total capital expenditures $ 82,005  $ 94,613  $ 77,626 
Reconciliation of the Company’s segment operating income
   to income from continuing operations before income taxes:            
AMR(1) $ 34,438  $ 95,991  $ 169,120 
CSS(2)  22,983   31,951   38,286 
Segment operating income  57,421   127,942   207,406 
Restructuring charges and other exit-related activities  (8,993)  (365)  661 
Corporate and eliminations  (41,574)  (43,712)  (59,079)
Operating income  6,854   83,865   148,988 
Interest expense  (8,669)  (8,266)  (8,983)
Other (expense) income, net  (124)  641   1,848 
(Loss) income from continuing operations before income taxes $ (1,939) $ 76,240  $ 141,853
 
 
(1)AMR operating income includes less than $1 million, less than $1 million, and less than $(1) million in income (loss) from joint ventures accounted for by the
equity method in fiscal 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
95 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
NOTES TO THE CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS 
 
(2)CSS operating income includes $1 million, $1 million, and $2 million in income from joint ventures accounted for by the equity method in fiscal 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively.
The following revenues from external customers are presented by major product and based on the sales destination for the years
ended August 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019   2018  
Major product information(1):             
Ferrous revenues  $ 862,490  $ 1,164,719  $ 1,328,447 
Nonferrous revenues   390,298   468,023   529,466 
Steel revenues(2)   336,980   367,956   367,560 
Retail and other revenues   122,575   132,083   139,242 
Total revenues  $ 1,712,343  $ 2,132,781  $ 2,364,715 
Revenues based on sales destination:             
Foreign  $ 910,785  $ 1,141,077  $ 1,354,460 
Domestic   801,558   991,704   1,010,255 
Total revenues  $ 1,712,343  $ 2,132,781  $ 2,364,715 
 
(1)In fiscal 2019, the Company modified its categories of revenues from external customers by major product. The major product revenues for fiscal 2018 have
been revised to conform to the current presentation, with such revisions being immaterial for the year.
(2)Steel revenues include primarily sales of finished steel products, semi-finished goods (billets) and manufacturing scrap.
 
In fiscal 2020, 2019 and 2018, the Company had no external customer that accounted for more than 10% of the Company’s
consolidated revenues. Sales to customers located in foreign countries are a significant part of the Company’s business. The schedule
below identifies those foreign countries to which the Company’s sales exceeded 10% of consolidated revenues in any of the last
three years ended August 31 (in thousands):
 
   2020   % of
Revenue   2019   % of
Revenue  2018   % of
Revenue 
Turkey  $ 222,141   13% N/A  N/A $ 262,835   11%
Bangladesh  $ 197,391   12% N/A  N/A N/A  N/A 
China  N/A  N/A  N/A  N/A $ 255,097   11%
 
N/A = Sales were less than the 10% threshold.
 
 
 
96 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents  
 
Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited)
In the opinion of management, this unaudited quarterly financial summary includes all adjustments necessary for a fair statement of
the results for the periods represented (in thousands, except per share amounts):
 
  Fiscal 2020  
  First   Second  Third   Fourth 
Revenues  $ 405,584  $ 439,482  $ 402,683  $ 464,594 
Cost of goods sold  $ 364,760  $ 380,520  $ 356,217  $ 402,228 
Operating (loss) income  $ (7,910) $ 7,691  $ (3,706) $ 10,779 
(Loss) income from continuing operations attributable to SSI
shareholders  $ (7,023) $ 3,882  $ (4,926) $ 4,017 
Basic (loss) income per share from continuing operations
attributable to SSI shareholders  $ (0.26) $ 0.14  $ (0.18) $ 0.14 
Diluted (loss) income per share from continuing operations
attributable to SSI shareholders  $ (0.26) $ 0.14  $ (0.18) $ 0.14 
Net (loss) income  $ (6,565) $ 4,504  $ (4,717) $ 4,578 
Net (loss) income attributable to SSI shareholders  $ (6,995) $ 3,883  $ (4,995) $ 3,962 
Basic net (loss) income per share attributable to SSI shareholders $ (0.25) $ 0.14  $ (0.18) $ 0.14 
Diluted net (loss) income per share attributable to SSI
shareholders  $ (0.25) $ 0.14  $ (0.18) $ 0.14
 
 
  Fiscal 2019  
  First   Second  Third   Fourth 
Revenues  $ 564,020  $ 473,565  $ 547,396  $ 547,800 
Cost of goods sold  $ 490,132  $ 414,688  $ 474,598  $ 479,117 
Operating income  $ 22,689  $ 19,036  $ 24,459  $ 17,681 
Income from continuing operations attributable to SSI
shareholders  $ 16,260  $ 13,030  $ 15,682  $ 11,621 
Basic income per share from continuing operations attributable to
SSI shareholders  $ 0.59  $ 0.47  $ 0.57  $ 0.42 
Diluted income per share from continuing operations attributable
to SSI shareholders  $ 0.57  $ 0.46  $ 0.56  $ 0.41 
Net income  $ 16,618  $ 13,297  $ 16,440  $ 11,967 
Net income attributable to SSI shareholders  $ 16,188  $ 12,892  $ 15,690  $ 11,575 
Basic net income per share attributable to SSI shareholders  $ 0.59  $ 0.47  $ 0.57  $ 0.42 
Diluted net income per share attributable to SSI shareholders  $ 0.57  $ 0.46  $ 0.56  $ 0.41
 
 
 
97 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
Table of Contents  
 
Schedule II – Valuation and Qualifying Accounts
For the Years Ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
(In thousands)
 
Column A  Column B  Column C   Column D  Column E 
Description  Balance at
Beginning
of Period  Charges to Cost
and Expenses  Deductions  Balance at
End of
Period  
Fiscal 2020                 
Allowance for doubtful accounts  $ 1,569  $ 66  $ (42) $ 1,593 
Deferred tax valuation allowance  $ 16,436  $ 1,293  $ (796) $ 16,933 
Fiscal 2019                 
Allowance for doubtful accounts  $ 2,586  $ 74  $ (1,091) $ 1,569 
Deferred tax valuation allowance  $ 16,484  $ 472  $ (520) $ 16,436 
Fiscal 2018                 
Allowance for doubtful accounts  $ 2,280  $ 323  $ (17) $ 2,586 
Deferred tax valuation allowance  $ 67,348  $ —  $ (50,864) $ 16,484
 
 
 
 
98 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents  
 
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
The Company maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) of the Securities and
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”)) that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by
the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within
the time periods specified by the Securities and Exchange Commission’s rules and forms and that such information is accumulated
and communicated to management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow
timely decisions regarding required disclosures. Any controls and procedures, no matter how well designed and operated, can only
provide reasonable assurance of achieving the desired control objectives. The Company’s management, with the participation of the
Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, has completed an evaluation of the effectiveness of the design and operation of
the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures as of August 31, 2020. Based on this evaluation, the Company’s Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Officer have concluded that, as of August 31, 2020, the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures
were effective at the reasonable assurance level.
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting is presented within Part II, Item 8 of this report and is
incorporated herein by reference.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There was no change in the Company’s internal control over financial reporting (as that term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-
15(f) under the Exchange Act) during its most recent fiscal quarter that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially
affect, the Company’s internal control over financial reporting.
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
None.
 
99 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Information required by Item 401 of Regulation S-K regarding directors, and information required by Items 407(c)(3), 407(d)(4) and
407(d)(5) of Regulation S-K, will be included under “Election of Directors” and “Corporate Governance” in the Company’s Proxy
Statement for its 2021 Annual Meeting of Shareholders and is incorporated herein by reference.
Information regarding executive officers is included in Part I, Item 1 “Business – Executive Officers of the Company” of this Form
10-K as permitted by General Instruction G(3).
Code of Ethics
On April 26, 2018, the Board of Directors approved a revised Company’s Code of Conduct that is applicable to all of its directors
and employees. This document is posted under the caption “Company – About Schnitzer – Ethics & Code of Conduct” on the
Company’s internet website (www.schnitzersteel.com) and is available free of charge by calling the Company or submitting a
request to ir@schn.com. The Company intends to satisfy its disclosure obligations with respect to any amendments to or waivers of
the Code of Conduct for directors, executive officers or Senior Financial Officers by posting such information on its internet website
set forth above rather than by filing a Form 8-K.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
Information required by this Item 11 is incorporated herein by reference to our definitive proxy statement for our 2021 Annual
Meeting of Shareholders to be filed pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Exchange Act.
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
Information required by this Item 12 is incorporated herein by reference to our definitive proxy statement for our 2021 Annual
Meeting of Shareholders to be filed pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Exchange Act.
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
Information required by this Item 13 is incorporated herein by reference to our definitive proxy statement for our 2021 Annual
Meeting of Shareholders to be filed pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Exchange Act.
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
Information required by this Item 14 is incorporated herein by reference to our definitive proxy statement for our 2021 Annual
Meeting of Shareholders to be filed pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Exchange Act.
 
100 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
 
      (a)  The following documents are filed as part of this report:  
 
  FORM 10-
K
   PAGE NO.
       1. Financial Statements:  
    
  Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 55
    
  Consolidated Balance Sheets as of August 31, 2020 and 2019 58
    
  Consolidated Statements of Operations for each of the three years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 59
    
 
 Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive (Loss) Income for each of the three years ended August 31,
2020, 2019 and 201860
    
  Consolidated Statements of Equity for each of the three years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 61
    
  Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for each of the three years ended August 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 62
    
  Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements 64
    
       2.  Financial Statement Schedules:  
    
 
 Schedule II - Valuation and Qualifying Accounts for each of the three years ended August 31, 2020, 2019
and 201898
   
  All other schedules are omitted as the information is either not applicable or is not required.
   
       3.  Exhibits:
   
       3.1
 2006 Restated Articles of Incorporation (as corrected December 2, 2011) of the Registrant. Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the
Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended November 30, 2011, and incorporated herein by
reference.
   
       3.2
 Restated Bylaws of the Registrant. Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
December 16, 2013, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
       4.1 Description of Registrant’s Securities.
   
     10.1
 Lease Agreement, dated September 1, 1988, between Schnitzer Investment Corp. and the Registrant, as amended,
relating to the Portland Metals Recycling operation and which has terminated except for surviving indemnity obligations.
Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant’s Registration Statement on Form S-1 filed on September 24, 1993 (Commission
File No. 33-69352), and incorporated herein by reference (P).
   
     10.2
 Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated May 4, 2005, between Schnitzer Investment Corp. and the Registrant, relating to
purchase by the Registrant of the Portland Metals Recycling operations real estate. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the
Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 10, 2005, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
     10.3
 Third Amended Shared Services Agreement, dated July 26, 2006, between the Registrant, Schnitzer Investment Corp.
and Island Equipment Company, Inc. Filed as Exhibit 10.5 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on July
28, 2006, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
     10.4
 Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of April 6, 2016 among Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc., as the
US Borrower, and Schnitzer Steel Canada Ltd., as a Canadian Borrower, Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative
Agent, and the other Lenders party thereto. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended February 29, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
     10.5
 Security Agreement dated as of April 6, 2016 among Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc., the other Grantor’s party thereto
and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended February 29, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
101 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
   
     10.6
 General Security Agreement dated as of April 6, 2016 between Schnitzer Steel Canada Ltd. and Bank of America, N.A.,
as Collateral Agent. Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
February 29, 2016, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
     10.7
 First Amendment, dated as of August 24, 2018, to Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of April 6,
2016 among Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc., as the US Borrower, and Schnitzer Steel Canada Ltd., as a Canadian
Borrower, Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, and the other Lenders party thereto. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to
the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
     10.8
 Second Amendment to Third Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of June 30, 2020 among Schnitzer Steel
Industries, Inc. as the US Borrower, and Schnitzer Steel Canada Ltd., as a Canadian Borrower, Bank of America, N.A.,
as Administrative Agent, and the other Lenders party thereto. Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended May 31, 2020, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.9
 Amended Executive Annual Bonus Plan. Filed as Appendix A to the Registrant’s Annual Proxy Report on Form DEF
14A filed on December 17, 2014, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.10
 Annual Incentive Compensation Plan, effective September 1, 2006. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended February 28, 2007, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.11
 1993 Stock Incentive Plan of the Registrant as Amended and Restated on November 7, 2013. Filed as Appendix A to the
Registrant’s Definitive Proxy Statement filed on December 18, 2013, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.12
 Form of Deferred Stock Unit Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for non-employee directors.
Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on July 28, 2006, and incorporated herein by
reference.
   
   *10.13
 Deferred Compensation Plan for Non-Employee Directors. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on July 28, 2006, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.14
 Summary Sheet for 2020 Non-Employee Director Compensation. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended May 31, 2020, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.15
 Amended and Restated Supplemental Executive Retirement Bonus Plan of the Registrant effective January 1, 2009.
Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended May 31, 2009, and
incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.16
 Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement between the Registrant and executive officers other than Tamara L.
Lundgren and used for agreements entered into prior to 2011. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on May 5, 2008, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.17
 Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement between the Registrant and executive officers and used for agreements
entered into between 2011 and 2014. Filed as Exhibit 10.19 to the Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed
October 29, 2013 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.18
 Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement between the Registrant and executive officers and used for agreements
entered into after 2014. Filed as Exhibit 10.16 to the Registrant’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed October 27, 2015,
and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.19
 Amended and Restated Employment Agreement by and between the Registrant and Tamara L. Lundgren dated October
29, 2008. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 4, 2008, and
incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.20
 Amendment No. 1 dated June 29, 2011 to Amended and Restated Employment Agreement by and between the Registrant
and Tamara L. Lundgren dated October 29, 2008. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended May 31, 2011 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.21
 Amendment No. 2 dated July 25, 2017 to Amended and Restated Employment Agreement by and between the Registrant
and Tamara L. Lundgren dated October 29, 2008. Filed as Exhibit 10.19 to the Registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended August 31, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.22
 Amended and Restated Change in Control Severance Agreement by and between the Registrant and Tamara L. Lundgren
dated October 29, 2008. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 4,
2008, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
102 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
   *10.23
 Form of Indemnification Agreement for Directors and certain officers used for agreements entered into prior to 2016.
Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on July 28, 2006, and incorporated herein by
reference.
   
   *10.24
 Form of Indemnification Agreement for Directors and certain officers used for agreements entered into after 2015. Filed
as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 3, 2016, and incorporated herein by
reference.
   
   *10.25
 Amended and Restated Employment Agreement by and between the Registrant and John D. Carter dated June 29, 2011.
Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended May 31, 2011 and
incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.26
 Amendment No. 1 dated November 6, 2012 to the Amended and Restated Employment Agreement by and between the
Registrant and John D. Carter dated June 29, 2011. Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended November 30, 2012 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.27
 Amendment No. 2 dated October 29, 2014 to the Amended and Restated Employment Agreement by and between the
Registrant and John D. Carter dated June 29, 2011. Filed as Exhibit 10.25 to the Registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-
K for the year ended August 31, 2017, and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.28
 Amendment No. 3, dated October 25, 2017, to the Amended and Restated Agreement for Services by and between the
Registrant and John D. Carter dated June 29, 2011. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarterly period ended November 30, 2017 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.29
 Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for awards granted after
fiscal 2012 through the first half of fiscal 2016. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the quarterly period ended November 30, 2012 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.30
 Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for awards granted after the
first half of fiscal 2016 through fiscal 2018. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended May 31, 2016 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.31
 Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for awards granted in fiscal
2019. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended November 30, 2018
and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.32
 Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for awards granted in fiscal
2020. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended May 31, 2020 and
incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.33
 Form of Long-Term Incentive Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for awards granted in fiscal
2018. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended November
30, 2017 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.34
 Form of Long-Term Incentive Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for awards granted in fiscal
2019. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended November
30, 2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.35
 Form of Long-Term Incentive Award Agreement under the 1993 Stock Incentive Plan used for awards granted in fiscal
2020. Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Registrant’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended November
30, 2019 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.36
 Fiscal 2019 Annual Performance Bonus Program for Tamara L. Lundgren. Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Registrant’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended November 30, 2018 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
   *10.37
 Fiscal 2020 Annual Performance Bonus Program for Tamara L. Lundgren. Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Registrant’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended November 30, 2019 and incorporated herein by reference.
   
     21.1 Subsidiaries of Registrant.
   
     23.1 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
   
     24.1 Powers of Attorney.
   
     31.1 Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
   
     31.2 Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
   
103 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
     32.1
 Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
   
     32.2
 Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
   
101.INS
 Inline XBRL Instance Document – the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL
tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCH Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
101.CAL Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document
101.DEF Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document
101.LAB Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document
101.PRE Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document
104  Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)
 
* Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement.
The agreements and other documents filed as exhibits to this report are not intended to provide factual information or other
disclosure other than with respect to the terms of the agreements or other documents themselves, and you should not rely on them for
that purpose. In particular, any representations and warranties made by us in these agreements or other documents were made solely
within the specific context of the relevant agreement or document as of the date they were made and may not describe the actual
state of affairs for any other purpose or at any other time.
 
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
 
104 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
 
Table of Contents   
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report
to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
 SCHNITZER STEEL INDUSTRIES, INC.
Dated: October 22, 2020 By:  /s/ RICHARD D. PEACH
   Richard D. Peach
    Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Chief
Strategy Officer
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant on October 22, 2020 in the capacities indicated.
 
Signature  Title
   
Principal Executive Officer:   
  
/s/ TAMARA L. LUNDGREN  Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer
Tamara L. Lundgren   
  
Principal Financial Officer:   
  
/s/ RICHARD D. PEACH  Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Chief Strategy Officer
Richard D. Peach   
  
Principal Accounting Officer:   
  
/s/ STEFANO GAGGINI  Vice President, Deputy Chief Financial Officer and Chief Accounting Officer
Stefano Gaggini   
  
Directors:   
  
*WAYLAND R. HICKS  Director
Wayland R. Hicks   
  
*RHONDA D. HUNTER  Director
Rhonda D. Hunter   
   
*DAVID L. JAHNKE  Director
David L. Jahnke   
   
*JUDITH A. JOHANSEN  Director
Judith A. Johansen   
  
*WILLIAM D. LARSSON  Director
William D. Larsson   
  
*MICHAEL SUTHERLIN  Director
Michael Sutherlin   
 
*By: /s/ RICHARD D. PEACH   
  Attorney-in-fact, Richard D. Peach   
 
105 / Schnitzer Steel Industries, Inc. Form 10-K 2020
